Authors
Louis Proyect
Number of Reviews
47

Title
Review for Unmade Beds (1997)
"Unmade Beds" is a riveting portrait of two men and two women living
in the greater New York area who rely on personal ads in order to meet
the opposite sex. Their tales of woe are delivered with a
self-deprecating and mordant wit that make for an grimly entertaining
documentary.
The first person we meet is a Jersey City Italian-American woman in
her forties who is up-front about her purposes. She makes $2000 a
month, but her expenses come to $3000. So she is not interested in
romance, but in balancing her checkbook. She tells one man that he
will have to pay her $100 for their date, even if there is no sex
involved. The money is supposed to pay just for her time and trouble.
She is totally without illusions. She says that she can get "dick"
whenever she wants. Men find her sexy, even though she is starting to
worry about some bulges appearing around her midsection. "Where did
that come from," she tells the camera as she eyes herself in the
mirror in a skimpy bra and panties, while grabbing a fold of her flesh
in her fingers. "I woke up one morning and it was just there." She is
proud of her ability to attract men, but has no use for men who can't
deliver some cash. Younger men have been following her around lately
because they want to learn about sex and love from an older and wiser
woman. She blows them off because there is nothing in it for her. If
they want an education, let them pay her tuition.
We then meet another Italian-American, a 40 year old man who lives in
a very traditional ethnic neighborhood in one of the outer boroughs
where it is considered abnormal to be a "bachelor." He spits the word
out and tells us how much he hates it. He is cursed to be a mere 5'4"
tall and rails against all the baby-boomer women who demand that their
men be taller than them. He describes the agony he has to go through
when he has to confess his height to a woman while setting up their
first date. He is an only child and visits to his parents in Florida
have become hellish as they broach the subject of his bachelorhood and
their need for grandchildren one more time. He resolves to visit them
only at Christmas time in the future. While in a neighborhood deli, he
overhears an old woman referring to him in Italian as a "fag" because
he is unmarried. Knowing Italian, he is offended and considers
defending himself. He changes his mind at the last minute because it
is not socially acceptable to yell profanities at an 80 year old
woman. As a last resort, he goes to a dating counselor. He looks into
the camera and wonders why he is spending his hard-earned money on
learning about life. You shouldn't have to pay for that, he complains.
The next character we meet is a 28 year old woman who has moved to NYC
from the Midwest. She is 220 pounds and states that fact openly in her
ads. She is a professional woman with conventional attitudes who seems
fairly oblivious about her appearance. If anything, she is overly
critical about the appearance of her dates. One man was balding and at
least 225 pounds, she huffs. Like most Manhattanites, she considers a
mate to be part of making it. It is a sign of success. Her big fear is
that she only has two years to go until she is thirty, when her
chances will be over. Notwithstanding her weight, she has a rather
active social life constructed through the personal ads. Her last
affair was with a cab-driver who was into S&M. She laughs about their
first sexual experience. She brought him back to her apartment, where
he opened an overnight case filled with whips, handcuffs, leather
masks and a French maid's uniform. After agreeing to be the dominant
one, she discovers that she sort of enjoyed the sex although it wasn't
exactly her cup of tea. She is crushed after he leaves her. "Can you
imagine being dumped by a submissive," she tells the camera.
The final character is a man in his fifties. He is a classic case of
arrested development. His attitudes toward women haven't changed since
the 1960s and 70s when he only went out with beautiful women, like
belly dancers and Playboy waitresses. He shows photos of himself and
some of these women. He is dressed in clothing straight out of
"Saturday Night Fever." He doesn't seem to realize that life has moved
on and that he has gotten older. He escorts the camera crew through
his apartment which is furnished in a garishly "erotic" manner with
dim lighting and nude sculptures. "My apartment spells sex. If a woman
doesn't like the looks of it, she can take off." The only problem is
that he doesn't seem to realize that he, like the furnishings, has a
dated and seedy quality. Sometimes the brute realities sink in on him,
such as the time he is charged for a senior citizen's admission at a
movie theater. "Can you imagine that? She thought I was 65?" Anybody
looking at his weathered appearance will of course understand the
ticket seller's mistake. The only thing that makes this character at
all sympathetic is that he describes his personal ads hell with a
masochistic relish. He describes taking a woman out to a fancy
restaurant on their initial date where the bill came to $190. She was
a judge and spent the entire dinner telling him why she wouldn't see
him again. She moved in elite social circles and he wouldn't be
appropriate for her. What would you expect from a judge, he comments
bitterly.
I answered a personal ad myself once. The woman who had placed it was
Kerri Jacobs, a high-profile journalist who wrote for Metropolitan
magazine on architecture. She has moved on to New York Magazine, where
she is a regular columnist on the same topic. New York Magazine is one
of the prime locations for personal ads, especially for conventional
New Yorkers. She had placed her ad in the New York Review of Books, a
locale for the more intellectually pretentious. Since she was an
extremely good-looking young woman, I couldn't exactly figure out why
she had placed an ad. After a few moments, I figured it out
completely. Nobody was good enough for her. The ads were supposed to
help weed out "losers," as she put it. I didn't even want to find out
if I was a winner and never called her back.
What dates like these remind me of is job interviews. Everything is
riding on your initial appearance. Not only do you have to look right,
you also have to find the words that the interviewer wants to hear. I
had to put up with this nonsense when I worked on Wall Street. Why
would I or any sensitive person have to put up with it in affairs of
the heart? One of the reasons that Columbia University was such a
deliverance for me was that I would no longer have to put up with the
stupid questions of people in the Personnel Office. "Why do you think
Paine-Webber and you are suitable for each other?" "I don't know. The
thought of working at another one of these Wall Street dumps makes me
sick to my stomach. I just need the money to pay for my rent,
scholarly Marxist books and African music CD's."
The unstated, and therefore more powerful, message of this movie is
that the cash nexus distorts everything. Everything in capitalist
society, including people and nature, are seen from the point of view
of their exchange value. This colors everything. The way we speak
reflects this alienated existence. We speak of the "investment" we
have in an intimate relationship. We are worried whether our "assets"
are to be found in our appearance, like Richard Gere's, or in our
intelligence or wit, like Woody Allen's (well, from 25 years ago
anyhow).
Director Nicholas Barker, who hails from England, allows the stories
of the four subjects to speak for themselves, but the points they all
make cry out for a different way of human beings relating to each
other. There are some very effective cinematic means he uses to
enhance this theme. In an early scene in the film, we see an Edward
Hopper poster on somebody's living-room wall. Hopper is the poet
laureate of urban loneliness. His figures are always depicted in
isolation from one another. Barker cuts between this Hopper poster and
shots of real New Yorkers sitting at luncheon counters or staring out
their windows. New York never looked more Hopper-esque than it does in
this film.
The film score is also very effective. He alternates between Charlie
Mingus big band sounds, which usually accompany one of his characters
on their way in a taxi cab to a date, and minimalist electronic music
when they sit home alone after the disappointing evening.
There is an epidemic of loneliness in America. The Communist Manifesto
hails the process of urbanization that destroys traditional societies.
We are accustomed to grieving the loss of peasant villages as this
takes place. Another loss that people have not been able to connect to
the ravages of capitalism is the breakdown of our social lives. The
vast impersonal cities where corporations are located serve the
interests of the employer, but make no provision for the social life
of the working people. They drift from bar to health clubs in search
of the significant other. They blame themselves when they can't make
the right connection. Some day all these poor souls will wake up to
the reality that capitalism is the cause of their loneliness and not
their height, weight or income.
For Marxist discussion: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Title
Review for Three Seasons (1999)
"Three Seasons," a bittersweet film set in contemporary Saigon,
crosscuts between three pairs of people struggling for love and
fulfillment in a world entirely hostile to those goals. The Saigon of
"Three Seasons" is a money jungle where people eke out livings against
a backdrop of garish new hotels. That Vietnam was once the hope for
progressive people around the world, as well as its own people, gives
the film added poignancy and a sense of lost possibilities.
The film opens with Kien An (Nguyen Ngoc Hiep) being admitted to a
suburban walled compound where she will work picking white lotuses to
sell on the streets of Saigon. This young woman joins her co-workers
in the daily harvest on a small pond that is faced by a large
foreboding house occupied by the Teacher Dao (Tran Manh Cuong), who
has not been seen in public for many years. Someone tells her that it
is his ghost who lives there. Their work is of a primeval nature,
perhaps unchanged for a thousand years or more. They row across the
pond in tiny rowboats, pick the beautiful white flowers, while singing
work songs. One day, to the resentment of the more senior
lotus-pickers, Kien An adds new verses which have more depth and
subtlety than the simple verses usually sung.
Teacher Dao hears her new verses and bids his servant bring the young
woman to see him. She discovers that the man, of an indeterminate age,
is confined to a wheelchair. He is in the advanced stages of leprosy
and his fingers have been eaten away by the disease. He tells her that
she will be his fingers and begins to compose new poems that she
spends each day transcribing. Their partnership gives meaning to their
lives. What can not change is her daily chores on the pond and on the
streets of Saigon. This simple laborer's life is being wasted, as her
master's is wasting away due to disease.
The next pair includes James Hager (Harvey Keitel), a Vietnam veteran
who sits outside his hotel each day staring into the windows of the
"Apocalypse Now" disco, where he believes he will find the daughter he
left behind in the war. That is where he met her mother, who has
recently died. One night he runs into a street kid Woody (Nguen Huu
Duoc), who survives by selling trinkets out of a folding case. As
Hager spills out his story to the young boy over a beer in the disco
late one night, the lights go out suddenly. When they come on again,
the case is missing. For Woody, this is as much of a blow as the loss
of the bicycle in the neo-realist classic "Bicycle Thief," which was
also set in a grim postwar urban setting. Woody assumes that Hager has
stolen the case and spends his days wandering around the city
searching for the American and his case. Meanwhile, Hager continues
his search for his daughter.
The casting of Keitel is no accident. He lent his considerable clout
in the industry as Executive Producer in order to make the film
happen. The only thing he got in exchange was the privilege to act in
one of his most powerful roles to date. Keitel has long been
associated with independent films like "Three Seasons" and deserves
enormous credit for making this latest one happen. Nguen Huu Duoc,
like the young star of "Central Station," was also a non-professional
who the director discovered on the streets of the city doing exactly
what he does in the film: selling trinkets. Both films are about the
desperate situation of children and it is a sign of the integrity of
the films' creators that they made this casting decision.
The final pair, who really define the dramatic and emotional core of
the film, are Hai (Don Duong), a pedicab driver and Lan (Zoë Bui), the
woman he falls in love with--a prostitute. When he first meets her,
she is running from a bar after having an altercation with a client.
Lan offers to drive her home and falls in love with her instantly.
>From that moment on, he follows her everywhere, just to be near her
and to be able to drive her home. While she at first appreciates his
solicitousness, after a while she becomes annoyed. What does he want
from her? She is so used to having men treat her like a piece of meat
that she can not relate to someone who loves her for herself. She
tries to wise him up. She points at one of the new hotels and lectures
him. You see that place? The people who stay there look nothing like
us. They have money and we have none. Someday when I have money I will
join them and leave all this behind.
Hai does not know how to respond to her. There really is no answer,
because the new Vietnam is based on money and nothing else. The only
hope is to find a job with a multinational corporation or sell your
flesh. Lan is the realist. This does not prevent Hai from continuing
to pursue her. When he finally wins $200 in a pedicab race, he uses
$50 to buy Lan's services. When they go up to a hotel room, he only
asks her to remove her makeup, change into a nightgown that he's
bought her, and go to sleep. When she awakes, she discovers that he
has gone without touching her.
Perhaps the only person capable of making such a film is Tony Bui, the
writer and director who fled the country with his family in 1970 when
he was two years old. He visited Vietnam in 1994 and developed what he
described as a passion for the country. He explains that, "A driving
force for me was to make a film in Vietnamese with Vietnamese actors
and to tell a modern story. Growing up I only saw the Vietnamese in
war films, as faceless people running through the jungles with guns.
That's not what I saw when I went there. I wanted to bring out their
humanity in a way that hasn't been shown, the universality of the
human spirit."
"Three Seasons" is scheduled for theatrical release later this year.
Do not miss it. It is a beautiful and moving work of art.
(For Marxist discussion: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Title
Review for Ressources humaines (1999)
"Human Resources" has the distinction of being not only one of the finest
movies ever made about the labor movement, it is also unparalleled in its
ability to explain and make concrete issues that barely receive attention
in the print media, such as "just-in-time" production techniques.
College student Franck (Jalil Lespert) has returned home for a summer
internship at the factory where his father Jean-Claud (Jean-Claude Vallod)
has worked for thirty years. His parents are proud of him, the first member
of the family to rise above their class. When he comes downstairs in a
stylish navy blue suit for his first day in the Human Resources department,
his parents can only beam at him.
As soon as he steps foot in the factory, he learns that his new class
status is a mixed blessing. While his father is showing him how his spot
welding machine works (this is the kind of job I held briefly 22 years ago
"colonizing" a factory in Kansas City), the foreman walks over and bawls
him out for wasting time. This is the first lesson in the young man's
education into the class realities of the factory, as opposed to what he
learned in management science at college.
As in intern, Franck is assigned to prepare a report on the feasibility of
a 35 hour week. Since this is at a lower pay rather than something like "30
for 40", it will be a hard sell to the factory workers, who remain
suspicious of the bosses after 22 of their number were laid off in the
previous year. Throughout the movie, the bosses are always warning the
workers that unless they are profitable, the factory will have to shut down.
When the boss (Lucien Longueville) drives Franck home in his luxury sedan
(classical music plays on the car radio), the intern proposes a plan that
will make the 35 hour week more acceptable. If a referendum is held at the
plant, he is sure that the workers would go for the plan since the union
would not be part of the deliberations, especially since management will be
formulating the questions. Everybody knows that the way poll questions are
constructed has a lot to do with the outcome. (Eg., "Do you favor
continuation of Vietnamization in order to achieve a long-lasting peace?"
versus "Are you for precipitous withdrawal from Vietnam that would leave
the country at the mercy of the Communists?")
The boss buys into the plan and makes it clear to Franck that he has a
future in the conglomerate that owns the factory. Unfortunately, his
immediate supervisor in the Human Resources department views Franck's
discussions with the big boss as an attack on his own position in the
pecking order and warns him not to step out of line again.
Caught between two worlds, he catches flak from both sides. At a bar with
old friends from high school, an offhanded remark is interpreted by one of
them as snobbery. After Franck's internship is finished, he will go back to
Paris with the rest of the rich people while they are stuck in their
factory jobs. A drunken Franck lunges at his accuser in anger, but their
friends separate them. At this point we begin to surmise that some of the
anger is self-directed. While he has the outward appearance of a manager,
he is still part of the working class.
When the union local at the factory hears about the referendum, they storm
into the personnel office led by a middle-aged shop steward (Danielle
Mélador) who is a member of the Communist Party. She is one of the most
memorable characters in the film, who represents the collective class
memory of the people she serves, including Franck's submissive father who
loathes the idea of standing up to the bosses. In confrontation after
confrontation, she never gives in an inch. Interestingly, the choice of a
female in this role gives the Director and Screenwriter Laurent Cantet an
opportunity to show how sexism weakens the working class. Before it has
become clear what ulterior motives lie behind the seemingly reasonable
referendum, her union comrades tend to view her a shrill and irrational, an
"old witch" so to speak. Perhaps she is an old witch, but only in the
original sense of the word: a wise woman who lives by her own rules.
As it turns out, the referendum was to be used as a wedge to introduce a
whole series of labor-saving measures that would allow the factory to be
downsized by 10, including Franck's own father. When he learns of this plan
by accident, he decides to throw his lot in with the factory workers and
reject the class that had been making overtures to him.
"Human Resources" is brilliantly written, directed and acted. It is playing
in NYC right now at a Loew's on Broadway and 45th street, an unusual locale
for an art film. It very well could be appearing in large cities around the
United States. Not only is it worth tracking down, it is a film that could
be used instructionally in college classes along with other classics like
"Salt of the Earth".

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
This is the first review I've ever written about a movie that I walked
out after only fifteen minutes. It riled me up so much that I had to
pour out my complaint. This movie purports to be some kind of edgy,
"new wavish" social criticism, but as I will point out, it is simply a
version of Saturday Night Live for the carriage trade.
Tod Solonz wrote and directed "Welcome to the Dollhouse," an "indie"
film just like "Happiness," his sophomore and sophomoric follow-up.
"Welcome to the Dollhouse" focuses on the unhappy life of a homely
high school student and her dysfunctional New Jersey middle class
family. The high school itself is just one cut below the concentration
camp depicted in Lina Wertmuller's "Seven Beauties" in terms of
debasement and physical abuse. As somebody who fled high school at the
tender age of 16 to go off to college, the movie struck a resonant
chord with me. The one thing I did have trouble with was the meanness
of the central character, whose losing ways did not inspire her to
turn against the mainstream. She remained anxious to join the
in-groups even though none of them would accept her. I preferred to
thumb my nose at the jocks and the cheerleaders, no matter how many
times this got me beat up.
Since "Welcome to the Dollhouse" received such glowing reviews (still
worth seeing in video), it must have convinced Solonz to make his next
film more of the same. Much more. In fact, too much more.
"Happiness" begins with a prologue involving one of the female leads
and Saturday Night Live alumnus Jon Lovitz. They are on a date in a
fancy restaurant. She, a plain but not unattractive woman in her
mid-30's has just rebuffed Lovitz. He proceeds to give her a
tongue-lashing, telling her that she is "shit" and that he is
"champagne". She sits there passively accepting his insults. This
exercise in humiliation sets the tone for the remainder of the film,
at least I presume it did since I walked out shortly.
Next we meet the woman's sister, a "successful" housewife married to a
psychotherapist, and living in a spacious suburban house. The sister
picks up where Lovitz has left off and in a conversation with her in
the kitchen tells her how much of a loser she is. The sister listens
to the insults passively.
Meanwhile, we discover that the psychotherapist, who is in
psychotherapy himself, is a closeted homosexual who is about to begin
an incestuous relationship with his pubescent son. In a conversation
between the two, the father explains what it means to "come". The
purpose of the scene is not to reveal complexity of character or to
establish dramatic conflict, but rather to shock a jaded audience in
the manner of "epater le bourgeoisie."
When it finally dawned on me that I was seeing an extended Saturday
Night Live sketch, I decided to walk out. The prologue set the tone
for the rest of the film, even to the extent of including a signature
SNL star Jon Lovitz. In the mid-80s, SNL developed a brand of humor
that went hand-in-hand with the dominant Reagan-era sensibility. It
depicted ordinary Americans, either suburbanites or the urban
underclass, as clueless losers. One was supposed to laugh at the
overweight, unsophisticated, culturally backward masses. If you were a
member of this group, you would laugh at yourself in masochistic
fashion. If you were a "hip" college student with more advanced
sensibilities, you got your pleasure in laughing sadistically at the
masses. This aesthetic eventually was reflected in the Letterman show,
where it was honed to perfection.
With Solonz, you are getting the aesthetic overlaid with an
"underground" sensibility. This is not the college fraternity ambiance
of the SNL or Letterman shows, but the lower east side hipster bars
that Solonz presumably attended while attending NYU film school..
Solonz, born in 1960, seems very much a product of this TV/pop culture
environment. He actually produced a short for Saturday Night Live,
titled "How I Became a Leading Artistic Figure in New York City's East
Village Cultural Landscape" in 1986.
The aesthetic of humiliation that Solonz has fine-tuned is shared by
other young film-makers. You will discover it at work in Neil Labute,
who directed the awful and misogynist "In the Company of Men," a film
that I also walked out of after fifteen minutes. His latest, "Friends
and Neighbors," appears closely related thematically and aesthetically
to "Happiness." Mr. Cranky, one of my favorite film reviewers,
describes this Labute film in the following terms:
"The names [of the cast] are straight from the press packet, since I
don't recall hearing them once in the film, which is LaBute's
simplistic way of reinforcing that 'everyman' quality. Barry is
self-absorbed and dependent. Jerry is self-absorbed and co-dependent.
Cary is self-absorbed and psychotic. Mary is indecisive
non-aggressive. Terri is decisive aggressive. Cheri is non-aggressive
co-dependent. Basically, this all amounts to a movie in which not a
person has a clue about anything, and they are all eager to
demonstrate that point in protracted, never-ending conversation."
Sounds like a Saturday Night Live sketch, right?
What interests me above all is the self-delusion that is at work in
directors like Solonz and Labute. They enjoy the reviews they get from
mainstream publications like the NY Times, which represent them as
"daring" and "experimental." But they are not creating anything which
deserves such adjectives. Instead what they are producing is highbrow
versions of television comedy. Television is the ultimate media of
late capitalism. It has the propensity to debase society while
returning maximum profits to the huge corporations which make the
awful spectacle possible. When you watch a Saturday Night Live sketch,
you get the message that you are a piece of shit while having to sit
through beer commercials for the next dose of abuse and degradation.
We should expect much more from a movie.

Title
Review for Före stormen (2000)
Ali (Per Graffman), a cabdriver living in Sweden, thought he had left his
guerrilla past behind him 18 years ago, but it catches up with him in the
opening scenes of "Before the Storm". Addressing him as "Captain," a woman
fare (Nasrin Pakkho) knows not only who he is, but what he is capable of
doing. Unless he agrees to assassinate the Swedish manufacturer who has
been selling trucks that are converted into rocket launchers against their
people, her compatriots (and his formerly) will kill the wife and son that
he left behind. Although the film does not identify their nationality, it
is implicit that they are Kurds since they are being persecuted for their
language.
Ali has a new family in Sweden. Now married to a Swedish woman, they have
two teenaged daughters. The younger has a classmate named Leo (Emil
Odepark) who has a crush on her, but whose affections are not returned.
Poor Leo is spurned not only by her, but the rest of his classmates who
enjoy tormenting him as a "monkeyface". But none are as cruel as Danne
(Martin Wallström), an older boy who makes Leo's life a living hell. At
knifepoint, he forces Leo to march naked into the girl's locker-room to don
the panties of Ali's daughter, the girl he loves.
As with students in the American news, Leo decides to take matters into his
own hands. He steals his mother's 9 millimeter pistol (she is a police
officer) and lures Danne into a wooded area where he forces him to get down
on his knees and apologize. In the ensuing altercation, Leo shoots Danne in
the chest.
The remainder of the film focuses on the crossed paths of Ali and Leo. One
is fleeing from the law, particularly from his mother who has discovered a
missing bullet in her pistol's chamber. The other is fleeing from his duty
as assassin, coerced as it is. In a riveting scene, the two sit in Ali's
kitchen in the middle of the night. Just moments after warning Leo that he
must turn himself in (he can not run forever), Ali receives a phone call
from his blackmailers. They put his first wife on the line to plead for her
life. Overhearing this chilling conversation, Leo discovers that Ali is
also in the hands of fate. Both of these characters, longing for normalcy
and love, are wrenched into another, more frightful reality by
circumstances beyond their control. In one case, war in the Mideast. In the
other, a sadistic high school bully.
By making his two lead characters murderers, young first-time director Reza
Persa (born in Iran but living in Sweden since 1980) is confronted with the
challenge of making us empathize with decent characters doing indecent
things. As he told the audience after the showing, there is no greater
challenge facing an artist. Although some Arabs have criticized him for
stereotyping them as terrorists, he explained that most Swedes appreciate
the film for showing the powerful forces that can make people take
desperate actions. In addition, the film effectively confronts stereotypes
about the Swedes, although of the opposite sort. When the film debuted,
critics found it hard to believe that a Swedish schoolchild would kill a
bully in this fashion, but only three months ago such an event took place
for the first time in this bland, social-democratic country. Showing far
greater gullibility, some critics also questioned whether Swedish
manufacturers could be war profiteers. Evidently they never heard of Alfred
Nobel, who funded his annual prizes with money he made from the sale of
dynamite, a product he invented.

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
It is 1957. Home alone, the 10 year old Hogarth Hughes is eating
Twinkies and watching television, while his waitress mother is at
work. He is enrapt by a scene in a scary late-night science fiction
movie about brains crawling across a laboratory floor. Since reports
have been circulating about the arrival of a UFO into the ocean waters
near his small seacoast town of Rockwell, Maine, the self-reliant
Hogarth is prepared for nearly anything. When all of a sudden the
reception on the television begins to fade, he goes to the rooftop and
investigates. Somebody or something has taken a huge bite out the
antenna. After noticing immense tracks in the dirt leading away from
his house, he descends in the woods with a BB gun in hand to confront
what must be a space monster.
So begins a powerful animated film titled "The Iron Giant," based on a
novel by Ted Hughes, England's poet laureate, written in 1968. Hughes,
who died in 1998, wrote "The Iron Man" to comfort his young son after
the death of his mother, the poet Sylvia Plath, in 1963. It is about,
among other things, the persistence of life in the midst of death.
Surely enough he discovers an immense iron giant robot eating metal
parts from an electrical power station in the dead of night, as
languidly as a gorilla nibbling on vegetation. When the iron giant
accidentally touches a generator, he is jolted by a huge electrical
charge which threatens to kill it. Making a snap decision--one that
sets the plot in motion for the remainder of this great animated
film--Hogarth runs through falling metal and arcs of high-voltage
electricity to shut down the power. After the iron giant regains
consciousness, he follows Hogarth home. Although immensely powerful,
the giant is like a small child needing protection in an unfamiliar
setting. As it turns out, the iron giant is the source of the rumors
flying about Rockwell since it is he who has plunged into the ocean a
few days earlier and swum to shore. Wandering about the woods of rural
Maine, he has been subsisting on metal wherever he can find it--in
parked cars or power stations.
Hogarth soon learns that Kent Mansley, a government agent and the
villain of the movie, is on the tracks of the iron giant, since
anything un-American in 1957 is considered a threat to national
security, whether it comes from Russia or outer space. After
discovering that the giant is harmless unless attacked, Hogarth
becomes his best friend and protector. Hidden away in the barn next to
his house, the boy is teaching the robot the ways of the planet earth
mainly through comic books like Superman and Mad. As he turns through
their pages, we learn that their omnipresent theme is the threat of
nuclear war. In one story, Superman defends the planet earth against a
radioactive monster. The iron giant, who is slowly learning to speak,
tells Hogarth that he wants to be like Superman. At school, the threat
of nuclear war is every bit as real as it is in the comic books and in
science fiction movies. They watch a movie called "Duck and Cover"
that shows children how easy it is to survive a nuclear attack. Just
duck and cover.
Hogarth finds an unlikely ally in the local beatnik sculptor Dean, who
lives and works at a junkyard. He works there because he can use the
scrap iron in his "far out" sculpture. After Hogarth has introduced
him to the iron giant, Dean wastes no time putting him to work. He
directs the giant to stack old cars one on top of another in a
monumental sculpture. Those that aren't used in the artwork go
directly into the giant's stomach. Dean, who is the polar opposite of
Mansley, is a forerunner of the cultural and political changes that
would emerge in the 1960s. He was one of the rebels "who distributed
Supercommunist pamphlets in Union  Square weeping and undressing while
the sirens of Los Alamos wailed them down," as Allen Ginsberg put it
in the landmark poem "Howl".
This film has all the appeal of "ET" or "Terminator part two". The
myth of a child taking an extraterrestrial or dangerous monster under
his wing and teaching him the ways of his world is vastly alluring.
What gives "The Iron Giant" additional appeal is that this
relationship is set against the very real backdrop of global
annihilation in the 1950s, when the threat of all-out nuclear war was
very much on the mind of all children, including myself. Hogarth
Hughes was exactly the kind of animated feature character I could have
identified with, and one, I'm sure, that contemporary ten year olds,
both male and female, can identify with. The movie offers an
alternative to the sentimental pap of the Disney studio as well.
Instead of presenting challenges drawn from the world of fairy tales
with a "politically correct" overlay, director Brad Bird confronts the
real evil that lived and lives in American society. The voice of
Hogarth Hughes is done by 12 year old Elie Marienthal, while Harry
Connick Jr. is Dean and Christopher MacDonald is the government agent
Mansley.
Marxist discussion is at: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Title
Review for Cousin Bette (1998)
Nearly all of Balzac's novels dramatize Karl Marx's observation in the
Communist Manifesto that "The bourgeoisie has torn away from the
family its sentimental veil, and has reduced the family relation into
a mere money relation." Des McAnuff's film "Cousin Bette," based on
Balzac's novel of the same name, is faithful to both Balzac and Marx
on this score.
This is no bland and pretty costume drama in the Merchant-Ivory mold.
The aristocrats and the haut-bourgeoisie are repellent gargoyles in
McAnuff's film, just as they are in Balzac. The film is a gritty,
radical satire of bourgeois mores that constantly reminds us of the
price-tag attached to all human relations. McAnuff explains what drew
him to the Balzac novel:
"When it comes to choosing a project, I look for something that
illuminates my life and times. 'Cousin Bette' began to feel more and
more like a story about a large American city, where we have perhaps
some of the same social and political problems that Paris faced in the
nineteenth century...Paris was in a depression in the 1840s and no one
in fact saw the turmoil coming. Having gone through the riots in Los
Angeles, it began to feel remarkably similar. When I saw this link to
current times, that's when I really climbed aboard and started to
shape the story."
Cousin Bette (Jessica Lange) is a forty year old seamstress who works
backstage in a music hall. Her sister has just passed away and she
hopes to snag the wealthy grieving husband Hector Hulot (Hugh Laurie).
When he meets with her, he certainly seems to have this intention
since he speaks about the vacuum in his life and the need for someone
to look after his college-age daughter. To her disappointment, she
discovers that he is merely offering her a job as a housekeeper. This
blow to her self-esteem ratchets up her resentment against the world
one more notch. While she is the protagonist of the film, one can feel
no sympathy toward her or any of the other characters for that matter.
The key to the success of the film, and the novel it is based on, is
that it caters to our morbid curiosity. The cast of players, who are
all essentially corrupt and money-hungry, fascinate us like a bunch of
scorpions under glass.
We are introduced to Hulot's daughter Hortense (Kelly MacDonald) as
she is being propositioned by the superrich Crevel (Bob Hoskins), who
offers her 200,000 francs to look at her naked body. She turns him
down.
Another central character is the young, handsome fallen aristocrat
Wenceslas (Aden Young) who lives in poverty in the same rundown
tenement as Cousin Bette. He is trying rather unsuccessfully to launch
a career as a sculptor. At night he tiptoes into her apartment in
order to steal cheese from her rat-trap and sneak a drink of wine from
the bottle she keeps on a shelf. He is not aware that she has been
awake when he makes these nocturnal visits and, moreover, has fallen
in love with him.
One day Cousin Bette discovers Wenceslas unconscious in his flat,
where he has tried to kill himself by filling the room with fumes from
his coal-stove. She throws open the window and revives him. Then she
offers to subsidize his career, albeit in a modest fashion. She will
pay for his rent and his meals, but emphasizes that she will keep a
strict account of all sums advanced. Like Crevel, she is consumed with
love but knows that everything has a cash value as well.
The singer-dancer Jenny Cadine (Elisabeth Shue) rounds out the cast of
miscreants. In her spare time, she is courtesan to Hulot. We meet her
onstage as she is complaining that her costume does not show off her
best features. Cousin Bette, her seamstress, approaches her from
behind and cuts a large patch in the fabric covering her backside. She
then announces that everybody can now see the star performer's best
feature. Jenny looks at her naked ass and likes what she sees. From
that night on, she performs bare-assed.
After Wenceslas has become Cousin Bette's protégé, the young Hortense
decides to steal him away. After Bette discovers that the two have
become lovers, she confronts him in his studio. What about us, she
asks. He tells her that he will always love her as the mother in his
life. This rejection inspires her to take revenge against all who have
caused her misery and disappointment. Like Iago, she conspires behind
the scenes to set one character against another until they are all
ruined. In contradistinction to Othello, the major character in
Balzac's tale is the villain, not the hero. Since Balzac's cynical
world-view excludes heroism, this has an air-tight logic. Furthermore,
in some sense, villains are more interesting. Milton's Lucifer is one
of the great characters in literature. We remember him, not any of the
angels.
One of the greatest achievements of the film is the casting and the
way McAnuff directs his cast. You lose track of the associations you
have with the various actors in previous films and only know them as
the Balzac characters. Jessica Lange is perfect as the dark and
vengeful Bette. Hugh Laurie, best known for his Bertie Wooster on the
PBS series, brings the vain spendthrift aristocrat Hulot to life.
Hoskins has often played vulgarians, so his perfection as Crevel comes
as no surprise. What is a surprise, however, is Elisabeth Shue's Jenny
Cadine. Shue is best known for her role as another prostitute in
"Leaving Las Vegas." What she brings to the role of Jenny is a keen
sense of the class antagonism between her and Hulot, who pays for her
love. When he--or any other of her wealthy clients--can no longer pay
for her services, she instantly turns cold and haughty. As such, she
is the perfect illustration of Marx's dictum that capitalism has left
no other nexus between man and man than naked self-interest, than
callous "cash payment." By implication, the same thing is true of man
and woman.
What makes "Cousin Bette" exceptional cinema is the modernist
aesthetic vision of director Des McAnuff, who never worked in film
before. He is a two-time Tony Award-winner ("Tommy," "Big River") who
understood completely how to bring Balzac alive. He has entirely
rejected the temptation to romanticize 19th century France. Thus,
certain directorial decisions make perfect sense, among them the
decision to use cinematographer Andrzej Sekula, who worked previously
on "Pulp Fiction" and "Reservoir Dogs." Instead of the languid camera
work of an Ivory-Merchant film that dotes self-consciously on
wallpaper or petticoats, we get a hard-edged vision of the underbelly
of French society.
McAnuff was clear about the look he expected from Sekula:
"This film is about outsiders and insiders, about
contrasts...Visually, it was a question of finding a chateau for the
Hulots that was spacious and had that fading first Empire look,
reflecting the end of an age of abundance and plenty. Then, we wanted
to contrast that with Bette's neighborhood, a medieval city that was
suffering from the diseases of the early industrial revolution...We
wanted to avoid romanticizing the suffering of the people...We wanted
cobblestone streets, very narrow lanes, a sense of claustrophobia,
almost a rat's maze, full of smoke, coal dust and dung, alongside
spectacular eighteenth century architecture."
In other words, he wanted to convey sharp class distinctions.
The film concludes with fighting in the streets as the  revolution of
1848 erupts. The decadence of aristocrats and haut-bourgeoisie like
Hulot, Wenceslas and Crevel has finally brought the masses into the
streets. The most resolute section of the masses was the proletariat,
of whom Marx wrote the following in "Class Struggles in France
1848-1850":
"It is well known how the workers, with unexampled bravery and
ingenuity, without leaders, without a common plan, without means and,
for the most part, lacking weapons, held in check for five days the
army, the Mobile Guard, the Paris National Guard, and the National
Guard that streamed in from the provinces. It is well known how the
bourgeoisie compensated itself for the mortal anguish it suffered by
unheard -- of brutality, massacring over 3000 prisoners. The official
representatives of French democracy were steeped in republican
ideology to such an extent that it was only some weeks later that they
began to have an inkling of the significance of the June fight. They
were stupefied by the gunpowder smoke in which their fantastic
republic dissolved."
Balzac hated the bourgeoisie and workers equally. Only as the
industrial working-class became better organized politically and more
self-confident, did novelists such as Zola begin to champion its
cause. Balzac's importance is that he wrote brilliantly about the
social decay that capitalism breeds. Thus, he is a novelist who
remains very contemporary. As such, McAnuff's bitter, dark comedy
"Cousin Bette" does Balzac perfect justice.
(For Marxist discussion: //www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Title
Review for Riding the Rails (1997)
When Michael Uys and Lexy Lovell decided to make a documentary about
teenagers who rode the rails during the Great Depression, they placed
an ad in "Modern Maturity", the magazine of the American Association
of Retired People (AARP). To their astonishment, they received 3,000
moving and detailed replies. The film focuses on a group of nine men
and one woman who reminisce about their experience as hobos. Their
interviews are interspersed with archival footage from the 1930s and
they add up to a revealing portrait of how young people coped with the
ravages of unemployment.
"Riding the Rails" is not just about the hardships of riding in
boxcars, panhandling or living in shanty-towns. It is also about the
romance of the railroads. For many young people, including some from
affluent families, freight trains were an escape from the routines and
banality of small-town life. One interviewee says that "We thought it
was the magic carpet . . . romance, the click of the rails." This
fascination with trains persisted into the 1940s and 50s. Jack Kerouac
often hopped on freight trains when he wasn't tooling across Route 66
in his Hudson. He was fascinated with hobo life and saw this as an
expression of freedom and individuality. So do the interviewees in
"Riding the Rail" who are about as endearing a group of 70 and 80 year
olds that I have encountered in a film since Julia Reichert's 1983
documentary "Seeing Red." It is no coincidence that nearly all of the
former hobos eventually became involved with radical or trade union
politics.
For most of the interviewees, it was poverty that drove them to ride
the rails. They often got on a train headed in the direction where
they thought work was plentiful. They had the same sort of illusions
as the Okies in Steinbeck's "Grapes of Wrath." They soon discovered
that there were no jobs. When they got off a boxcar, they would be met
at the outskirts of a town by a sheriff who'd tell them, "We don't
have work for grown men with families. How do you expect us to find a
job for you?" Instead, they would often survive in hobo camps on the
outskirts of where they would eat every two or three days. They would
make forays into town and panhandle for nickels and dimes. The sight
of teen-aged beggars scandalized public opinion and was a primary
factor in the creation of the Civilian Conservation Corps (CCC), which
put tens of thousands of impoverished adolescents to work. It is a
sign of the times that the Clinton administration lacks the political
will to push for these sorts of programs.
The documentary includes scenes from William Wellman's "Wild Boys of
the Open Road," a 1933 feature that is being shown with "Riding the
Rails" in New York City's Cinema Village. "Wild Boys of the Open Road"
is a remarkable film. It depicts the hobo life of two teenage boys and
one girl in shockingly unsentimental terms. One of the boys loses a
leg in a rail yard accident and the girl is raped by a railroad bull
(cop). This is not John Ford's "Grapes of Wrath", with its burnished,
sentimental tableaus of life on the open road. It is a film that has
more in common with Bunuel's "El Grito" or Hector Babenco's "Pixote",
films that depict the suffering of poor kids on the streets of Mexico
and Brazil in the most unflinching manner. Perhaps the only
explanation for the frankness of "Wild Boys of the Open Road" is that
it was made before any of the New Deal major social programs had been
implemented, including the CCC. Wellman must have been appalled by the
misery of America's children and made a movie without illusions. It is
too bad that so few films come out of Hollywood that have the same
courage to depict the suffering of our own children today.

Title
Review for Big Clock, The (1948)
Best known for his study of the New York anti-Stalinist intellectuals
grouped around the 1930s Partisan Review, University of Michigan
professor and Solidarity activist Alan Wald has been writing about the
intersection of art and politics for over two decades. He spoke last
week at the Brecht Forum on the film and literary noir genre. The talk
was based on a chapter from his forthcoming book on popular culture
and concentrated on the career of long-time CP member and writer
Kenneth Fearing, who died in 1961, and whose novel "The Big Clock" and
the film based on it are classic noir. I will highlight points that
Alan made and then make some of my own on "The Big Clock," which I
viewed the following day.
Fearing was part of the left wing constellation of writers grouped
around the John Reed Clubs in the 1920s, many of whom identified with
or joined the CPUSA. He was one of the first to break with early
cultural traditions of the left, which owed much to literary
romanticism. To illustrate this point, Alan described an encounter
between Fearing and Floyd Dell, another left-wing poet, at a party in
1927. As was the custom of the time, Dell invited Fearing to recite
some verse, to which he would then respond with his own recitation.
Fearing, a heavy drinker in the Dashiell Hammett mold, spat out "Oh
Shit" to Dell and walked into the kitchen to prepare another cocktail.
That was Fearing's way of telling Dell that the troubadour style was
passé.
Defining the noir style has been a preoccupation of many leftwing
cultural historians. This is not surprising since noir not only
reflects the hard-boiled depression-era sensibility but the sense of
disillusionment that followed it during the post-WWII period. While
much of noir art was produced by left-wingers, it very rarely captured
the sense of optimism and group solidarity that defined the Popular
Front cultural ethos. While many of the CP'ers who wrote noir
screenplays obviously believed that Ben Shahn and Mike Gold were doing
the right thing, they either were prevented from producing such work
in Hollywood or--more interestingly--consciously chose to depict shady
and economically marginal characters cut off from society instead. So
defining the link between such works as "Blue Gardenia", "Force of
Evil" and "The Big Clock"--all written by CP'ers--and the politics of
their creators becomes a real challenge, which Alan rose to in his
lecture.
The first question he spoke to was the role of women in such films and
novels, where the sexist "femme fatale" character practically defines
the genre. While accepting this as a liability that marks much of the
noir genre, Wald pointed to another aspect which he called "feminist
femme fatale". The most important example of this is found in Vera
Caspari's "Laura". Caspari was a CP'er who moved away from the party
after the Hitler-Stalin pact. "Laura" consumed much of her energies in
this period, which she felt was a necessary escape valve from the
intense feelings of disillusionment the pact brought on. The movie,
best known now for its haunting title melody, depicts a strong-willed
woman trying to carve out an identity for herself. After she is
murdered, a working class detective tracks down the perpetrator in a
decadent and morally-corrupt group of upper-class society types.
Wald also considers Afro-Marxists a much more important contributor to
the genre than is ordinarily given credit for. Since these works
usually do not include major black characters, except for what is
acknowledged as the swan song of the genre--"Odds Against
Tomorrow"--this might seem open to debate. Wald cites the fiction of
Chester Himes and Willard Motley as classic examples. Interestingly,
Motley only wrote about white ethnics in his novels, such as "Knock on
Any Door", but it is widely understood that such characters were
stand-ins for black Americans. Wald also includes Richard Wright's
"Native Son", which inspired a fairly awful movie noteworthy only for
its inclusion of the author in the lead role.
Another important building-block in the noir edifice is supplied by
"Tough Jews." Wald reminded the audience that many of the Communists
who wrote noir fiction and screenplays were Jews from Brooklyn and the
Lower East Side of Manhattan who were accustomed to seeing Jewish
boxers and gangsters in the 1920s. In this era, not only were the
greatest boxers Jewish but organized crime was led by Jews as well,
including the hit-men of Murder Incorporated. Often left-wing
screenwriters such as Abraham Polonsky and actors like John Garfield
belonged to gangs as youngsters or even had criminal records. This
accounts for the hard-boiled quality of much of their work and
performances.
Turning to "The Big Clock", Wald suggests that the key to
understanding such work is that it actually predates the Popular Front
esthetic and owes much to the urban naturalism that was taking shape
during the turn-of-the-century. It would hearken back to earlier
traditions such as the fiction of Theodore Dreiser. The culture clash
between Fearing and Popular Front commissars sometimes could not be
repressed. John Henry Lawson denounced the "The Big Clock" as trash
and probably regarded its creator Kenneth Fearing as less than
stalwart Communist material. Fearing, like Hammett, was a life-long
drunk who had a string of broken marriages and relationships in tow.
So with these remarks serving as a backdrop, I sat down to watch the
1948 "The Big Clock" with great eagerness. Here are some observations.
Like most noir films, much of "The Big Clock" is rather musty. In most
cases, this is unobjectionable, especially for those of us who
appreciate the charm of vintage films. What does not sit well is the
character of Earl Janoth, who is a moustache-twirling villain with
obvious homosexual mannerisms. Played by Charles Laughton (in real
life, a left-winger), the overweight homosexual was frequently used as
a stock figure in the noir body of work. Sidney Greenstreet in
"Maltese Falcon" is another prime example. 
Janoth is in sharp contrast to the hero George Stroud, played by Ray
Milland, a well-built, square-jawed muscular man with a wife and young
son. The conflict between Janoth and Stroud unfolds as the former, a
Hearst-like boss of a media empire, directs Stroud to forgo a vacation
in order to make himself available for a circulation drive. Since
Stroud, a character anticipating the figures depicted in Juliet
Schor's "The Overworked American", has not had a vacation in many
years, he decides to quit rather than oblige Janoth.
After turning in his resignation, Stroud is joined at the bar where he
is celebrating by Janoth's mistress, a femme fatale who both despises
but is financially dependent on the magnate in true Dreiserian
fashion. That evening Janoth kills her in a fit of rage at her
apartment, where Stroud himself made an earlier but innocent
appearance. The remainder of the film depicts Janoth's attempts to
frame Stroud.
As the police and Janoth's henchmen close in on Stroud in corporate
headquarters, the image of the Big Clock dominates the scenes. This is
the largest and most sophisticated clock ever built which Janoth
insists on being 100 percent accurate, since it is a symbol of his
power. Located in the lobby of the building, it is the high spot of
tours. When Stroud seeks refuge inside the housing that encloses the
clock's inner mechanism, he accidentally bumps against a lever that
shuts it down. Up in his penthouse office, Janoth recoils from the
sight of a satellite clock whose hands has stopped. Somebody go find
out what's wrong with the clock, he barks.
This reminded me of Fritz Lang's 1920s "Metropolis" which very likely
inspired the vision of corporate control in "The Big Clock"
"Metropolis'' employed vast sets, 25,000 extras and astonishing
special effects to create two worlds: the great city of Metropolis,
with its stadiums, skyscrapers and expressways in the sky, and the
subterranean workers' city, where the clock face shows 10 hours to
cram another day into the workweek. The city is powered by an
underground plant, where workers strain to move heavy dial hands back
and forth. What they're doing makes no logical sense, but visually the
connection is obvious: They are controlled like hands on a clock.
Close to two other left-wing émigrés Bertolt Brecht and Hanns Eisler,
Lang eventually moved to Hollywood where his German expressionist
esthetics helped to influence film noir, often perceived--incorrectly
in my opinion--as a specifically American phenomenon. Although Lang
adapted to the Hollywood prejudices against overtly political films
with messages, he never was happy with these constrictions.
Marxist discussion is at: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Title
Review for Mépris, Le (1963)
Carlo Ponti and Joseph E. Levine, the producers of Jean-Luc Godard's
"Contempt", were eager to make a commercial film that would appeal to
a broad audience, while simultaneously exploiting their "edgy" young
director's notoriety. They were interested in a "product" that would
sell both in art-houses and in shopping malls. Godard resisted them
every step of the way and turned the film itself into a brilliant
satire on Hollywood stupidity and greed, including the bottom-line
mentality of his producers.
"Contempt" is about the making of a new version of Homer's Odyssey. A
crude and venal American producer named Jerry Prokosch (Jack Palance)
has arrived in Rome to assemble a crew that can realize his new vision
of the epic. While the director Fritz Lang--played brilliantly by
himself--wants to film ancient Greek sculptures of the gods to
accompany the action, Prokosch dictates that there should be nude
mermaids instead. Joseph E. Levine himself had achieved some success
in Hollywood making trashy versions of Greek and Roman myths. These
inevitably featured body-builders playing gods and heroes, scantily
dressed actresses and the most ridiculous sorts of plots. The analogy
between Prokosch's vision of the Odyssey and the producer's prior
efforts could not have been lost on Levine. Tensions ran high on the
set of "Contempt", according to press reports of the time.
Prokosch hires a young novelist and Communist Party member Paul Javel
(Michel Piccoli) to crank out a screenplay that would cater to popular
tastes. Javel is only too happy to please the Hollywood producer who
can pay him the money he needs to finish the work on his new
apartment. In the opening scenes of the film we observe Paul making
love to his wife Camille played by Bridgette Bardot in their bedroom.
She asks him "Do you think my feet are beautiful?" and the camera pans
in on her feet. As she repeats the question about her thighs, breasts
and buttocks, the camera dutifully and clinically pans in on each body
part. The scene is studiously anti-erotic.
Just as Prokosch instructed Lang to include plenty of nude mermaids,
Levine and Ponti had urged Godard to show the sex-goddess Bardot
unclothed. It was good for the box-office they told him. Godard, ever
the rebel, gave them the nudity they wanted but made it so antiseptic
as to subvert their intentions.
In a long scene that constitutes the entire middle section of the
film, Paul and Camille have a marital squabble that leads to their
separation. Paul believes that sexual jealousy has sparked the fight.
In the preceding scene, Prokosch has made a play for Camille while she
has caught him in the act of fondling Prokosch's beautiful young
assistant. But it is not sexual jealousy that is the cause of their
estrangement. It is rather her loss of respect for him as an artist.
The film gives Godard plenty of opportunity to take knocks at the
Carlo Pontis and Joseph E. Levines of the world. Prokosch tells his
screen-writer Paul and his director Fritz Lang that "Whenever I hear
the word 'culture,', I reach for my checkbook." This is an allusion to
Nazi culture minister Joseph Goebbels' famous remark about hearing the
word "culture" and reaching for his gun. The background to this is
interesting since Joseph Goebbels offered Lang the job of supervising
German film production in 1933. He responded by fleeing into exile--a
choice (and true story) that Godard relates in the film.
For Godard, the comparison between Hollywood and Nazi Germany is of
real significance. In 1963, when the film was made, the United States
had not only achieved global economic and military dominance, it also
had begun to enforce its cultural standards on the rest of the world
as well. Godard had become disillusioned by the crisis facing both the
American and European film industries. The American studio system was
collapsing and could no longer support the creative vision of
"auteurs" like John Ford or Howard Hawks who had strongly influenced
French "nouvelle vague" criticism and film-making.
Godard's had a love-hate relationship for American popular culture.
Although he clearly despised the sort of commercialism that Joseph E.
Levine represented, there were continual reminders of his affection
for its icons. Paul Javel wears a fedora and smokes cigarettes during
the entire film, even while bathing, because as he tells his wife, he
wants to look like Dean Martin in "Some Came Running". Godard even
considered casting Frank Sinatra and Kim Novak in the roles of Paul
and Camille at one point. His hatred was toward the moguls in
Hollywood, not working professionals like himself.
"Contempt", above all, is a film about irony. The irony of a Communist
screen-writer turning out commercial schlock. The irony of his sex
kitten wife Camille rejecting him for his failure as an artist rather
than as a lover. Perhaps the least ironic figure in the film is Fritz
Lang himself who Godard had a deep respect for. The fact that Lang's
heroic period as a director was of the 1920s and 1930s did not
diminish his stature in Godard's eyes. But Godard could not completely
block out what had happened to Lang, even in his own film: "It's
always a bit sad when I see Lang in the film. He was touched that the
young filmmakers admired him, but it was mostly because he needed
money that he accepted."
This sense of disillusionment, of betrayed hopes, of contempt for
oneself for being part of the capitalist nexus is distinctly modern.
Godard, more than any film-maker, introduced this mood into the
culture of the 1960s. He influenced a wide range of artists, from the
sublime (Martin Scorsese comes to mind--he is responsible for the
release of this film to the public for the first time in 30 years) to
the ridiculous (Quentin Tarentino). The optimistic and socially-minded
films of the 1930 and 40s were no longer possible since there was no
historical agency capable of being the protagonist. The "Grapes of
Wrath" could no longer be made. By the same token, the bitter "noir"
films of the 1950s had run their course as well. Their
anti-heroes--gangsters, drifters, cheats--were no longer relevant
since the urban setting that provided their milieu had begun to
disappear. Gone were the lonely hotel rooms looking out at blinking
neon lights. They were replaced by sun-drenched suburban tracts and
swimming-pools.
Godard's film is a masterpiece. Currently it is being shown at the
Film Forum in New York City, but there is every likelihood that it
will appear on the art theater circuit. It is not to be missed.

Title
Review for Carla's Song (1996)
I feel betrayed by Ken Loach, one of my favorite film-makers. His
"Carla's Song" not only fails as art, it also fails to convey the
political significance of the Nicaraguan revolution, its purported
subject. Since Loach's "Land and Freedom" dealt so trenchantly with
the politics of the Spanish Civil War, it is a major disappointment to
find politics so poorly served in his Nicaragua movie.
The fault is in Paul Laverty's screenplay. He is a Glasgow lawyer who
worked with human rights organizations in Nicaragua in the mid-80s.
This sort of involvement does not necessarily mean that you are going
to dwell on the Nicaraguan people as victims of atrocity.
Unfortunately in Laverty's case this is the singular message he
conveys.
This comes across most clearly in his strategic esthetic decision to
make the sad eponymous Carla the central character of the film. It is
1987 and we find ourselves in bleak, rainy Glasgow. There we discover
Carla (Oyanka Cabezas) on a sidewalk dancing to a boom-box. She begs
for change after her performances. She somehow became detached from a
Nicaraguan dance troupe touring the British Isles and is now barely
functional. She is rescued by George, a completely apolitical bus
driver who soon falls in love with her. He brings this wounded bird
back to a friend who will shelter her in a spare room in his
apartment. Robert Carlyle, who plays George, also played a junkie
construction worker in Loach's great "Riff-Raff," as well as the
psychopath Begby in Danny Boyle's "Trainspotting."
Shortly after taking up residence in her new quarters, Carla cuts her
wrists. After George takes her to the hospital, he discovers from a
doctor that this is her second suicide attempt in six weeks. She is
apparently suffering from post-traumatic stress. As he sits by her
bedside, George can not resist taking a look at her medical record. It
states that a horrible battlefield incident has almost destroyed her
psychologically. This incident not only had a scarring effect on her,
it also had lasting damage on her lover Antonio.
In flashbacks, we see the contras mounting an attack on Antonio, Carla
and a group of young artists and teachers who are traveling by truck
in the northern mountains of Nicaragua. They are part of a literacy
campaign that the contras have targeted. The attack does even worse
damage to Antonio than it does to Carla, but we do not know exactly
what it is. This mystery serves as a central dramatic device in the
movie and it is not a very good one. Since we do not encounter Antonio
as a key player in the drama, it is difficult to have great feelings
about his plight. He is a symbol of Nicaraguan suffering and symbols
work far better in poetry than they do in movies.
Nearly half of the movie deals with the love affair of George and
Carla. They talk about everything but politics. Nicaragua only
functions as a faraway place where something terrible happened to her
and her lover Antonio. What a contrast to "Land and Freedom," where
the two lovers are a Communist and a POUM member, who live for
politics. Carla, the Sandinista militant, does not seem to be much of
a politico herself. Her defense of the revolution amounts to a
statement that the government is trying to help the people and bad
people are trying to stop it.
Laverty has obviously made the decision that middle-class audiences in
the wealthy countries will only swallow the bitter pill of Nicaragua's
suffering if it has a sugar coating: George and Carla's romance. At a
certain point, George decides that their love can never be consummated
as long as she is still uncertain about Antonio's fate. Therefore, he
decides to fly back to Nicaragua with her and search for Antonio.
Thus the second act of the movie commences and it is where things
begin to derail completely. Loach has the look of Nicaragua in 1987
nailed down, but there is not much substance beneath this. Filmed in
Esteli, "Carla's Song," is highly faithful to the period and the
place, as anybody who visited Nicaragua in this period can testify.
The Sandinista soldiers are constantly on the move as they seek out in
the contras in the countryside. The human rights activists bustle
about and convene meetings to come up with documentation on contra
atrocities.
Alas, what is missing is exactly what made Nicaragua memorable, namely
political conviction. For the entire time these characters spend in
Nicaragua, nobody discusses politics. The main topic of conversation
is what has happened to Antonio. The movie is not really that much
about Nicaraguan revolution, as it is the search for a missing person.
George and Carla roam from town to town asking "Have you seen
Antonio?" If Laverty had devoted some energy to the search for the
soul of the Nicaraguan people, then the movie might have been
interesting. Alas, this was beyond him.
In one of the most glaring false notes in the film, we finally
encounter somebody who knows the whereabouts of Antonio. That is
Bradley, played by Scott Glenn, a member of Witness for Peace. Glenn
is a thoroughly unlikable character and one can only wonder how the
human rights veteran Laverty could come up with such an unflattering
portrait. Perhaps some misgivings about the whole tarnished Nicaraguan
experience might have affected Laverty's judgement. We are living in a
period when it is awfully easy to bash the Sandinista cause.
In any case, Bradley seems to have very little interest in politics.
He thrives on gonzo brinksmanship and goes into the most dangerous
parts of the countryside to document contra atrocities. When he sits
down to have a beer with George, he stresses how dangerous it is and
warns him that he might shit in his pants if he gets close to the
shooting. Suffice it to say, that no staff worker with Witness for
Peace ever made macho displays like this. What motivated them was a
religious belief in human rights and a broadly defined sympathy for
Nicaragua's social revolution. We eventually discover that Bradley had
been a CIA operative in Honduras who had become disgusted with what he
was doing and went over to "the other side." This information is
simply revealed by Laverty's screenplay without any dramatic
background into Bradley's character. As such, it comes across as sheer
nonsense.
Someday somebody will make the definitive movie about Nicaragua and
they will not have to rely on specious devices such as a love affair
between one of "us" and the "other." Nicaraguans are capable of
telling their own story. A movie based on Omar Cabezas' memoir "Fire
in the Mountains" could not miss. Cabezas was a guerrilla who gave up
everything to fight against the Somoza dictatorship. When he is not
describing a fire-fight with the enemy, he is reminiscing about all
the things he has left behind and misses desperately: the food, the
drink, the parties, the sex. Since Nicaraguans are some of the most
joyous people on the face of the planet, this part of the story has
added poignancy. It is too bad that Loach chose such a depressing and
inaccurate story, since there are so many better ones available.

Title
Review for Faute ŕ Voltaire, La (2000)
When we first saw "Lonely are the Brave" in 1962, my fellow Bard College
students and I found it possible to appreciate the film on two levels. It
was similar to Sam Peckinpah's "Ride the High Country" and other films
meditating on cowboy as beloved anachronism. This cowboy is a symbol
confronting all the new forces--the automobile, barbed-wire,
etc.--impinging on the last bastion of freedom, the old west.
In the opening scene of "Lonely are the Brave," we see Jack Burns (Kirk
Douglas) stretched out in front of a campfire with his horse by his side.
His restful contemplation of the awesome beauty of the New Mexico high
country is then interrupted by the raucous sound of a squadron of military
jets flying in formation overhead.
On another level the film seemed to evoke some of the beat generation
literature that many of us had read as high school students. In novels and
poems hearkening back to Thoreau's "Walden Pond," the beats rejected
civilization and embraced the simpler, freer and more rustic world of the
ranch hand, hobo or forest ranger. These were the sorts of characters who
cropped up in Kerouac's novels and found particular expression in the life
and work of Gary Snyder, the Buddhist poet who saw the Pacific Northwest
forests as a sanctuary from the corporate greed and mindlessness of the
Eisenhower era.
Now--nearly 40 years later--that I have learned the full story behind the
making of "Lonely are the Brave," the beat generation associations not only
become more meaningful, I also understand the importance of the film to the
radical movement since it brought together two disparate strands of the
American left: the screenplay was by Dalton Trumbo, one of the greatest
blacklisted writers in Hollywood, while the screenplay itself was based on
one of Edward Abbey's anarchist/deep ecology masterpieces, "The Brave Cowboy."
The driving force behind the movie came from Kirk Douglas, who was one of
the first to challenge the blacklist by insisting that Dalton Trumbo write
the screenplay for "Spartacus" only 3 years earlier in 1958. Douglas, who
often co-starred in mindless beefcake spectacles with Burt Lancaster, was
not at all like the characters he played in films. He was the son of a
Russian Jewish ragman from the Lower East Side and a product like so many
in the entertainment industry of the vast cultural and social forces
embodied in the New Deal radicalization. While never a Communist himself,
he believed that the blacklist was evil and put his reputation on the line
by standing up for Trumbo. (Lancaster was not what he appeared as well. In
real life, he was bisexual and something of a radical.)
After a couple of years tending sheep, Jack Burns has come to town to break
his old friend Paul out of jail. Paul is a scholar about to be transferred
to a penitentiary to begin serving a two year for running a modest
underground railroad for undocumented workers from Mexico.
Since the only way he can free Paul is by becoming a prisoner himself, he
goes to town to find a saloon where booze and trouble often go together. He
is not disappointed. As soon as he takes a seat in one such establishment
to begin enjoying a bottle of whiskey with a beer chaser, a one-armed man
hurls an empty bottle at his head. In keeping with a innate sense of fair
play, Burns uses one arm to fight the man in a lusty barroom brawl that
honors the best traditions of the Western film.
After he is arrested, he finds himself in the holding pen with Paul where
he lays out his escape plan. With the two hacksaws he has smuggled inside
his boots, the two should be able to break out before morning arrives. Paul
demurs. He has a wife and a young son. The sentence for jail break in New
Mexico is 5 years. He would prefer to serve out his term and return to a
normal life. While a jail break might deliver freedom in the short run, it
also would sentence him and his family to a life on the run. 
Although Jack can not persuade him to break out, he himself has no qualms.
With the assistance of Paul and other prisoners, he cuts through the bars
to the street below. He then returns to Paul's house where he has left his
horse. From there, he heads toward the mountains, beyond which Mexico and
freedom await.
>From this point, the main action of the film takes place, pitting the lone
resourceful cowboy against a posse made up of local lawmen and a helicopter
deployed by the same airforce base whose jets disturbed his peace in the
opening scene of the movie. In charge of the whole operation is Sheriff
Monty Johnson (Walter Matthau) who seems to harbor a secret desire to see
the prisoner escape. This is understandable since Johnson, and most of the
audience watching the film, probably felt trapped by American civilization
in the early 1960s. This world was described by Gary Snyder in the
following terms in the poem "Front Lines":
Although we identify with Jack Burns's bid for freedom, there is a
foreboding sense that it will not be successful. As he climbs up the
mountain with his horse in tow, we feel that he will be captured at any
moment. This climb might have reminded many college students of the Myth of
Sisyphus that Albert Camus had interpreted as a symbol of the existential
fate of modern man. In this Greek myth the hero pushes a boulder up a hill
for all eternity. Just as he is about to reach the summit and freed of his
burden, the boulder comes tumbling down on him. For Camus, this represents
the failure of 20th century man to achieve deliverance from the oppressive
social and economic forces that control him. Even ideologies like Marxism
that promised freedom only served to erect new barriers.
Although the film resonates with such overarching philosophical concerns,
you have to turn to Abbey's novel to find their full expression, especially
the scene in which Jack explains his decision to break jail to Paul's wife
Jerry.
Burns ate heartily; a touch of egg adorned his beard. "I can go north, west
or south. Winters comin so I guess I'll go south: Chihuahua or maybe
Sonora, dependin on how things look."
"I dunno. Just live, I guess." He swabbed his plate with a piece of bread.
"I like Mexico-it's a good clean honest sorta country. I have friends there."
"But Jack-" Jerry hesitated. "You'll be back, won't you?"
"Sure. When I'm nothin but a face on the postoffice wall I'll come
a-sneakin back. You'll see me comin down across the mesa out there some
evening when things are peaceful."
"Don't talk to me like that. You know you can't go on like this-you're in
the Twentieth Century now."
"I don't tune my life to the numbers on a calendar."
"That's ridiculous, Jack. You're a social animal, whether you like it or
not. You've got to make some concessions-or they'll hunt you down like a...
like a... What do people hunt down nowadays?"
"Coyotes," Burns said. "With cyanide guns." He finished his coffee and
wiped his mouth. "I better get a move on." 
---
Another important distinction between the novel and the film is that both
Paul and Jack are self-professed anarchists in the novel. Although Jack is
not prone to discuss politics, it is clear that his political beliefs
underpin his unquenchable desire for personal freedom. His friend Paul is
much more the ideologue, who is in jail not for harboring undocumented
workers but for refusing to register with the draft in 1948. Despite having
served in the military during WWII, both Paul and Jack feel that a
peacetime draft is the first step toward militarizing American society.
They were right, of course.
Abbey's anarchistic defense of personal freedom and pristine wilderness
made him a hero to the deep ecology movement, especially the wing that used
sabotage against the bulldozers and other mechanized instruments of
"development." His 1975 novel "The Monkey Wrench Gang" amounted to a
manifesto of Earth First activism. To defend the American West against a
Big Government/Big Business, a cabal of rugged individualists choose to
throw a monkey wrench into the machinery creating roads, dams, bridges and
other dubious symbols of civilization.
This movement continues to this day and makes up a substantial part of the
anti-WTO protests that reverberate out of Seattle. On reflection, the
anarchists appear to evoke certain themes found in Abbey's literature
beyond a hatred for out-of-control development. Namely, they seem to be in
love with the notion of the beautiful loser embodied in Jack Burns's
Sisyphean bid for freedom. Anarchism, unlike Marxism, seems less interested
in strategies for victory but more in dramatic gestures that evoke personal
refusal to go along with the status quo, no matter the price. For
anarchists, key historical events seem to be more about defeat than
victory. While Marxists commemorate October 1917, the anarchists are
fixated on the defeat of the Kronstadt rebellion or the Spanish Republic.
(This is something of a mystery to me since I believe that socialism must
be built on victories rather than defeat. In months to come I plan to
explore some of these questions as they relate more directly to anarchist
ideology.)
The other thing to keep in mind is that the deep ecology movement's pursuit
of aboriginal purity has led it to sometimes embrace dubious notions
bordering on xenophobia. While Abbey, who played a bit part as a cop in
"Lonely are the Brave", seemed to have no objection to Paul being
transformed from an anarchist draft resister into a comrade of undocumented
workers, he would eventually take an entirely different attitude toward
immigration issues. He wrote, "It would be wise for us as American citizens
to consider calling a halt to the mass influx of even more millions of
hungry, ignorant, unskilled, culturally, generally impoverished people."
This kind of anarchism seems to fit in neatly with the anti-immigration
agenda of such mainstream outfits as the Sierra Club and the Worldwatch
Institute.
Finally, it is worth considering how the logic of the lone rebel can be
driven to the extreme when detached from underlying questions of class.
After all, the plot of Sylvester Stallone's "First Blood" has many
similarities with "Lonely are the Brave." After Rambo breaks out of jail,
he manages not only to avoid capture by a posse, he shoots down a
helicopter in a scene that is practically stolen from the original. With
Alexander Cockburn's flirtation with the militias, these sorts of questions
take on a genuine immediacy.

Title
Review for Bakha satang (2000)
Even if it were not a great film, "Peppermint Candy" would be worth seeing
just as a guide to the dramatic changes in post-dictatorship South Korea.
While ostensibly a Citizen Kane type morality tale about an evil man, it is
really a mirror held up to a country whose two main pillars were
military/police brutality and worship of mammon.
A group of people in their forties are at a reunion picnic ot the bank of a
river beneath a railway bridge. Into their midst wanders a man in a
business suit who is either drunk or demented, or both. Soon they remember
that he is Yongho, a fellow worker from 20 years ago. After encouraging him
to take part in their gaiety, he begins to shriek and howl during a Karaoke
performance. He climaxes this act by jumping into the river with his
business suit on, slapping at the water like a madman. Then he mounts the
railroad bridge, where he stands in the middle of the tracks awaiting a
train that might come barreling out of a tunnel at any moment. Ignoring
their calls to come down to safety, he finally meets an oncoming train with
the cry, "I'm going back."
In a series of flashbacks, we do go back with Yongho and discover what has
driven him to suicide. His "Rosebud" is nothing less than the social role
imposed by South Korean society in its rise to "success" in the post 1980s.
"Peppermint Candy" is mainly an attempt to rip the pleasant facade off this
image. 
Yongho has decided to kill himself for two reasons. As the president of a
small company wrecked on the shoals of the recent economic crisis, he has
no other options. We learn through the most immediate flashback that he is
living in a shack and can not afford the price of a cup of coffee. With the
last little bit of his disposable income, he has bought a pistol. Before
shooting himself, he ponders over who he will take with him. The list
appears endless. In reality, it is the system that is at fault. He is also
ready to kill himself for the pain he has inflicted on others, both those
close to him and those who have wandered into his murderous path as soldier
and cop.
Each flashback is preceded by camera shots of a train speeding along the
South Korean countryside played in reverse. As people and animals walk
backward along the track, we travel back in time to find out how Yongho
went wrong.
Before becoming a businessman, he learn that he was a cop. In 1987 the cops
have apprehended a student leader who is taken back to the station-house to
be tortured. They want him to divulge the name of a leading pro-democracy
activist. Yongho, the most sadistic and experienced cop, holds the
student's head under water while wearing an impassive, almost bored,
expression on his face.
It wasn't always this easy. In 1984 when he was a rookie cop, he was
initiated into the art of torture. After a trade unionist prisoner shits on
him during a session, he rushes into the bathroom to wash himself off.
While peeing, another more seasoned cop casually mentions to him that he
will not be able to forget the smell. That is what "Peppermint Candy" is
about mostly, a man learning how, but never successfully so, to get over
the smell.
Peppermint candy is something that Yongho is especially fond of. His first
love is Sunim, who works in a candy factory. When he is in the army in
1980, she sends him candy to remind him of home and her love. One night his
company is rousted from bed in the middle of the night for some sort of
mysterious engagement. The sergeant abuses the men, calling them "bitches,"
as they struggle to get their gear together. When Yongho's peppermints pour
out of his knapsack, the sergeant punches and kicks him because candy is
not allowed.
The soldiers are dispatched to Kwangju, where students and workers have
been protesting for democracy. Yongho, a raw recruit, kills a young student
who is not part of the protests. She has wandered into the confrontation,
just trying to make her way home. Besides this young woman, every other
woman he knows on more intimate terms is treated badly by Yongho who treats
the opposite sex as objects to be fucked and then ignored.
When we finally arrive at 1979, we discover an entirely different Yongho at
the banks of the river, where the original picnic took place. He is a shy
young man in love with nature who presents Sunim with a flower that he has
picked from the banks. When he sits beneath the railroad bridge, tears come
to his eyes perhaps because he is overwhelmed by the beauty that surrounds
him. Like Citizen Kane, this kind of innocence will be stolen from him as
he becomes part of the dominant culture in Korean society.
NY critics have had some trouble connecting South Korea with the individual
Yongho. The program notes at the New Directors/New Film series state: "In
epic style, it covers the dissolution of a man and the development of a
nation." It would be more accurately worded: "the simultaneous dissolution
of a man and a nation." The NY Times warns that "a political dimension to
Yongho's malaise is evident, but also, for one not intimately familiar with
recent South Korean history, hard to grasp." Perhaps the critic suffers
from relying on the NY Times coverage on South Korea, which goes a long way
to explaining why things are hard to grasp. The systematic brutality
depicted in the film never made its way to the front pages of the
newspaper, which was much more interested in "economic miracle" and the
dictatorship's support for anti-Communist initiatives in the region.
"Peppermint Candy" was directed and written by Lee Chang Dong and stars Sol
Kyung Gu as Yongho in the most impressive acting performance that I have
witnessed this year. In the unlikely event that "Peppermint Candy" is
released for general distribution, it is not to be missed. 

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey) enjoys all the outward trappings of
middle-class success in the aptly but ironically titled film "American
Beauty": a beautiful wife named Carolyn (Annette Bening) with her own
real-estate business and a teenage daughter with no obvious flaws. But
his life is joyless. His sole pleasure seems to be masturbating in the
shower each morning, an act that he keeps secret from his wife with
whom he no longer has sexual relations.
Their life is filled with empty rituals. They sit in a well-appointed
dining room each evening trading insults over their meal, while the
strains of schmaltzy arrangements of Rogers and Hammerstein show tunes
are heard on the stereo in utter contrast to the acrimony at the
table. Sexual tension would explain most of the bickering between
husband and wife. Their daughter Jane (Thora Burch) has no use for
either of them as well, but holds her father in greater contempt for
his remoteness. When he makes clumsy attempts to bond with her, she
recoils in disgust.
A series of events will soon destroy any illusions that they had in
normal family life. Lester has a meeting with a personnel manager
whose task it is to figure out what people are contributing to the
media corporation that employs them. Everybody, including Lester, is
supposed to turn in a one page summary of what their job
responsibilities consist of--presumably those whose summaries seem
superfluous to the operation of the corporation will become
superfluous themselves. A spark of rebellion prompts Lester to tell
the manager that this is just a thinly disguised downsizing plot. This
initial meeting leads to mounting confrontations with the corporate
world that sustains him and his empty lifestyle.
Later that week the Burnhams go to see their daughter perform in an
absurdly choreographed cheerleader dance number during half-time at a
high-school basketball game. He fixates on Angela (Mena Suvari), the
sexually precocious best friend of his daughter, who picks up on his
interest later that evening in the parking lot of the high school.
>From that point on she finds excuses to drop by the Burnham household
where she knows that Lester will leer at her. Their sexual flirtations
disgust his daughter.
His wife is oblivious to all this. Her only interest in life is
selling real estate. In one of the most powerful scenes in the film,
she is depicted feverishly cleaning a house early in the morning to
make it attractive to prospective buyers. Her entire day is then spent
with customers telling her that the house is unattractive. At the end
of the day, with the house unsold, she collapses in tears. Selling
houses is the only pleasure she gets out of life, an act analogous to
her husband's masturbation.
Into their tortured lives enters a young man, who offers Lester
liberation from boredom and oppression. Ricky Fitts (Wes Bentley) is a
compulsive video photographer whom daughter Carolyn regards as a
voyeur after catching him in the act of filming her late one night.
Her father sees another side of Ricky. His other avocation besides
video is smoking and selling high-powered marijuana out of the bedroom
of his house. Lester soon becomes one of his best customers. Smoking
marijuana combines with the realization that the corporate world does
not matter to him anymore. What really matters is wooing his
daughter's libidinous classmate and living the lifestyle he enjoyed as
a 21 year old. He begins listening to Jimi Hendrix in his garage as he
pumps iron after Angela has told him that he needs to work out a
little. When he is not lifting weights, he is smoking expensive pot.
"American Beauty" is best at describing the futility of American
middle-class life. It is understandably weak in presenting a
believable alternative, since there is none within the confines of the
capitalist system. Poor Earl and Carolyn are driven to find salvation
within the system--her on the system's own terms and he within an
"alternative" lifestyle that owes more to a Levi's commercial than
anything else. Screenwriter Alan Ball's rebels are a middle-aged man
who lapses into late adolescence and an adolescent drug dealer who
operates within the fringes of consumerist society. What is marijuana,
after all, than the ultimate commodity. When he is showing Lester his
wares, he makes a sales pitch for genetically modified weed that uses
top secret government biotechnology and sells for $2000 an ounce.
"American Beauty", whatever its flaws, is worth seeing as a snapshot
of American society at a peculiar juncture in its unfolding as an
empire. In the final years of the second term of the Clinton
administration, which by some standards has produced more material
success than has been enjoyed in many years, Hollywood is turning out
films that curse the system that produced it.
Marxist discussion is at: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Title
Review for Traffic (2000)
After Stephen Soderbergh transformed an environmentalist struggle into a
sexploitative star vehicle for Julia Roberts, it should not surprise us
that he would Hollywood-ize the hard-hitting television miniseries
"Traffik". Made for Channel 4 in Great Britain in 1989, "Traffik" also
appeared on public television in the United States one year later. 
In "Traffic" Soderbergh has appropriated (or misappropriated) some core
elements of the original, while leaving out others that would get in the
way of his commercial goals. The resultant mess helps us understand how
liberal taste-makers frame the "war on drugs" in the face of an impending
war in Colombia. Considering that Soderbergh's first film was titled "Sex,
Lies and Videotape", an appropriate subtitle for "Traffic" might be "Drugs,
Lies and Hollywood".
In "Traffik", we are afforded a multi-tiered view of Great Britain's war on
the heroin trade. The central figure is a British Home Office minister
named Jack Lithgow (Bill Paterson) who has been assigned to oversee that
war. The irony, and one of the key dramatic elements of the tale, is that
his daughter is a drug addict. While relentlessly pursuing the source of
the "traffik" in Pakistan, he is constantly being pulled into his
daughter's own maelstrom.
"Traffik" derives its German title from the fact that one of the
politician's main antagonists is a German who uses a construction business
as a front for a much more lucrative heroin import business. After he is
arrested in the course of a major drug interdiction effort, his wife takes
over--even though she has been innocent of his activities up to that point.
Her easy slide into criminality serves to illustrate the point that nobody
is immune from the enormous temptations of a quick profit. Not only does
she assume control without missing a beat, she seems even more savvy than
her jailed husband. She announces, ''I'm going to be strong about this. I'm
not going to let go of everything we fought for'', as if the family
business was commercial real estate.
In Soderbergh's film the terrain and the commodity have shifted. We are now
dealing with the cocaine trade and its source is Mexico. The main character
is an American drug czar Robert Wakefield, played by the ubiquitous Michael
Douglas. His daughter Caroline (Erika Christensen) is a cocaine free-baser
who turns to prostitution to pay for her habit. In a search for his
daughter, which has all the hyped-up intensity of a Charles Bronson revenge
melodrama, Wakefield descends into the Black community, which takes on the
character of the Casbah. Blacks on the street appear menacing to Wakefield
(and the largely white audience I saw the film with), as if each had a
knife in one pocket and a drug stash in the other.
Another significant difference between the two films is how each drug czar
relates to the rogue third world country where the drugs originate. In
"Traffik", Lithgow is directing a campaign to wean Pakistani farmers away
from growing opium toward legal cash crops. His idealistic hopes are
eventually crushed when he realizes that there is no incentive for peasants
to stop growing opium. Unfortunately nothing grows in the arid Pakistani
soil as well as the poppy. "It doesn't need much water," Lithgow is told.
"It doesn't need much in the way of nutrients. They are just weeds -- the
richest weeds in the world." He learns that farmers must grow and harvest
10 acres of sugar cane to reap the profit from just three acres of poppies. 
Perhaps the heroin and cocaine trade is driven by the same brute economic
facts that drive the tobacco industry, a legal but much more toxic
industry. According to the book "Barbarians at the Gate," investor Warren
Buffett told Salomon Chairman John Gutfreund in 1987: "I'll tell you why I
like the cigarette business. It costs a penny to make. Sell it for a
dollar. It's addictive. And there's fantastic brand loyalty.''
While "Traffik" is mostly about character development--particularly
Lithgow's disillusionment--"Traffic" is mostly a lurid 'policier', a sort
of big budget version of the old TV show "Miami Vice", in which law
enforcement becomes paramount, despite the film's lip-service to the
obvious truth that the war on drugs is unwinnable.
In Soderbergh's film, the major point of view in Mexico belongs to Javier
Rodriguez Rodriguez (Benicio Del Toro), an honest cop out to bust the
corrupt Army general and the drug lords he protects. This Mexico is even
more wicked than the Black community, at least in cinematographic terms.
Soderbergh, who handled the camera itself for the Mexico location, uses a
sulfur-yellow filter to make sure that the audience understands that this
is a hellish place.
While "Traffik" takes place largely in Pakistan, where the opium is grown,
there is no interest in finding out what conditions spawn the growth of
coca. For that to take place, the film would have to include Colombia as a
venue. If you restrict your terrain to Mexico, you are dealing solely with
the finished product. And who else handles the finished product but
case-hardened businessmen rather than people at the bottom, who rely on the
soil to make a living.
This is where "Traffik" excels. The film begins with Fazal (Jamal Shah), an
impoverished Pakistani farmer who grows opium poppies on his farm and ekes
out barely enough money to support his wife and two children. Lithgow
eventually meets Fazal and asks, "Do you know that people in the West are
dying from the heroin you make?" "Sir, I grow opium, not heroin," Fazal
replies. "You deal with the heroin problem."
Soderbergh is quite open about his desire to flatter law enforcement
agencies in the USA, while simultaneously maintaining a hip "war on drugs
can not succeed" 'tude. In a profile that appears in the Jan. 3-9 Village
Voice, Soderbergh states:
"I didn't want to come off like we had answers. The idea that some silly
filmmaker after two years could sort it out would be outrageous. But there
seems to be a huge vacuum in the public debate and I guess this is one of
the few times I felt a movie could actually help. The funny thing is,
everybody who sees it thinks it puts their point of view across, and I was
expecting exactly the opposite. We had a screening in Washington for
Customs, DEA, and the Department of Justice and they all came out saying
they really liked it. The following night, there was some hardcore leftie
NPR/PBS [!!!!] screening in L.A. and some guy stands up and goes, 'Thank
you for making the first pro-legalization movie.' Then the other night,
Commissioner Safir came to a screening and said he thought it was the most
accurate representation of law enforcement he'd seen in a long time. And I
have, you know, stoner friends who are going, like, 'Dude, yeah, great . .
. '"
Nobody could possibly accuse Soderbergh of coming off like he had answers.
But one might have hoped that he would have had a more open-eyed view of
the cops in the United States, who appear in the film to be the Mexican
police's only reliable ally.
Since Soderbergh is based in Los Angeles, one can only conclude that he has
not been reading a newspaper for the past few years. Otherwise, he would
have felt the need to introduce a little bit of reality into his script,
based on the gargantuan Ramparts Division scandal.
It turns out that over the past decade or so, the LAPD anti-drug division
has been deeply involved in the cocaine trade itself. Ex-cop, now serving a
long prison sentence, Rafael Perez was accused of murdering, dealers during
a botched drug deal in the mid-1990s. His ex-girl friend claims that the
bodies of those victims and that of another woman allegedly killed by
Perez's partner David Mack were buried in Mexico in hopes that, if they
were discovered, they would be presumed to be victims of the region's drug
wars. While some investigators claim that this accusation was false, there
is no doubt that Perez and other officers have been found guilty of
stealing drugs from the evidence room of their department and re-selling
them on the street. In 1999 Perez pleaded guilty to stealing eight pounds
of cocaine in exchange for a lighter prison sentence. He also agreed to
identify other allegedly corrupt officers. Now this would have made for a
more interesting film, since it is a far more accurate representation of
how urban police departments behave--or misbehave.
Furthermore, if Soderbergh had been more informed about the relationship
between the USA and Mexico, he would have not been so eager to put white
hats on all the American officials, especially in light of the revelations
made by Thomas A. Constantine, the top drug-enforcement official who
resigned last year.
In an interview with the NY Times on November 26, 1999, Constantine states
regarding the Mexican drug trade: "I watched that situation for five and a
half years, and every year it became worse. We were not adequately
protecting the citizens of the United States from these organized-crime
figures."
"Every time we had a major case involving a criminal organization from
Mexico operating in the United States, there was a significant allegation
of corruption involving the Mexican Attorney General's office, a Mexican
state police force, the highway police," he said.
However, the Clinton administration chose not to confront the Mexican
government, since American concerns about Mexico's corruption and
drug-trafficking problems were secondary to trade and other economic
interests. 
"The idea was, if you said those things publicly, if you release documents,
you will just aggravate the situation," he said. "My concern was that we
had kids in this country dropping like flies. Maybe that was parochial, but
I felt like I was the only person there who felt like that." 
Even after Constantine's counterpart in Mexico was found in 1997 to have
been colluding with the country's biggest cocaine trafficker, serious
discussion of the issue within the Clinton administration was minimal, even
negligible, he said. The exception was the annual debate over whether to
certify the anti-drug efforts of Mexico and other nations that produce or
ship illegal drugs. 
Constantine told the NY Times, "Everyone would say, 'Your facts are
correct, but there are bigger policy issues involved.' "

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
It should be recorded that Stephen Spielberg was involved with one
solid antiwar film in 1998. That film is Dreamwork's "Toy Soldiers,"
not the flag-waving "Saving Private Ryan." "Toy Soldiers" received
some praise for the animatronic designs, which give the toy soldiers
life-like motion and three-dimensionality, but the underlying story
will last with you much longer than the special effects.
"Toy Soldiers" is a clever satire on the culture behind the
testosterone-laden combat toys hawked to little boys on Saturday
morning television. Denis Leary plays the head of a huge conglomerate
that began in the munitions business, but is now gobbling up new
companies left and right in order to diversify. The latest acquisition
is a toy company run by a couple of naďfs. He tells them to come up
with a toy soldier that will really do the sort of things that you see
on the television commercials: climb up hills, swim across rivers,
jump from airplanes. Most importantly, this toy soldier must destroy
its enemy, a companion toy called the Gorgothon. Desperate to please
his new boss, one of the toy company executives decides to use a
special artificial intelligence microchip from the munitions division
of the conglomerate to satisfy the big boss's demands. To everybody's
shock, the chip does this and much more.
The toy soldiers and their Gorgothon prey end up at a "warm and fuzzy"
toy store, where violent toys are prohibited by the owner who is away
on a business trip. Alan Abernathy , his teenage son (played ably by
Gregory Smith), is watching the store and decides to sell the toys
since business has been so slow.
On the very first night, the toy soldiers bust out of their boxes and
gather around their leader, Chip Hazard (voice by Tommy Lee Jones),
who delivers a hilarious speech to his assembled troops. He manages to
include just about every bloody cliché ever heard in a war movie,
while pacing back and forth in front of a huge American flag. To leave
no doubt, the film score quotes the musical theme from "Patton." The
gist of Hazard's speech is that the Gorgothon must be killed because
they "are the enemy." This injunction, just as the ones that are given
to raw recruits in the wars of our 20th century, is all that is
necessary.
Meanwhile, the Gorgothons, while unlovely to the eye, are about as
gentle and lovable a group as one can imagine. Their leader is Archer
(voice by Frank Langella), who has the head of a lion and a quiver of
arrows on his powerful back. There is a striking similarity between
this toy monster and the extraterrestrial killer in "Predator," who is
pursued and destroyed by a Chip Hazard-like Arnold Schwarzenegger in
the jungles of Central America. The movie subverts these identities,
however. The solider becomes the insane pursuer, while the monster
simply desires to live in peace. Why are the monsters hated? The toy
soldiers have the answer. They are DIFFERENT. They have been
programmed to hate the OTHER.
After the Gorgothons take refuge in Alan's home, the toy soldiers
decide to take his girl-friend (Kristen Dunst) as hostage. She will be
returned safely if he turns over the Gorgothons. His refusal to do
this leads to a riotous climax that owes much to the movie "Gremlins."
Since Joe Dante directed both "Gremlins" and "Toy Soldiers," the
combination of slapstick and violence is immediately recognizable as
his signature. What makes "Toy Soldiers" different, however, is that
our fear ultimately is not of some green creature from outer space,
but our own military culture.
Hollywood's ambivalence about military culture goes to the roots of
our dilemma as a people. The Hollywood moguls grouped around
Dreamworks are solid liberals who can deplore war toys in one movie
and then turn around and make another that glorifies America's
military exploits. The reason for this is obvious. "America," as James
William Gibson, author of "Warrior Dreams" states, "has always had a
war culture, and that long history of martial adventures provides a
crucial background for understanding the post-Vietnam warrior."
"Warrior Dreams" is a study of the film iconography of the Reagan era,
one that "Toy Soldiers" is a pointed footnote to.
The Minutemen of the American Revolution were warrior heroes, who set
an example not only for the Indian killers of the nineteenth century
but Teddy Roosevelt's "harum-scarum Rough Riders" as well. The legend
of Roosevelt's victory at San Juan Hill was actually recorded by
Vitagraph. To make a more exciting newsreel, the Vitagraph
photographers and the Rough Riders staged a mock battle at Santiago
Bay after the real fighting was over. World War One and World War Two
replenished the mythology of the warrior hero. So by the time the
Vietnam War started, millions of young American men had already been
acculturated to violence and domination, as Ron Kovic put it in "Born
on the Fourth of July":
"Every Saturday afternoon we'd go down to the movies in the shopping
center and watch gigantic prehistoric birds breathe fire, and war
movies with John Wayne and Audie Murphy. Bobbie's mother always packed
us a bagful of candy. I'll never forget Audie Murphy in To Hell and
Back. At the end he jumps on top of a flaming tank that's just about
to explode and grabs the machine gun, blasting it into the German
lines. He was so brave I had chills running up and down my back,
wishing it were me up there. There were gasoline flames roaring around
his legs, but he just kept firing that machine gun. It was the
greatest movie I ever saw in my life."
This scene not only inspired Ron Kovic to join the Marines and lose
his legs in Vietnam, it is also very similar to the blockbuster finale
of "Saving Private Ryan," a movie that might inspire the next
generation of Ron Kovics to go off to distant lands in pursuit of
warrior dreams. It is a sign of the peculiar divided consciousness of
late 20th century American capitalism that it is simultaneously
producing its own most dedicated propagandists and social critics,
often combined in the same individual. Such a tension can not remain
permanent.
(For Marxist discussion: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Title
Review for Trois huit (2001)
When Pierre (Gérard Laroche) opens the locker he's inherited from the guy
he's just replaced on the nightshift at a bottle factory, he discovers
pictures of naked women taped to the inside of the door. As soon as he
begins removing them, a burly fellow worker named Fred (Marc Berbe) accosts
him. What's the matter with Pierre, he asks in a loud voice audible to the
entire team preparing for the evening shift, is he some kind of fag?
This confrontation sets the tone and defines the central dramatic tension
of Philippe Le Guay's "Nightshift", which was shown last night (March 15,
2001) as part of series on recent French cinema at Lincoln Center's Walter
Reade Theater. The French title is "Trois Huit", or 3 by 8, to designate
the way a day is divided into three 8-hour shifts in a typical factory. The
decision to make a movie on location in a bottle factory, with characters
drawn from the blue-collar world, is reflective of a trend among younger
French directors to root cinema in the social reality of France's majority.
Anybody who has seen "Human Resources" will see the similarity. Unlike
"Human Resources," which depicted a struggle between the workforce as a
whole and a boss looking to downsize, "Nightshift" focuses on the conflict
between one worker and another. However, the conflict is rooted in deeper
social structures in bourgeois society, which the factory, like prisons or
highs schools, is apt to intensify.
On his first night on the shift, Pierre becomes the target of an
ever-increasing series of mean-spirited pranks. At first Fred treats the
incidents as a kind of initiation ceremony. When one of his cohorts throws
a bucket of water on Pierre from an overhanging ramp, he is told that it
was done to him also on his first night there. But soon it becomes obvious
that Fred just has it in for Pierre. He taunts him, steals his food, writes
"cocksucker" on the windshield of his car and finally slams a basketball
into his face at a company game.
Eventually Pierre has enough of Fred's bullying and confronts him at his
apartment, challenging him to a fight. Since Fred is an amateur boxer and
at least 30 pounds heavier than Pierre, it is obvious that it would not be
a fair fight. In a surprising twist, Fred invites Pierre in for a drink and
confesses to him that he does not know why he does the things he does.
Perhaps it is a broken marriage and the financial strains of keeping his
father in a rest home that makes him nasty. In any case, he just wants to
end the one-sided conflict then and there.
Pierre, always anxious to try to get beneath the bullying surface of his
tormentor and relate to him as a fellow human being, accepts his peace
offer and even loans him money. Unfortunately, he will discover that Fred
was lying: a few days later Fred tells the nightshift that he spent
Pierre's money on a fish tank rather than family expenses and adds that he
will call the fish Pierre.
Even then Pierre finds ways to try to connect to Fred as a human being.
Perhaps his greatest flaw is to act ethically in an environment where
malice and inhumanity are the norm. During the hazing, Pierre asks a fellow
worker--an Arab--why he is joining the rest in tormenting him. He replies,
"You have become the Arab here."
If the gullible Pierre is not a satisfying protagonist in terms of our
expectations of a typical Hollywood revenge-morality tale, neither is Fred
a typical villain. Early in the film he risks his life to dive into a tank
of oil and repair a leak that threatened the team's ability to meet the
shift's production quota. He also joins the nightshift in helping Pierre
lay concrete in the floor of his new home on a weekend afternoon.
Afterwards, when the men sit on a nearby field sipping wine, the foreman
complains that there is far too little solidarity like they just
experienced laying concrete. Everyone is out for himself nowadays. Fred
chimes in that there never really was any solidarity.
In the discussion period following the film, a member of the audience
complained that the film was ultimately unsatisfying because the bully did
not get his comeuppance. Furthermore, she complained that the bully was not
believable because of the good aspects of his character. Le Guay quoted
Hitchcock in his reply, namely that the more complex a villain, the more
successful a film. Beyond the question of dramatic effectiveness, the
larger question involves how people become bullies and how the bullied
respond.
Speaking as somebody who was bullied in high school, a topic very much in
the news now, it dawned on me while watching the film that bullying is very
much a form of behavior that is inevitable in capitalist institutions such
as factories, high schools and prisons. The high school bullying which made
a fourteen year old take murderous revenge against classmates is deeply
imbedded in the competitive nature of our society. "Toughening" people up
is supposed to hone their survival skills in a market society, with high
school the ultimate training ground. Pierre's failings ultimately are like
those of Huckleberry Finn's, trying to behave ethically in an unethical
society.

Title
Review for Requiem for a Dream (2000)
Retrospective: Requiem for a Dream (2000)
Sitting alone in her chintzy Brighton Beach apartment, overweight and
elderly Sara Goldfarb (Ellen Burstyn) consoles herself with her two main
addictions: television and sweets. Her favorite television show is an
infomercial that features a self-assured man in a suit striding up and down
the stage telling his studio audience and forlorn people at home like Sarah
that they can turn their lives around. All they have to do is give up red
meat and sugar, and turn on to the inner resources each have within
themselves--something he calls "juice". When he utters the word "juice,"
the audience maniacally begins chanting the word in unison as Sarah stares
beatifically at the TV screen hoping that she too some day will discover
her own "juice."
Her son Harry (Jared Leto) is a junkie and small-time drug-dealer. When we
first meet him and his best friend and fellow junky-dealer Tyrone (Marlon
Wayans), they have seized Sara's television and are wheeling it down the
desolate streets of the industrial blocks near Brighton Beach in order to
deliver it to a hock shop, where they are frequent visitors, always with
the same TV set.
One day Sara receives an invitation to appear as a contestant on a
television game show. This represents the possibility of deliverance from
loneliness and inadequacy. She embarks on a self-improvement program to
make her more attractive for the upcoming television appearance. One of her
Brighton Beach cronies, played to the hilt by Louise Lasser, dyes her hair
red. This will match the red dress that sits in her closet, the one she
wore to Harry's high school graduation. There is only one problem: it is
now way too small.
She puts herself on a crash diet that excludes all sugar and fatty foods.
In doing so, she experiences withdrawal symptoms in a food-addict's version
of "cold turkey." When fantasies about cheeseburgers and pastries prove too
much for her to take, she looks up a diet doctor who prescribes 3 sets of
pills in different colors that must be taken morning, noon and night.
Meanwhile Harry and Tyrone have stepped up their drug-dealing in an effort
to break into the ranks of the big time and to achieve their own kind of
"juice." Some of the proceeds are targeted for a dress-design shop to be
run by Harry's girl-friend Marion (Jennifer Connelly), a junkie herself.
The ambitious plans of mother and son soon begin to unravel. Although her
weight begins to evaporate, Sara finds the side-effects of the drugs both
frightening and painful. She has waking nightmares in which her
refrigerator appears to advance toward her like a Frankenstein monster with
a life of its own. When Harry visits her to announce that he is presenting
her with a brand-new giant-screen television, paid for by revenues from his
expanding drug trade, he is alarmed to find his mother grinding her teeth
uncontrollably like a speed freak. When he tells her that she is addicted,
she answers that this is impossible. A doctor prescribed the pills, so how
can she be addicted.
But addicted she is. Unlike her son and his friends, she is a victim of
"approved" drugs which are every bit as harmful as those peddled on the
streets by her son. Director Darren Aronofsky's "Requiem for a Dream",
based on his screenplay adaptation of a novel by Hubert Selby Jr., takes
these characters and shows with unstinting and gruesome honesty how
addiction can destroy lives. The powerful but deeply disturbing climax of
the film depicts the unraveling of mother and son, as the search for
satisfaction and acceptance proves elusive. Unlike the typical film about
addicts, which tends to view them as weak people with character flaws,
Aronofsky's film leads to a different kind of a conclusion--namely, that
society itself is flawed.
Although Darren Aronofsky is an extremely talented director and screenplay
writer, this film would have been impossible without Hubert Selby Jr., one
of the great American writers of the past half-century. Now over seventy
years old, Selby is best known for his collection of short stories "Last
Exit in Brooklyn" which like "Requiem for a Dream" depicts the sufferings
of working people and drifters living at the margins of society in the
hinterlands of Brooklyn. Although Selby is linked stylistically with the
Beat Generation, especially William S. Burroughs, I find him to be a
throwback to the Depression Era, especially the bleakly surrealistic novels
of CP'er Nathaniel West.
In an April 18, 1999 interview with the British newspaper, The Independent,
Selby takes aim at American society:
"The fascism in this country today is incredible. But things go through
cycles. Look at McCarthyism. That started in the 1950s and went through for
quite a while. So the basic pathology is always there. In this country, our
escape, regardless of what technology's around, has always been money. The
so-called 'bottom line' is God, over absolutely everything. So regardless
of what else is going on, there is that fix." 
In dealing with the ups and downs of Selby's career, which during down
phases had him pumping gas or on welfare, the British interviewer who is
altogether sympathetic to the legendary writer, says, "I didn't mean to
upset you. It's just that America seems to hold a terror that England
doesn't. In England there's still a net. But in America you can be an
upstanding citizen for years and then suddenly through a combination of
unfortunate circumstances you fall and you are ... " 
Selby completes the interviewer's sentence:
"Dead. And this is the richest country in the world, in every way possible,
and we have millions of children starving. Can you f---ing believe that!
THIS IDEA OF EFFICIENCY AND THE BOTTOM LINE IS MADNESS." (emphasis added)
Hubert Selby Jr. was the Brooklyn-born only child of an engineer and a
housewife who joined the Merchant Marines at the end of WWII, just like
Jack Kerouac. Around this time, he contracted tuberculosis. In an effort to
save his life, doctors removed 10 ribs so they could collapse his left lung
and snip out part of the diseased right one.
During his recuperation, according to a profile that appeared in the March
11, 1988 Los Angeles Times, he sneaked out for nights of drinking and would
pass out in snowbanks, only to be rescued by neighborhood friends. Soon
afterwards he also developed a $100 a day heroin habit. This led to a
90-day, drug-related prison stint and a four-month stay in solitary
confinement at Bellevue Hospital after attempting suicide. 
This personal hell was occurring in the late 1940s, when he was also
hanging out with the characters who would form the inner core of "Last Exit
to Brooklyn" and "Requiem for a Dream."
Although "Requiem for a Dream" is an art movie bordering on the
experimental, it is currently playing at commercial houses all around the
country. It is not to be missed.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)

The only thing surprising about "Saving Private Ryan" is how conventional
it is. I fully expected a much more "noir" vision of WWII along the lines
of Oliver Stone's "Platoon." What I saw was an updated version of such
1950s classics as "Walk in the Sun," written by Robert Rossen, the CP'er
who named names.
"Walk in the Sun," also known as "Salerno Beachhead," just about defines
this genre. A group of GI's are out on a patrol and they get killed off one
by one. The enemy is faceless and evil. Our soldiers, by the same token,
are good boys who are just trying to get home. The reason that CP'ers were
so adept at turning out this sort of patriotic pap is that they had bought
into the myth of FDR's "fight for freedom." So patriotic were the CP'ers
that they also backed the decision to intern Japanese-Americans.
The buzz about Spielberg's movie is clearly related to his decision to make
battle wounds much more graphic than ever before. This decision roughly
parallels the breakthrough made by Bertolucci in "Last Tango in Paris" to
depict sexuality openly and honestly. The question of what is more
jarring--Brando in full-frontal nudity or a soldier's intestines spilling
out of his midsection--I will leave to others.
A war movie ultimately relies on the same dramatic tensions as slasher or
science-fiction movies. The audience is at the edge of its seat waiting for
the next sniper's bullet to tear through the flesh of one of the "good
guys." The suspense is similar to that which awaits us for the next moment
when "Halloween's" Michael Myers will come barreling out of a closet with a
kitchen knife in hand. Who will get slashed in the throat next? The most
interesting variation on this theme is the film "Aliens" which blends
monsters from outer space and "Walk in the Sun" war movie conventions. The
acid-spitting  monsters of this film are stand-ins for Nazis or Japs. All
the soldiers want to do is complete "their job" successfully and return
home, in this case planet Earth.
Since the aesthetic dimensions of "Saving Private Ryan" are so
underwhelming, the more interesting question becomes one of Steven
Spielberg's motivation in turning out such a retro movie. What would compel
a director working in 1998 to recycle themes from the immediate post-WWII
period?
It is not really too hard to figure out. When Spielberg is not turning out
escapist fantasies like the lovely "ET" or "Close Encounters of the Third
Kind," he is functioning as a latter-day Frank Capra spinning out morality
tales to mold public opinion.
Movies like "Amistad," "Schindler's List" and "Saving Private Ryan" all
basically put forward the same message, namely that the wealthy and the
powerful are the ultimate guardians of what's decent and humane. In
"Amistad," this role is assigned to John Quincy Adams who stands up for the
slaves. In "Schindler's List," it is the industrialist who delivers the Jews.
General George Marshall, while a secondary character in "Saving Private
Ryan," puts the dramatic narrative into motion through his decent and
humane decision to remove Private James Ryan from the battlefield after his
three brothers have been killed in action. Marshall tells his fellow
officers that he didn't want to be in the same situation that faced Lincoln
when he informed a mother that all of her sons had been killed in Civil War
fighting.
Once this decision is reached, Captain Miller (Tom Hanks) and a group of
soldiers are sent on their way to track down Private Ryan and send him back
home. Their trek through hostile territory is familiar territory to anybody
who has sat through the 1950s classics. Unfortunately, "Saving Private
Ryan" does not even achieve the level of character development of a film
like "Walk in the Sun." The stories about life back home are much more
interesting in Rossen's screenplay. This should not come as any great
surprise because the Hollywood Reds were some of the most accomplished
writers ever to work in tinseltown.
Standing above this film like a canopy are a whole set of assumptions about
American "decency." Not only is General George Marshall decent enough to
rescue a single GI from the fighting, the GI's themselves are also more
decent than the despicable Nazis. There is one plot device that drives this
point home. Hank's men have captured a German soldier. They want to kill
him but Hanks says that this would not be right and sends him off. In the
climax of the film, this soldier turns up again and plunges a knife into
one of the "good guys" in hand-to-hand combat. After he is captured once
again, a GI shoots him in cold blood. The moral of the story is that it is
forgivable to shoot Germans in this manner because they are embodiments of
pure evil, just as they were in "Schindler's Tale,"
There is no doubt that Spielberg decided to make such a patriotic movie
because he is concerned about the widespread erosion of confidence in
elected officials in American society. Warren Beatty, another Hollywood
mover-and-shaker, tackled the same job in "Bulworth." "Bulworth" attempts
to restore people's belief in the system by holding up a "contrary"
politician as an example. This politician decides to tell the truth no
matter what. This, of course, is pure Capra territory.
The reason that WWII is so important to Spielberg is that this period was
the last time when genuine national unity prevailed. People rallied around
their President and were willing to lie down their lives. Good workers were
like good soldiers. They went to work in the factories without demanding
"excess" raises. Anybody who struck during WWII was a traitor. After WWII
the "bad guys" changed identity. No longer was it the sneering blond beast
of the Wehrmacht. Instead it was the fanatical Chinese soldier or Russian
superspy.
In order to get people thinking in this mode once again, Spielberg can not
churn out conventional narratives of the 1950s style. Instead they have to
be gussied up with trendy camera work and a pulsating film score. It is
also necessary to draft the most likable actor in Hollywood to play the
lead. If there is one thing you can say about Tom Hanks, it is that the
public finds him easy to like. Although speaking for myself I would have to
say that after Hanks's recent gee-whiz promotion of Nazi party official
Werner Von Braun's NASA and this lateest patriotic pap served up by
Spielberg, it seems like he is angling to become the new John Wayne.
(http://www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Title
Review for City, The (1998)
You can spot Mexican and Central American immigrants everywhere in New
York City. Teenagers guard the outdoor flower displays in front of
Korean grocery stores, whose goods mostly come from Colombia, where
they leave behind a trail of ecological destruction. If you walk
around the West Twenties and Thirties you see Mexican women on their
way to sweatshop jobs and on the subways the men are headed to or
returning from low-wage construction jobs. They are the
fastest-growing group of immigrants in the city right now and have
almost no political influence, unlike the comparatively well-organized
Dominicans. They are also the poorest.
Young film-maker David Riker made the audacious decision to construct
"La Ciudad" (The City) around this population, using a largely
unprofessional cast. It is a New York that is invisible in Woody
Allen's movies or television shows like "Seinfeld." Riker ignores the
trendy Manhattan neighborhoods with their coffee bars, designer
clothing boutiques and hot new restaurants. His New York is the Bronx,
where the stores advertise in Spanish and sell beepers or advice on
how to get a green card. Filmed in a gritty black-and-white, the movie
consists of street scenes filmed on location of neighborhoods where
the average New Yorker, including me, never visits. Riker spent five
years from 1992 to 1997 working with this community and gaining their
trust. The result is an audacious and powerful film that is clearly in
the neo-realist tradition of "The Bicycle Thief."
"La Ciudad" is constructed around four separate stories that are
connected together by intermezzi of immigrants being photographed in a
studio, posing for a picture that we might assume is being sent home
to a loved one. Their faces, like the faces of Riker's cast, express a
mixture of uncertainty and hope.
In the first story we follow a group of ten day laborers who are lured
into a job that supposedly pays $50 for a day's work, but when they
arrive at the site, they discover that instead they will clean
individual bricks from a pile of rubble for fifteen cents each. At
first they resist, but eventually go about their task. Their anger
toward the man who hired them is displaced toward each other.
In the next we meet a young man who has just arrived from Puebla, the
most economically devastated state in Mexico. He is trying to find an
uncle, but with no success. He wanders the streets of the Bronx until
he hears the sounds of Latin music coming from a private party in a
dance hall. He crashes the party and strikes up a conversation with a
young woman, who is not only from Puebla herself, but the very same
town. The possibility for love and economic deliverance in the strange
new city turn out to be difficult to achieve.
Then we meet a father and his young daughter who live in their car
near the East River. He runs a one-man puppet show on the vacant lots
in the neighborhood. At night he reads to her from an illustrated
fairy tale and his only hope is to enroll her in a local school. He is
ably played by José Rabelo, a Cuban-American, and one of the few
professional actors in the cast. As I left the theatre, Rabelo was on
the sidewalk passing out flyers to help publicize the film. I
congratulated him on his performance and took a handful that I will
leave around Columbia University. He introduced me to David Riker, who
was also on the sidewalk nearby. He mentioned that he is very involved
with solidarity efforts in Chiapas and will likely be visiting there
in the next few months.
The final vignette is the most effective. It depicts the plight of a
young mother who works on a sewing machine in a sweatshop run by a
Chinese husband and wife, which actually describes the class
demographics at work in New York City today. The workers have not been
paid in weeks, but are assured by the bosses that they will get money
as soon as they make final delivery on the clothing to a potential
customer. In effect, the Latinos have no choice except to take a
chance whether they will be paid or not. Like the men cleaning bricks
in the first story, the only guarantee is that if they don't work they
will starve. The young mother needs to be paid because her daughter
needs emergency medical care that costs $400. In the final scene she
confronts the bosses and discovers that the class ties that bind her
to the rest of the workers in the sweatshop prove decisive.
"La Cidudad" has received positive reviews in the NY Times and Village
Voice, which is encouraging. Both of these newspapers thrive on
presenting a view of New York that is totally at odds with the one
depicted in Riker's film, one that is geared to successful whites
looking for an evening's entertainment. Riker's film has an entirely
different agenda. The pleasure you receive is in knowing about the
full gamut of human experience in one of the worlds' most powerful and
wealthy metropolises. By making the invisible visible, Riker has
fulfilled one of the greatest demands that can be put on any artist:
to tell the truth. "La Ciudad" is playing now at the Quad Cinema on
13th street between 5th and 6th and at the American Museum of the
Moving Image in Queens. I strongly urge people to see this film and to
spread the word.
(For Marxist discussion: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Title
Review for Mononoke Hime (1997)
In the opening scene of Miyazaki Hayao's animated feature Princess
Mononoke, we witness a battle between young Prince Ashitaka and a
giant demon warthog that is attacking his village. In the act of
successfully killing the animal, he receives a wound to his arm. In a
meeting with the village elders, he learns from a wise woman that the
wound is certainly fatal. It is only a matter of time. His only hope
is to travel to the forest home of the demon warthog to find out what
has driven it to hate and kill humans.
Thus begins a quest that is thematically related to many legends and
fairy tales, going back to the Epic of Gilgamesh. A young protagonist,
usually an adolescent like Ashitaka, goes on a voyage to save either
himself, herself or their people. This voyage--in many ways a rite of
puberty--leads to self-discovery and a happy ending.
Although Miyazaki is known as Japan's Walt Disney, it would be a
mistake to assume that Princess Mononoke resembles the sort of
saccharine product Disney studios offer up today. In many ways it is a
throwback to the darker vision of a Disney past, when his films had
the power to both frighten and enchant.
Ashikata departs to the East on his steed, a loyal elk in true
fairy-tale fashion, the rumored homeland of the demon hog. The only
clue to what drove the animal wild and turned it into a demon is the
iron ball that is discovered in its corpse. The wise woman of the
village tells him that if he discovers the source of the iron ball, he
will likely understand the root of his own suffering as well.
After a journey across mountains and through forests, he finally
arrives at the source of the iron ball. It is Irontown, ruled by
Princess Eboshi. Miyazaki's Irontown is a realistic depiction of one
of those towns that existed everywhere on the cusp of the introduction
of capitalist property relations in the 16th century. Its citizens
work in a foundry turning iron ore into guns and bullets. Eboshi
dreams of ruling the world. By bringing together wage labor and raw
materials, she will achieve mastery over all her enemies, including
the feudal Samurai warriors who are constantly attacking her heavily
fortified industrial compound. She is symbolic of an emerging Japanese
bourgeoisie, whose artisan-based workshop is a mere sprout in the
surrounding feudal countryside. Out of such sprouts, capitalism could
emerge anywhere, but for geographical reasons was allowed only to
emerge in Western Europe and Japan. In the first instance because
Western Europe was able to cannibalize the New World, in the second
because Japan took advantage of its insular features to resist the
cannibals.
Her only other enemy are the animals and spirits of the nearby
mountain, where the town's miners are systematically destroying trees
in order to get at the iron ore under the ground. Periodically
animals, including the warthog of the opening scene, attack the miners
and the soldiers who defend them. That is what the iron ball turns out
to be, a bullet that both gravely wounded the warthog and led to
Ashikata's own struggle against death.
Eboshi's main worry, however, is San, the teenaged girl who lives with
white wolves in the forest. She is Princess Mononoke, who has the
ability to talk to the animals. Her parents abandoned her in the
forest when she was an infant, where she was adopted by the wolf
goddess Moro, her mother now. During one of her raids on Eboshi's
fortress-factory, San is saved from death by Ashikata who takes her
unconscious body back into the forest. During the rescue, he is
wounded himself. Using the restorative powers of a pond deep within
the forest, San brings Ashikata back to health. However, the original
wound he received from the warthog has not disappeared. Its black
magic will prove difficult to overcome. The partnership of Ashikata
and San against the destruction of the forest, set against their
unsteady progress toward friendship and possibly love, will eventually
overcome this black magic.
Besides the three central characters--Princess Mononoke, Ashikata and
Eboshi--the most vivid character of all is the forest itself with its
animals and spirits. Miyazaki is one of the great animation artists of
the 20th century, whose landscapes still depend heavily on manually
produced cels, although he is not above using computers when
appropriate. Every scene in Princess Mononoke is framed by a
breathtaking natural tableaux, typically tree-covered mountains that
arch toward a brilliant sun and clouds, with birds coasting lazily
across the sky. Although the scenes of nature usually occupy less than
a minute, they are essential to the esthetic pleasure of the film and
its underlying theme: nature has transcendent if not divine status. To
kill it in a wanton fashion is evil. On one level, Miyazaki's
environmentalism has much in common with the "deep ecology" that has
sprung up over the past 2 decades. It depends heavily on spiritual and
religious understandings of the connection between humanity and
nature.
Key to understanding the underlying beliefs of Princess Mononoke is
the continuing strength of Shintoism in Japan, the pre-Buddhist
indigenous beliefs. The core of Shintoist mythology revolves around
tales of the sun goddess Amaterasu Omikami, the ancestress of the
Imperial Household. In the beginning, according to Japanese mythology,
a certain number of kami or divine powers simply emerged, and a pair
of kami, Izanagi and Izanami, gave birth to the Japanese islands, as
well as to the kami who became ancestors of the various clans.
Amaterasu, the ruler of Takama no Hara; the moon god Tsukiyomi no
Mikoto; and Susanoo (Susanowo) no Mikoto, the ruler of the nether
regions, were the most important among them.
Shintoist beliefs remain strong in Japan today, although there is no
organized Shintoist religion as such. Perhaps best way to understand
the persistence of precapitalist mythology in a highly advanced
industrial country is to imagine by analogy that Mexico had been an
island able to resist Spanish conquistadores. At some point, the
native Aztec feudal aristocracy emerges into a capitalist class, but
never loses touch with the pantheistic beliefs of its racial origins.
Among them is a belief in the sacredness of nature, something that is
obviously inimical to unfettered capitalist growth.
The concern about "absence of the sacred" not only permeates
Miyazaki's film, it also is strong among some of the ideological
leaders of the recent Seattle protests. Green idealists such as Jerry
Mander and Vandana Shiva decry the soulless pursuit of profit by the
modern corporation. Salvation would seem to be a return to the simple
life of pastoral villagers and nomads, who view themselves as part of
nature and not above it.
However, a deeper reading of Princess Mononoke would yield a somewhat
different view. Prince Ashikata's message is not that Irontown should
be destroyed, only that it find a way to co-exist with nature. In
addition, the artisans of Irontown are depicted as plucky and
resourceful, not simple wage slaves who hate their work. The most
skilled workers there, who are designing a more powerful rifle
directly under Eboshi's supervision, are lepers whom she has rescued
from outer society's fears and superstitions.
In a perceptive Oct. 24, 1999 Los Angeles Times profile of Miyazaki,
Charles Solomon notes that in contrast to the sneering Clayton in
"Tarzan" or the brutal Shan Yu in "Mulan":
"Eboshi is not a straightforward villain. Like the Japanese people
after World War II, the workers in Iron Town are trying to survive in
a troubled world; they don't mean to destroy their environment. 'If
you portray someone who's evil, then you off him, what's the point?'
Miyazaki asked. 'It's easy to create a villain who's a maniacal real
estate developer, then kill him and have a happy ending. But what if a
really good person becomes a real estate developer?'"
The questions posed by Princess Mononoke and the Seattle protests will
remain with us as long as the world is organized on the basis of
profit and private property. Some people opposed to the system will
long for simpler, precapitalist foundations while others will argue
that progress and material well-being can only be ensured by
relentless exploitation of natural resources. Marxism has often found
itself struggling to define itself within the two poles.
Perhaps Engels' characterization of the Iroquois confederacy and other
precapitalist societies might be a guide to understanding resolving
this apparent dilemma:
"The power of this primitive community had to be broken, and it was
broken. But it was broken by influences which from the very start
appear as a degradation, a fall from the simple moral greatness of the
old gentile society. The lowest interests -- base greed, brutal
appetites, sordid avarice, selfish robbery of the common wealth --
inaugurate the new, civilized, class society. It is by the vilest
means -- theft, violence, fraud, treason -- that the old classless
gentile society is undermined and overthrown. And the new society
itself, during all the two and a half thousand years of its existence,
has never been anything else but the development of the small minority
at the expense of the great exploited and oppressed majority; today it
is so more than ever before."
Clearly, what Marxists should aim at is the marriage of the values of
communal society--including its reverence of nature--with the
scientific and technological advances that modern class society has
made possible. The proper term for this is socialism.
For Marxist discussion: www.marxmail.org 
(a new URL--please take note)

Title
Review for Gadjo dilo (1998)
We first meet Stéphane [Romain Duris] in the opening moments of "Gadjo
Dilo" walking down an ice-covered road in the Romanian countryside.
The young Parisian is in search of a legendary gypsy singer, whose
tape he carries with him. Her songs had consoled his ethnomusicologist
father on his deathbed, and the tape was recorded on one of his many
field-trips. Stéphane is following in his footsteps.
I can understand the fascination with gypsy music. The authentic sound
is nothing like the kitsch you hear in Hungarian restaurants. It has a
simultaneously raw and ethereal power like no other music. Over
thirty-five years ago I was listening to one of composer and
ethnomusicologist Henry Cowell's radio programs on NYC's left-wing,
listener-sponsored WBAI. He announced that he was going to play some
field-recordings he had made of Romanian gypsy fiddle-players who had
influenced Bela Bartok. The sound mesmerized me. To this day, I search
for recordings of this type of fiddle-playing but nothing could
possibly match Cowell's field-recordings. So I can understand
Stéphane's passion.
Exhausted and half-frozen, Stéphane reaches a tiny village in the dead
of night. All the doors are closed, the lights are out and the streets
are empty. The only person he finds is an elderly drunken gypsy named
Izidor [Isidor Serban], who is cursing loudly at the cops who have
just taken his son Adrjani to jail on trumped-up charges. Stéphane
asks the old man if he knows the location of a hotel, but the gypsy
only wants to share his bottle with the young man, and pour out his
complaints about the Romanian judicial system.
Stéphane listens patiently, shares from the bottle, but still has a
warm bed on his mind. Finally he has an inspiration. He takes out the
tape and plays it for the gypsy. "Do you know who she is? Do you know
where I can find her?" From that moment on, Izidor is drawn to the
young man, who becomes a surrogate son. They go back to the gypsy
village where Izidor gives Stéphane his own bed.
The next morning the villagers are shocked by the presence of a "gadjo
dilo" (crazy outsider) in their midst. They surround Izidor and press
him with questions. How can he guarantee that Stéphane is not there to
steal their chickens, since "gadjos" can never be trusted. The joke,
of course, is that the gypsies project on to the outsider exactly the
same fears that outside society has of them.
Stéphane enjoys gypsy hospitality for several days, but announces to
Izidor that it is time for him to move on. He must track down the
singer of his father's tape. Izidor pressures his surrogate son to
stay for a few days more, and then the days turn into months. As
Stéphane learns to speak their language, they lose their distrust of
him. He takes part in their rituals and travels about the countryside
with them on various adventures, including performances by the skilled
musicians from Izidor's village.
The film was directed by Tony Gatlif, who made the award-winning
documentary "Latcho Drom" in 1993, which depicts gypsy musicians in
performance across the planet, from India to Spain. Gatlif is a gypsy
himself, born in Algeria in 1948. "Latcho Drom" was part two of a
trilogy on gypsy culture, that began with the 1982 feature "Les
Princes." "Gadjo Dilo" is the final installment.
Ultimately Stéphane becomes assimilated totally into gypsy society. He
falls in love with Sabina [Rona Hartner] who initially wards off the
"gadjo." When he proves to her that he has cut his ties with
"outsider" society, she takes him into her tent where they make
passionate love.
In the climax of the film, Izidor's son Adrjani [Florin Moldovan] is
released from jail and there is an joyous celebration in the gypsy
village. The joy is short-lived, as Arjani and two accomplices go to
town and track down the local official who victimized him. They murder
him in a saloon in full view of the townsfolk. This leads to a raid on
the gypsy village and the death of both Izidor and Adrjani.
While the film does not explore the underlying tensions between
Romanians and gypsies, there is little doubt that it is related to the
social disintegration following the fall of Ceaucescu. In a time of
worsening economic conditions, gypsies become a convenient scapegoat
just as they were in the 1930s when fascism was on the rise.
Anti-gypsy racism is on the increase everywhere, including Vaclav
Havel's "enlightened" Czechoslovakia. A gypsy reporter writes:
"Voicing stereotypes common throughout Europe, Czechs claim that Roma,
with their traditionally large families, are a drain on the social
service budget and live better than Czechs with jobs. They regard Roma
as dishonest and often criminal. In a 1996 poll cited in the U.S.
State Department's human rights report, 35 percent of Czechs favored
'concentrating and isolating the Roma' and 45 percent supported
'moving the Roma out of the Czech Republic if possible.'"
As a Marxist, I have always been interested in "exceptions" to normal
bourgeois society. There is no greater exception than the gypsies, who
resist assimilation like no other people. They originated on the west
coast of India in the early middle ages and soon migrated into the
middle east. They arrived in Europe by the fourteenth century, and now
number more than 8 million there. They have always tried to find ways
to avoid the confinements of wage-labor. By the same token, they show
little interest in becoming captains of industry. While racist
mythology paints them as thieves, most are hard-working. Patrin, a web
page devoted to Roma (gypsy) culture and history states:
"For a collective economic effort, Roma may form a purely functional
association, the kumpaniya, whose members do not necessarily belong to
the same clan or even the same dialect group. Individually, many Roma
are peddlers, especially in Europe. Some sell goods they have bought
cheaply. Others sell what they make themselves, although in the
twentieth century a number of Romani crafts have suffered from
competition with mass-produced articles. 
"There are certain staple Romani occupations, such as horse trading,
metalworking, dealing in scrap metal, and vegetable or fruit picking
in some countries. In gaining a livelihood, the women play their full
part. It is they who often sell their wares from door to door and who
do the fortune telling. Among the Vlad-speaking Roma in the United
States, this latter profession, known as 'reading and advising,' is
still widespread."
Bourgeois society has always had great difficulties with peoples who
remain economically and culturally distinct. Like the gypsy, the Jews
have historically been outsiders. During the nineteenth century,
Eastern European Jewry existed on the fringes of bourgeois society as
pawnbrokers, tax-collectors, saloon-keepers, etc. Christian society
encountered them not only as an undifferentiated economic bloc, they
also saw them as an alien presence, with their Yiddish language, their
strange garb and religious beliefs. During times of relative economic
stability, the Jew and gypsy was tolerated. During times of duress,
they became scapegoats. And during the time of complete economic
collapse in post-WWI Europe, they functioned as the ultimate
scapegoats and were exterminated.
Today the Jews have become assimilated into bourgeois society. In the
United States, they are virtually indistinguishable from other
Americans. The gypsy, like the American Indian, remains unassimilated.
There are pressures on both peoples to meld with the outside world.
Like the American Indian, the gypsies face continuing cultural and
economic genocide. As is the case for American Indians, one of the big
worries for gypsy society is the disappearance of their language.
Tony Gatlif's "Gadjo Dilo" can be seen as part of the larger effort to
preserve gypsy culture and society. Ironically, it is Stéphane the
"outsider" who is assimilated into their culture and not the other way
round. It is not too hard to identify with him as he discovers the
joys of everyday gypsy life. There is a closeness and honesty that is
obviously missing from the colorless and competitive world of
bourgeois society. As our own society becomes more alienated and
hate-filled--to the extent that fourteen year olds bring automatic
weapons to school for the purpose of mass murder--, we will inevitably
begin to think about alternatives to our own materialist values.
At this point many people will be tempted to find a way to assimilate
into "outsider" societies, like Stéphane did into the gypsies. In many
ways, this was what the 1960s counter-culture was all about.
Unfortunately, these solutions can only exist for individuals, and not
for greater society which revolves around the cash nexus. The crying
need is for some sort of economic system that can make the freedom and
solidarity of the gypsy village depicted in "Gadjo Dilo" universal.
("Gadjo Dilo" is scheduled for theatrical release on July 10, 1998)
(For Marxist discussion: //www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Title
Review for O Que É Isso, Companheiro? (1997)
>From time to time I think about writing a novel based on my
experiences in the American Trotskyist movement. I have never followed
through on this project because deep down I realize that the beliefs
of the people in this movement were too different from those of
ordinary Americans. How could I possibly convey the reality of
revolutionary politics to people who view politics as nothing more
than what they do on election day?
The makers of "Four Days in September" faced a similar problem. How
could they make a film based on the characters and events depicted in
Fernando Gabeira's book "O que é isso, companheiro" (What's Up
Comrade?) and still draw an audience? Gabeira was a member of a
Brazilian terrorist cell that kidnapped the American Ambassador
Charles Elrick in September, 1969. They sought to protest the military
dictatorship that had just seized power, and win freedom for
imprisoned comrades.
Director Bruno Barreto, best known for his "Dona Flor and Her Two
Husbands," simply decided to dump the politics to make the film
palatable. "I did not make a film about politics but about human
beings. I did not make a film about ideas, but about the fears,
desires and tensions involved in a specific episode. Besides, no one
would be able to stand to listen to the actual way the terrorists
spoke at the time."
Without politics, the film becomes a banal crime melodrama. Except for
the occasional rhetorical flourish about the "Revolution," the
characters mainly discuss the technical details of the kidnapping. To
sustain the audience's interest, Barreto emphasizes human
relationships that have little to do with politics. There is a budding
romance between Maria [Fernanda Torres], the ringleader, and Gabeira
[Pedro Cardoso]. A filial bond develops between Gabeira and Elrick
[Alan Arkin] who turns out to be a liberal opposed to the war in
Vietnam and the military dictatorship in Brazil. A key scene shows
Gabeira allowing Elrick to view him with his mask off, thereby
revealing his humanity.
Gabeira develops a crush on  Maria when he is first sworn into the
terrorist cell. During the ceremony, she harangues the young recruits.
She assigns them each a nom de guerre: Fernando Gabeira then becomes
"Paulo." Along with their real names, they must leave behind all
normal human feelings that they had in their previous life. This scene
evokes the witch-hunt iconography of potboilers like the 1951 classic
"I Was A Communist For the FBI." These propaganda pieces inevitably
include a fanatical but beautiful female Communist cell leader who
makes speeches about how love is a bourgeois diversion.
In the production notes, Fernanda Torres is contemptuous of the
character she plays. She says, "Maria was sort of a 'sergeant' in the
group, and, to my mind, the least credible character in the script. I
wasn't alive when the kidnapping took place so I can't be sure if
militant political women really behaved like that." One can only
wonder why Torres accepted the role if she has so little
identification with the character and shows so little interest in
finding out about what made such a character tick. Perhaps there is no
tradition of method acting in Brazil. According to the principles
method acting, character portrayal grows out the totality of the
character's social relations. The actor must try to go beyond the
dimensions of the script and immerse him or herself in the social
milieu of the character. This might mean driving a cab if the
character is a cabdriver. Of course, such background research would
have done little to add depth to a character whose dialog consists
mainly of worries over whether the kidnapping will be carried out
successfully, punctuated by tone-deaf "radical" rhetoric.
After a major bank robbery, Maria's gang decides to kidnap the
American Ambassador. Such an operation requires outside assistance so
they call in Toledo [Nelson Dantas] and Jonas [Matheus Nachtegaele],
two veterans of the terrorist movement. Toledo is a man in his sixties
who fought in the Spanish Civil War, while Jonas is a young
working-class militant who is even more unsmiling and case-hardened
than Maria herself. Jonas, who takes over the operation, warns the
rest of the group that he will shoot anybody who disobeys his orders.
For the remainder of the film, Toledo and Jonas are absorbed in the
technical details of the kidnapping and we never discover who they
really are or what they believe.
In a letter to his wife, Elrick confesses his inability to understand
the fanaticism of Jonas. It never would have occurred to Leopoldo
Serran, the screenwriter, to fill in some background on such a
character. Like the rest of the people associated with the project, he
was hostile to leftist politics. He kept  resisting Barreto's
invitation to write a script based on Gabeira's memoir. "I refused
several times, because I disagreed with many of the leftist principles
and practices, and I could not agree to do anything complimentary or
biased."
Perhaps Serran might have fleshed out such a character by studying the
life of one of Brazil's most famous workers, Lula of the Workers
Party. He was the youngest of 8 children born to subsistence farmers.
In 1956, the family moved to Sao Paulo, where they dwelled in one room
at the back of a bar and shared the bathroom with bar customers. Lula,
unlike the terrorists of the 1969 generation, became the leader of a
mass social movement. The same sense of indignation that committed him
to peaceful change, however, must have fueled Jonas. It would have
made for a much richer film if Jonas spoke openly about the
circumstances that led him to such extremist politics.
Toledo, admittedly a secondary character, only speaks about his doubts
over the success of the kidnapping. It would have been interesting to
find out something about the life of a character old enough to be a
grandfather, who has decided to take such drastic measures. (It is
rather dubious that a Spanish Civil War veteran would have ever joined
a terrorist plot, since these activists had an orientation to mass
action. We would be asking too much from a film that had so little
interest in politics to try to explain this anomaly)
Serran's enthusiasm is not for characters like these with their
obnoxious left-wing politics. He invests all of his power as a
playwright into the character of Henrique [Marco Ricca], the cop in
charge of capturing the kidnappers. Henrique feels torn between duty
and revulsion over the torture he carries out against revolutionaries
in the basement of his police station as part of his job. For Serran,
there is a sexual aspect to torture which is reflected in the script.
Henrique mentions to his partner that a political prisoner has fallen
in love with and married one Pecanha, a cop who tortured her. That
Serran would even consider such an event as within the realm of
possibility shows how detached he is from the reality of police
repression. One can only hope that he never accepts an assignment to
write a screenplay based on Tomas Borge's memoir. Somoza's torturers
beat this Sandinista leader in the testicles repeatedly during his
imprisonment until he lost his manhood.
Ultimately "Four Days in September" is repression without violence. It
represses the real beliefs and the real motivations of the terrorist
band, as much as a gag over the mouth of a prisoner does. As difficult
as it would have been to translate the lives of terrorists into a
commercially viable film, a production company with some sympathy for
the left should have made the attempt. The director, the screenwriter
and the actors are all complicit in covering up the history of the
desperate and marginal Brazilian urban underground. The key to an
authentic and dramatically convincing film would have been in
uncovering the history of each character. Without such histories, the
overall history of the times remains a mystery.

Title
Review for Smoke Signals (1998)
Written by Coeur D'Alene Sherman Alexie, directed by Cheyenne/Arapaho
Chris Eyre and starring American Indians, "Smoke Signals" is a
deceptively "small" movie. While lacking the big budget elements of
the plastic commercial blockbusters featuring Arnold or Tom or Julia,
it is from another perspective much grander than those types of films.
It evokes William Blake's lines in "Auguries of Innocence":
Structured as a picaresque "road movie", "Smoke Signals" (based on
Alexie's short story collection "The Lone Ranger and Tonto Fistfight
in Heaven") depicts a journey from the Coeur D'Alene reservation in
Idaho to Phoenix by two teen-aged Indians, Victor Joseph (Adam Beach)
and Thomas Builds-the-Fire (Evan Adams). Victor's father Arnold (Gary
Farmer) has just died and Victor is sent to return his ashes to the
reservation. Thomas, whom Victor regards as something of a pest,
pleads to be taken along.
Their relation to each other and to Victor's dead father supplies the
central dramatic impulse for the film. While guests are asleep
following a drunken party at the house of Thomas's parents on the
fourth of July in 1976, Arnold accidentally starts a fire with a
sparkler he is waving drunkenly. The infants Thomas and Victor are
saved from the fire but Thomas's parents die in the flames. Thomas is
rescued by Arnold, who catches him from a second story window. This
act lends a certain grandeur to Arnold in Thomas's eyes, but for
Victor his father is just a wife-beating drunk. Structured around a
series of flashbacks, we see Arnold trying to impress the young Victor
with magic tricks while in the next moment slapping his face for
accidentally spilling some beer.
During a long bus ride, Victor and Thomas discuss what it means to be
an Indian as well as what it means to be a human being in the larger
sense. Victor is a suspicious and angry young man who excels in
sports, while Thomas is warm, accepting and physically
unprepossessing. Thomas is also a visionary and a story-teller, who
occasionally drives Victor to distraction with his spontaneous
Shaman-like tales. Victor is also on a reclamation project to make
Thomas look "more Indian". This means getting him to get rid of the
nerdy looking business suit he wears and his braids. While Victor's
idea of being Indian has a lot to do with image, we (and Victor)
discover that Thomas is in touch with older and more genuine
indigenous roots as the film takes shape. Thomas's nonstop musings
serve as the central "voice" of the movie as he constantly babbles
about family, traditions, ancestors and values. While Victor glares at
him during these rhapsodies, he is eventually seduced, as are we.
Much of the film's power has to do with its honesty, both in the way
the characters are depicted and also in its use of on-location filming
at the Coeur D'Alene reservation which, like most reservations, is
literally in the middle of nowhere. It reminded me much of what I have
heard from Jim Craven about the Blackfoot Reservation in Montana. It
is a mixture of rugged mountainous landscape with meager ramshackle
housing and tacky general stores run by whites. Director Chris Eyre
has found a way to capture both aspects of the reservation, so the
audience understands both the lingering attraction of the reservation
and what drives its inhabitants to desperation. One of the nicest
touches is Thomas and Victor getting a hitch to the bus stop by two
teenaged girls in a jalopy stuck in reverse. Before they allow the two
boys in, they demand a payment for the ride. Thomas suggests a story
as barter and proceeds to spin out a wry tale of Arnold Joseph as a
militant Indian antiwar hippie in 1967, to Victor's customary chagrin.
To Victor's complaint that this never happened, Thomas responds with a
smile and a shrug of the shoulders.
Interviews with Sherman Alexie during the publicity campaign
surrounding the film's debut last year depict a man who appears to be
a combination of Thomas, and both Victor and Arnold Joseph. Alexie is
6'2" and played basketball during his student days. Physical prowess
did not come easy to him, however. He was born hydrocephalic and
underwent brain surgery at the age of 6 months. He wasn't expected to
survive and, if he did, the doctors expected him to be left mentally
retarded.
Like many sickly children, Alexie took comfort in books. This
eventually led him into a writing program at Washington State
University and early successes in poetry and prose. Success has not
come easy to him, however, and he has had to battle alcoholism. He has
also had a troubled relation with his own father, who worked as a
truck driver and logger on and off the reservation. He says, "We've
had difficulty, mostly when were younger. We're at the point where I
love him, but I'm pissed off at him. And I can tell him both things."
(Minneapolis Star Tribune, July 8, 1998)
Alexie describes "Smoke Signals" as a challenge to the cinematic
history of Indians. "In most films, Indians have been stoic. That's
the stereotype of what Indians are supposed to be--stoic and
alcoholic, depressed poor people. But in fact, Indians are the most
joyous people in the world. The two funniest groups I've been around
have been Indians and Jews. So I guess there's something to be said
about the inherent humor of genocide."
Another challenge to preconceived expectations is what has been
happening to the Coeur D'Alene people economically.
Since opening a modest bingo hall and casino in 1992, the reservation
has become an "economic powerhouse" in the northern Idaho Panhandle,
according to an August 14, 1998 Washington Post article. More than
$100 million in land and facilities is held and another $60 million is
slated for construction.
The Post article points out that the Coeur D'Alene view casinos as a
means to an end, that being a diversified economic structure including
industrial parks to golf courses, which they believe will be more
dependable and long-lasting than casinos. David J. Matheson, their
chief executive officer for gaming, says, "Ultimately, we'd like
gaming to be a footnote in our history, to be able to say that it was
here and we used it for a purpose because we chose to. But my ultimate
hope is that someday we can phase out gaming entirely."
For the average reservation resident, the income has made a
difference. Charlotte Nilson got a degree at Lewis and Clark College
in Lewiston, 75 miles south of the rez. "There are no limits to what
we can do. We can do just about anything we want to do."
Leaving aside the question of whether other economic resources might
have entailed less loss of cultural autonomy, a backlash is growing in
Washington against the system which allowed casinos to be built.
Lawmakers seek to remove tribal autonomy and exemption from local and
state taxes. The Coeur D'Alene are also under attack for launching
U.S. Lottery, the first American Indian gambling site on the Internet.
While the Coeur D'Alene are determined to protect their right to use
gaming for the collective benefit of the people, their real priorities
are on projects like a Wellness Center that is meant to fight
unhealthy habits in Indian country, including obesity, alcoholism and
drug abuse.
Another important project is the eventual purchase of world-famous
Coeur D'Alene Resort, 40 miles north of the reservation. The state
court has ruled that the lake the resort sits on is Indian property,
ceded by the federal government before Idaho statehood.
In 1991 the tribe filed a massive lawsuit against the local silver,
lead and zinc mining industries for dumping millions of tons of heavy
metals into the Coeur D'Alene watershed, which also fouled the lake.
Today, the site is the nation's second largest Superfund cleanup
project, expected to cost $120 million.
The current owner of the resort said that he'd be surprised if the
entire lake came under Indian control. But if it did, he said, "I
think the tribe would be good stewards. They have a long history of
deep concern for the lake, and I think however it turns out, its
beauty will be retained."
I want to thank long time cyberfriend Ya-ZZZ, a Cherokee wisewoman,
for recommending "Smoke Signal" and also the way she recommended it. 
Marxist discussion is at: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Title
Review for Yi ge dou bu neng shao (1999)
13-year old Wei (Wei Minzhi) has just shown up at a poor, remote and
barren Chinese farming village on the foothills of a mountain. She is
there to substitute teach in the local primary school for one month.
Nobody--including us, the audience of "Not One Less"--expects much.
Our expectations are diminished on two levels. We consider it unlikely
that an untrained youngster could educate a roomful of unruly students
just a few years younger than herself. Also, we consider it unlikely
that a feature film based on such a situation and using a
non-professional cast can entertain. Director Zhang Yimou, best known
for ambitious period dramas like "Raise the Red Lantern," takes such
modest material and transforms it into a powerful neo-realist story
that evokes the larger drama unfolding in Chinese society. 
"Not One Less," second cousin to other recent neo-realist works such
as the Brazilian "Central Station" and the American "La Ciudad," is an
advocate for the victims of the global economic transformation some
call "neoliberalism." Poor rural folk, who are losers in the
free-market lottery society, have to eke out a living on the margins
of bustling urban centers. Their only hope is to find a way to crack
into the successful inner circle of the city folk. The neo-realist
genre of today questions whether such a pursuit is really worth it.
The movie's title derives from an informal contract between the
school's regular teacher and Wei. After he returns from his one month
leave of absence, she will be paid 57 yuan. But only if every student
is still in attendance. Not only is he parsimonious with the wage
contract, he also doles out supplies with an eye-dropper. He counts
out 26 pieces of chalk, one for each day of the month excluding
Sundays. Since the one room school is falling apart at the seams, we
understand that the teacher has no alternative. As we might expect, a
form of "TINA" has found its way into the nooks and crannies of
Chinese socialist society. If a poor farming village can not provide
commodities for the world market, why would we expect a classroom to
reflect anything different from the surrounding poverty?
As he spells out her duties, it is clear that she is barely up to the
task. Since she doesn't know the first thing about teaching, the best
she can do is copy lessons from the teacher's textbook on the
blackboard--making sure not to exceed her chalk ration for that day.
After she has finished transcribing the words, the students will then
dutifully enter them into their composition books. He reminds her that
since the chalk is so precious, she should be careful not to waste it.
She should write large enough so that the students can see the
characters on the board, but not too large. Pointing to the barnyard
outside the schoolroom, he says that the size of a donkey turd is just
about right. Wei asks the teacher when she should dismiss the students
each day. Since there is no clock in the schoolroom, he explains that
the day ends when the setting sun falls upon a pole at one end of the
room. What if it is overcast? Then send them home early.
For the first few days, as we might expect, chaos rules in the
classroom. After Wei has finished transcribing a lesson on the board,
she closes the door on the students like a jailer and sits on the
front stoop playing with her fingers. Only when they begin to run
wild, she goes back into the schoolroom and tries to restore order.
The most disruptive student is Zhang (Zhang Huike), a boy who enjoys
being the class clown and defying Wei. What he does not realize is
that Wei is as strong-willed as him and will not allow him to have his
way. The relationship between these two characters shapes the
narrative of the film, especially when Zhang is forced to leave school
and go to the city to find work. Although he has made things rough for
her in the classroom, she needs to track him down in the city and
bring him back to the school because of the "not one less" contract.
But it is not just money that motivates her. She understands that a
young child on his own has little chance of survival in the city.
Getting to the city is no easy task since she lacks the money for bus
fare. Her students have now begun to rally around her and pledge to
help raise the necessary funds. Accompanied by them like the Pied
Piper, she marches off to a nearby brick factory where they hope to
make some money moving bricks from one place to another. The wages, as
you would expect, are meager. This scene evokes the scene in "La
Ciudad," where Latino workers spend an entire day in the rubble of
demolished buildings cleaning bricks. As in "La Ciudad" there is a
struggle to get a sufficient wage. Wei and the students bicker with
the factory owner after their job is done--done without his knowledge
or permission in fact--to get him to fork over the yuans necessary to
pay her bus fare.
Haggling over money is a persistent theme throughout the film and the
director Zhang leaves no doubt as to his disgust with the cash nexus
overtaking China. It is difficult to think of another film in recent
history which features so many scenes involving struggles over fees,
wages, prices and debts. It is reminiscent in some ways of a Balzac
novel, which inevitably depicts the denizens of Paris involved in
similar haggling. 19th century Paris, like the cities being
transformed in China today, are battlegrounds over the most universal
of commodities: money.
When Wei arrives in the city, she begins her search in the railroad
station. Like the "Central Station" in the Brazilian film, this
central station is filled with the poor and the displaced. It is used
as a bedroom and bathroom for people who have no other place to go. It
is also a magnet for youngsters who are either begging or stealing to
survive. Wei's search begins here but she soon ends up walking up and
down the streets of the city, appearing as forlorn and as displaced as
the Latinos in "La Ciudad." Her encounters with the impatient and
money-driven urban dwellers do not deter her, however. This young
woman who will not cry uncle symbolizes the peasant roots of the
Chinese revolution, which the director Zhang has not lost sight of.
Even when she forgets the words to the militant Maoist Chinese
national anthem, there is no question as to her class instincts.
Reviewers of "Not One Less" have dwelled on what is considered an
artificial happy ending, which they view as a token to government
pressure. To make a film that was uncompromisingly bleak, they argue,
is impossible in today's China where the hostile economic forces being
depicted in the film have official government sanction.
This is a facile view as one might expect from critics in an
imperialist country that is responsible for the economic
contradictions that forced China to retreat from socialism in the
first place. When a major Hollywood studio bankrolls a film like "La
Ciudad," then these critics might have stronger grounds for such
sanctimonious criticisms. In the meantime, there is much that
socialists can take heart from in "Not One Less." It is a sign that
the embers of social justice have not been extinguished in China. For
as long as directors like Zhang Yimou are given a platform in China,
there is evidence that the revolutionary spirit has not been
vanquished.

Title
Review for Welcome To Sarajevo (1997)
Director Michael Winterbottom's "Welcome to Sarajevo" is a rancid and
self-righteous film that reflects the pro-interventionist outlook of
the "laptop bombardiers." During the civil war in former Yugoslavia,
this group, which included such notables as NY Times editorialist
Anthony Lewis and cultural critic Susan Sontag, advocated NATO bombing
of the Bosnian Serbs. In their moral calculus, the Muslims stood for
European Jewry in the late 1930s, while the Serbs were the moral and
political equivalent of Hitler's executioners.
Frank Boyce bases his screenplay on British journalist Michael
Nicolson's "Natasha's Story," an account of his attempt to adopt a
Bosnian child. He seeks to spirit her out of Sarajevo to England where
he can provide a pleasant life for her in his comfortable home. This
story is supposed to lift our spirits and make us believe that there
is one good human being left on earth. Stephen Dillane plays the
saintly British journalist, whom we encounter in opening scenes as a
prototypical cynical Western television reporter trying to come up
with lurid footage of urban battle casualties. The reporters in
Sarajevo send back footage like this to their studios each day. Their
job is to provide the sort of visceral shock on the evening world
report that stories about tenement fires and auto crashes provide for
local news coverage. Woody Harrelson plays Flynn, a star American
journalist who has a daredevil attitude toward street fighting. As
long as there is gripping footage to be shot, the hard-drinking Flynn
will dodge bullets and be there first. Now that the film has
established cynical, risk-taking, hard-drinking reporters as the
central male characters, one wonders where it can drift next in an
ocean of clich=E9.
The answer to this question is Nina (Marisa Tomei), the head of an
orphanage, and Emira (Emira Nusevic), the fetching young orphan girl
he decides to rescue from the hell of Sarajevo. Nina is everything
that the reporters are not: idealistic, selfless and pure. Which is to
say that she is as lacking in complexity as they are. Emira reminds
one of the sort of children who used to pop up in Hollywood war movies
in the 1950s. These adorable Italian or Korean war orphans are adopted
by some grizzled, war-weary American infantry company after begging
for a chocolate bar. Aldo Ray would play the Sergeant while Dana
Andrews would be cast as the Lieutenant. The children, according to
formula, are never German or Japanese. That would not be marketable.
The Bosnian Serbs, according to the formula of 1950's war movies, are
Terminators put on earth to kill innocent people. God only knows why.
They are ruthless killing machines whom any reasonable, humane person
would like to see destroyed by a NATO bomb. The film version of the
British journalist at one point confesses to a Bosnian Muslim that he
feels shame over the failure of his government to bomb the Serbs into
oblivion.
To prove how inhuman the Serbs are, the film includes a horrifying
scene. A bus carrying the orphaned children out of Sarajevo into the
safety of Italy is stopped at gun-point by ranting Serb soldiers. They
board the bus and take Muslim babies with them, presumably to be
barbecued and eaten later. It is astonishing that "Welcome to
Sarajevo" puts forward the notion that the Serb army would exterminate
innocent children in this manner. The real crime of "ethnic cleansing"
was beastly enough, but it was designed to carve out pieces of Bosnian
territory in order to exclude one ethnic group or another, not
exterminate them. While the Serbs were certainly more aggressive than
the Muslims, both sides took part in the blood-letting.
A much more powerful scene would have dramatized how Muslim and
Serbian villagers, who lived peacefully for generations, came to the
boiling point and eventually decided to destroy each other. This was
not the agenda of the film-makers who were more interested in a
good-versus-evil scenario rather than the complexities of the
Yugoslavia tragedy. The production notes indicate how little the
film's creators understood about Yugoslavian history. It blames the
war on "rivalries between the Serbian, Croatian and Muslim communities
in the region" that "go back centuries."
Catherine Samary observes in "Yugoslavia Dismembered" (Monthly Review,
1995) that peace between various ethnic groups was possible when there
was economic well-being:
"The periods of Yugoslavia's or Bosnia-Herzegovina's greatest cohesion
corresponded to the times when the populations concerned experienced
real gains in living standards and rights. It was by contrast threats
to those gains during the 1980s--not interethnic hatred--that gave
rise to Yugoslavia's fragmentation. The socioeconomic and political
crisis of the 1980s was in this respect a turning point."
The author of "Natasha's Story" and the director and screenwriter of
"Welcome to Sarajevo" are not interested in this history of real human
beings. All of Bosnia is simply a backdrop for the narcissistic
display of the British journalist who wants to prove to the world that
he is better than everybody. In a scene that reveals his inability to
empathize with the people of Yugoslavia, he confronts the mother of
the child he seeks to adopt. She is a cigarette-smoking, slatternly
woman who nobody in their right mind would want to put in custody of a
child. She has one final phone conversation with her daughter, who is
safe and happy in England, and the two fail to communicate. Her
daughter says that she never wants to come back to Sarajevo again.
This spells victory for the British journalist, who was anxious that
the mother would regain custody of the child. He is everything that
the unfortunate Yugoslavians are not. He is clean, tobacco-free and
sensible. They, on the other hand, are violent, self-destructive and
irrational chain-smokers. Why can't everybody get a proper public
school education like the protagonist and learn proper, civilized
values. This is the rankest sort of hypocrisy. It was the United
States, England and other European powers that brought down poor
Yugoslavia, awash in debt in the 1980s, just as they are bringing down
Thailand and Malaysia today.
Someday there might be a film about the tragic civil war in former
Yugoslavia that will probe the causes of the horrible destruction of
life and property. It certainly can't come from writers and directors
who are cocksure of their "civilizing" mandate. Fortunately, NATO
bombers never got involved in the civil war. If they did, it is
entirely possible that the war would have spilled beyond the borders
of Yugoslavia and involved the former Soviet Union in the fighting. As
"Welcome to Sarajevo" appears several years after the conclusion of
the war, it  lacks the propaganda power to spark intensified fighting.
As politics, it is retrograde. As film, it is cliché. This is a movie
to avoid.

Title
Review for My Name Is Joe (1998)
Ken Loach's "My Name is Joe" is his greatest film. He has returned to
the gritty world of the earlier "Riff Raff", one hemmed in by poverty,
drug addiction and slum housing. What is different this time is that
he has created characters whose humanity soars above their miserable
settings. Out of the depths of a mean Glasgow neighborhood Loach has
fashioned a love story that is among the greatest I have seen in a
movie. What gives this love story such poignancy is that while wanting
to see it succeed--partly because of the charisma of Joe, the central
character--one can not forget for a moment that it will likely fail
because of the weight of the social conditions.
Joe Kavanagh (Peter Mullan) is a recovering alcoholic on the dole. He
supplements his meager income with an odd job picked up here and
there. His main passion is the soccer team he coaches, which is made
up of losers like him. Not only are some on the dole, they are also
petty thieves and recovering junkies. On the afternoon of a game, he
runs into Sarah (Louise Goodall), a public health social worker out to
visit Liam, one of his players. They argue whether Liam (Davie McKay)
should stay for the interview she has set up with him, his girl-friend
Sabine (Anne-Marie Kennedy) and their young child, or go off with the
team. She is a bit too insistent for Joe and he says that people like
her must think the sun shines out of their arses. Since he says it
with a disarming smile, and since she is a trained social worker used
to working-class resentment, she lets it slide.
Later that day, Joe spots her fumbling with some rolls of wallpaper
that have fallen out of the trunk of her car. He stops his van and
goes up to help her out. He proposes that he and a mate can come round
that weekend and do the job for her, at half the price of a regular
contractor. Even if the sun is shining out of her arse, she asks him
with a smile.
In a classic Loach comic interlude, as Joe and Shanks (Gary Lewis),
his best friend, drive out to Sarah's place to do the job, they fret
over how they've never wall-papered anything in their lives. In
particular they worry if a ceiling has to be wall-papered as part of
the job. Of course when they step foot in the apartment, the camera
reveals a scraped ceiling all set to be papered. Shanks and Joe try to
con her out of doing the ceiling. Who's living upstairs, Shanks asks.
A couple of students, she replies. Ah, that won't be good--students
have parties and the wallpaper won't stand up to the pounding.
In the course of the job, Joe takes a tea break and joins Sarah in the
kitchen. They discover that they share a love for classic
rock-and-roll and quiz each other about who wrote each song that they
sing to each other off-key. By the end of the afternoon, they are
flirting good-naturedly with each other. When Joe and Shanks return
that evening to Joe's place for a game of chess, they discuss the
possibility of Joe taking Sarah out for a date. How much is a dinner
nowadays, ask Joe. When Shanks tells him, Joe just winces. Shanks
suggests a cheap date: why doesn't he take her bowling.
They do go bowling and this is the start of a romance between the two
that is unlike any I have ever seen on the screen. While Joe is
ruggedly handsome, his hair is thinning and there is a suggestion of
the need for some dental work. He is turning thirty-eight and it is
clear that all the years of hard drinking have taken their toll. Sarah
is attractive in an unadorned sort of way, but Joe's passion for her
seems more related to her honesty and warmth than her physical beauty.
In their love-making scenes, there is more chemistry than in all the
Hollywood movies starring Brad Pitt, Gwyneth Paltrow, Val Kilmer and
Julia Roberts put together. The reason for this is that Joe and Sarah
are real people who you can identify with, and real life is much
sexier than the plastic fantasy-world Hollywood specializes in.
In addition to their love, Joe and Sarah share the frustrations of
having to deal with Liam and Sabine, who can barely keep their family
going. He had been released from jail the year before for dealing
drugs and now she has picked up where he has left off. He wants her to
stop dealing, but she needs the money to support her own habit.
Her supplier is a thug named MacGowan (David Hayman), who is always
accompanied by a posse of hulking men in leather coats. Joe used to be
in MacGowan's gang when he was on the booze, but has nothing to do
with him nowadays. Unfortunately, events have conspired to bring them
back together. Sabine owes MacGowan money from drugs she has shot up
instead of selling on the street. He gives Liam a choice. Either
Sabine will go to work as a whore to pay off the debt, or his legs
will be broken. When Joe finds out about this, he goes to MacGowan to
intercede on Liam's behalf. Fine, MacGowan tells him, do a couple of
jobs for me and the debt will be forgiven.
When Joe decides to take up MacGowan's offer, not only does he finds
himself sliding back into his old ways, he discovers that Sarah will
not accept him now that he has become a gangster himself. He tries to
defend himself: in his world, you sometimes have no choice. His plea
falls on deaf ears and Sarah leaves him.
The clash between the hardscrabble world of survival in a Glasgow slum
and the love of a man for a woman, who is not part of that world,
grows out thematically from what some critics would ascribe to Ken
Loach's quaintly old-fashioned notions of what movies should be about.
Rather than making films about monsters set loose on rocket ships, or
love affairs between people who never have to worry about where their
next meal is coming from, Loach pays full attention to the lives of
real people facing real economic hardship.
He is a throwback to the Depression era in many ways. His camera
studies the same landscape of artists like Ben Shahn or novelists like
Henry Roth. As critic David Shapiro points out in the introduction of
his book on social realist art, this school's "only landscapes are at
least partly cityscapes--a decaying mining village, or shacks along
the railroad tracks. A variety of genre painting, Social Realism takes
as its main subject certain significant or dramatic moments in the
lives of ordinary poor people. The moments in their lives selected
(and it is always a moment in someone's life--it is hard to think of
Social Realist painting that does not include a human being) are
almost always those that in some way focus on the indignity or pathos
of their situation--the hard work they perform. the inadequate rewards
they receive for it, or the miserable conditions they work under.
There is almost always, implied or explicit, a criticism made of the
capitalist system."
It is the rest of the movie making industry that is out of touch, when
you stop and think about it. If the purpose of art is to stir our
emotions and make us think about the human condition, Ken Loach is a
bigger success than anybody. There is nothing old-fashioned about a
Ken Loach movie, especially "My Name is Joe," because loneliness and
economic hardship are alas very much still with us.
(For Marxist discussion: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Title
Review for Brat (1997)
Alexei Balabanov's "Brother," now showing at NYC's Film Forum, is the
first post-Soviet film that accurately reflects life after the fall of
Communism. This cynical, hard-boiled gangster film does not deal in
nostalgia for some glorious Stalinist past, however. Like many new
post-Soviet intellectuals, Balabanov is mesmerized by the callous and
hedonistic society taking shape. The brave new world of drugs,
rock-and-roll, crime and nihilism might be dragging the world down
around them, but the characters in "Brother" plan to have a good time
in the process, like a party on the deck of the sinking Titanic.
Danila (played by Sergei Bodrov, Russia's hottest new actor) has just
arrived in St. Petersburg, formerly Leningrad, to look up his older
brother Viktor (Victor Sohurukov), a free-lance hit-man. Danila has
just finished serving in the Russian army and is unemployed. Without
any fanfare, Viktor drafts his younger brother into the family
business. Viktor asks him if he was taught how to shoot a gun in the
army. The laconic younger brother replies that they took him to the
firing range like everybody else, but he spent most of his time at
h.q.
The running joke of the entire film is that the baby-faced,
sweet-natured younger brother turns out to be the most proficient
killing machine since Rambo. Although he never brags about his
prowess, clearly he has become an expert on the battlefields of
Chechnya or some other post-Soviet killing ground. It is in fact a
Chechen gangster who is Danila's first target. Danila first rents a
room downtown near the market where the Chechen gang boss takes his
morning constitutional and kickbacks from merchants. He then stakes
out the area in disguise, and once he settles on a plan, goes back to
his room where he constructs a bomb made of matchstick heads and
gunpowder to use against the Chechen.
When Danila is not busy killing bad guys, he behaves like any young
Russian. He listens to his favorite rock-and-roll music, played by the
Russian group Nautilus, on his beloved Sony Walkman. He picks up a
street drug peddler after getting paid for his first hit. The
punked-out young woman takes him first to a disco and then to a
private party where everybody is smoking pot, drinking vodka from the
bottle and listening to the latest rock-and-roll. All the young
murderer wants to do is talk about his favorite band, Nautilus.
The telephone wakes Danila early next morning, in the middle of a
terrible hangover. His brother has lined up another job for him. He is
to accompany two creepy hit-men on a raid against a rival gangster.
When they burst in to his apartment, only one of his underlings is
there, whom they bind and gag. Danila asks the other hit-men and the
captive if they have any aspirin. When they reply no, he wanders into
a party in progress upstairs. People are listening to rock-and-roll,
smoking pot, playing pool and conversing pleasantly. They give him
some aspirin and invite him to stay and enjoy himself but he can't
stay because he has business downstairs that must be taken care of.
After returning downstairs to rejoin his fellow killers, he answers a
knock at the door. It turns out to be a invitee to the party upstairs
who has wandered into the wrong place. They pull him into the
apartment and tell him to keep quiet and he won't be harmed. It turns
out that the new captive is a music video director whom Danila
immediately befriends. He also promises him that no harm will come to
him as long as he is there. He then starts to pump the terrified man
all about the music business and raves to him about Nautilus, his
favorite group.
After several hours, when it becomes clear that their intended target
is not going to show up, Danila's fellow hit-men stab the bound and
gagged lieutenant to death. Just as they are about to do the same
thing to the director, Danila intervenes and kills them instead. He
tells the frightened director that he always keeps his promises.
Danila might be a professional killer, but true to gangster film
formalism, he is a professional killer with a heart. In an earlier
scene, he steps into a confrontation between a cowed streetcar
conductor and two hooligans who refuse to pay their fare. He sticks a
gun in their face and makes them pay their fare. Danila's attitude
must strike a strong chord in Russian audiences, who have made this
the highest-grossing film of 1997. Perhaps the only way to deal with
the scum of Russian society is through vigilante action, like the kind
celebrated in Charles Bronson's "Death Wish" films.
Balabanov has clearly immersed himself in American B movies and has
made a movie to compete with them on their own terms. But "Brother"
has more intelligence than this. You sympathize with the main
character, who has lost his moral moorings, because the rest of
society has also. There is no other way to survive. Danila allows
himself to get sucked into the jungle, but tries at the same time to
preserve his own integrity. More than any other professional killer in
cinema history, Danila will remind one of the samurai Toshiro Mifune
played in Yojimbo and Sanjuro. The out-of-work swordsman hires himself
out to gangsters and warlords who are making life hell for the
peasants, but brings peace by killing the rivals, one faction after
another.
Organized crime in the former Soviet Union is not only a inviting
topic for film-makers, it is also a genuine problem for those trying
to introduce capitalism there. Fred Weir writes in "Revolution from
Above" that 70 to 80 percent of private industrial and financial
institutions are forced to make payments of 10 to 20 percent of their
annual revenues to organized crime. Two members of the Russian
parliament were murdered by hit-men during 1994-95. Even more
alarmingly for those of us living in New York City or wherever real
estate is at a premium, Weir states that some residents of
well-located Moscow apartments have been murdered in scams aimed at
obtaining ownership of newly privatized apartments.
Meanwhile Russia has just received a $20 billion IMF loan, which
nobody expects to bring the ailing economy to life. Gangsterism will
not disappear either, since it is endemic to the sort of capitalism
that is taking root there. In a society that worships material success
but that does not give outsiders a means to such success, criminality
is just another way to succeed. Meanwhile there is convincing evidence
that drugs are as important to the Mexican economy as oil is to Saudi
Arabia. The downwardly spiraling world economy practically insures
that crime will continue to be big business in Russia and the rest of
the world.
For Marxist discussion: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
Although "film noir" more or less died off as a genre in the 1950s, it
continues to reverberate in such conscious homages as Roman Polanski's
"Chinatown" and the work of the Coen brothers ("Fargo," "Blood
Simple," etc.) We can now add to this body of work Sam Raimi's 1998 "A
Simple Plan."
In the classic noir film we encounter desperate men and women who turn
to crime because society allows them no other outlets. Since radical
politics never appears as an option, the only way to escape class
oppression might be to rob a bank as depicted, for example, in "Odds
Against Tomorrow". The themes of such films are actually traceable to
the great naturalist novels of the late 19th century, which also
depict an underclass struggling against a web of formidable economic
circumstances. 
Film noirs would almost inevitably make their debut during the Great
Depression, when the inescapable reality of economic hardship would
inspire screenwriters such as Abraham Polonsky to depict the opposite
side of a Tom Joad. While Tom Joad, ever the idealist, declares his
intention to change America in the final moments of "Grapes of Wrath,"
a typical film noir character ends up in the clutches of the law only
regretting having been captured.
It was almost inevitable that the long, economic decline of the 1980s
and 90s would eventually spawn a neo-noir genre. Although I doubt if
Sam Raimi's "A Simple Plan" is the first such film, it certainly is
one of the most explicit. It tells the story of three men living in
the rural farmland of the northern United States who stumble across a
downed small airplane in the forest in the dead of winter. The plane
contains the pilot's corpse and a duffel bag containing over four
million dollars. On the spot they decide to keep the money to
themselves. They convince themselves that their "simple plan" can not
go wrong and as we expect from the classic noir films, everything does
go wrong.
Two of the men are brothers. Hank Mitchell (Bill Paxton) is an
accountant at a feed mill, while his brother Jacob (Billy Bob
Thornton) oscillates between low-paying odd jobs and welfare. Jacob's
best friend is Lou (Brent Briscoe), the town trunk, who resents the
college-educated Hank. You know that there is going to be tension
between the two when in the early scene when they discover the loot,
Lou accuses Hank of using high-falutin' words like "insinuate." Why
the fuck couldn't he use a simple word like "hint".
Although Hank has the trappings of a successful man, he too is barely
scraping by, like a clerk in one of Dickens' novels. His pregnant wife
Sarah (Bridget Fonda) is expecting her first child and when she learns
of their discovery not only encourages him to keep the money, but even
resort to further crimes in order to cover their trail. At one point
when he complains to her about the risks involved, she lashes out at
him. Is he going to be satisfied working at the feed mill his entire
life, waiting until his boss dies in order to get a raise? What about
their child? The other kids would laugh at her in school when she is
forced to wear hand-me-downs. And, finally, what about her? Sarah
knows that there is a better world out there and the only keeping her
from it is the lack of money.
Even though Hank is close to the bottom, his brother Jacob is even
lower. He lives in a cheap apartment and dresses shabbily. His
eyeglasses are kept together by adhesive tape. He is too poor to date
and spends most of his time alone or getting drunk with Lou. This is
not the bounteous farmland depicted in television commercials, but the
real one in which farms collapse and their owners are reduced to
poverty, just like Jacob. In a poignant scene at their abandoned
family farm, Jacob tells Hank that his dream is to buy back the farm
and start it back up. With millions available, he simply wants to
return to his roots. We discover that one of the reasons the farm
collapsed was that their father could no afford to keep it going while
Hank remained in college. Finally facing foreclosure, he drove his
truck into a tree and killed himself.
Their "simple plan" unravels almost from the beginning. Lou is at odds
with Hank and Jacob is torn between the two men. Raimi's direction is
superb as he captures the bleak and desperate mood of men trapped in a
situation which allows them to neither return to their original
innocence before discovering the money, nor a successful realization
of their criminal dreams.
Raimi is an odd figure. His best known film was "Darkman", a feverish
treatment on a comic book character who, after being disfigured in a
fire, seeks revenge against the criminals who were responsible. He is
also the producer of the highly successful tongue-in-cheek mythology
TV shows "Xena" and "Hercules". I was surprised to discover him
capable of such a nuanced film. Highly recommended.
Marxist discussion is at: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
"The Blair Witch Project" is the most profitable movie in American
history. Made at a cost of $30,000, it returned $48 million in its
first week of wide release. Its huge box-office success, threadbare
production values and offbeat approach to the horror genre have
generated widespread discussion. What does "The Blair Witch Project"
mean for movie-making in general? Furthermore, what does its dark
theme tell us about the mood of the American society, particularly
among the youth who have catapulted it into success?
Before discussing these questions, it would be worthwhile to consider
the film as film. Made by two neophyte directors, 35 year old Daniel
Myrick and 30 year old Eduardo Sanchez, it depicts in self-referential
fashion--but importantly, absent any sense of irony--the making of a
student documentary in the woods of Maryland where according to legend
a homicidal witch dwells.
The student director Heather (Heather Donohue) is accompanied only by
Michael the cameraman (Michael Williams) and soundman Joshua (Joshua
Leonard). With packs on their back, they descend into the forest on
Halloween looking for interesting footage to use in their film, most
particularly a cemetery where victims of the witch are buried--mostly
children. Heather is a compulsive film-maker and takes shots
continuously, including bags of marshmallows in a supermarket where
they have stocked up for the hike, and of a dead mouse on the side of
the trail. The two young men occasionally get annoyed at her, but she
insists that she is serious about her documentary and wants to get in
as much footage as possible. She is in control not only of the
film--perhaps overly so, but of their safety as well. She has a map
that they keep referring to as they make their way deeper and deeper
into the gloomy autumn woods.
Not too long after they have entered the depths of the forest, they
begin to notice spooky piles of stones on the ground and stick figures
hung from the branches of trees. At night in their tent they hear
indistinct cries outside in the distance. Although nobody ever sees
their source, they are continuously on their minds. Heather takes it
all in stride since all of these elements will only help to make her
film more interesting.
The mood of the film changes drastically when it is discovered that
Josh the soundman has thrown the map into a brook as a gesture of
defiance against the overbearing Heather. At first the three head due
south in hopes of running into a settled area, but after a sixteen
hour hike they end up exactly where they started out from. At night,
after pitching their tent, they again hear the eerie cries from within
the forest, which seem closer now.
The three young film-makers eventually succumb to the dark forces of
the forest and the film purports to be based on their footage, which
survived them. An elaborate website (www.blairwitch.com) has been
created to fill in details that were left out of the theatrical
release. But in keeping with the mock documentary spirit of the film,
the website assumes that the events depicted in the film actually took
place.
"The Blair Witch Project" is really not a movie about ghosts, witches
and monsters. It is about insecurity and it is very good at capturing
the genuinely creepy fears that everybody has about being lost in the
woods. It is a noir version of the scene in "The Wizard of Oz" when
Dorothy and her companions are beset by hostile trees in a dark,
haunted forest. In a July 11, 1999 interview with the NY Daily News,
co-director Myrick says, "What [we] were going after was
identifiability. . .Do you identify with the fear? Being lost in the
woods, everyone's felt that."
Working on a shoe-string budget, the directors and cast improvised the
dialog. They also worked in tense conditions not unlike those that the
film's characters found themselves in. A Newsweek article on the film
reports that "Though the actors would pass an occasional jogger, they
began to feel cut off from the safety of the civilized world."
Since the film has captured the imagination of the public despite
lacking all of the accoutrements of blockbuster films--no film track,
no special effects, no stars--many journalists and academics have
looked closely at it to try to figure out what it reflects about
American society.
In an August 31, 1999 NY Times article on "The Blair Witch Project"
and "Sixth Sense", another blockbuster horror movie, Robert Sklar, a
New York University professor on the editorial board of the left-wing
film magazine Cineaste, speculated that its popularity might be driven
by unease about the millennium. People are "spooked by all the things
that are coming up at this time." He added that the horror genre has
always been cyclical, and that its moments of highest popularity have
coincided with moments of extreme social and cultural dislocation.
"The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari" and "Nosferatu" were popular as silent
films in Europe following the real horrors of World War I and
Hollywood horror films such as "Frankenstein" and "Dracula" made their
mark in the early 1930's, when Americans were struggling with economic
depression. In the 1950's, as Americans were troubled by the atomic
age and the cold war, films like "The Day the Earth Stood Still" and
"The Invasion of the Body Snatchers" depicted alien invaders, giant
bugs and nuclear experiments gone awry.
According to an August 22, 1999 article in the British Independent
newspaper, Todd Boyd, a professor of critical studies at the
University of Southern California's School of Cinema and Television,
believes that new interest in the horror genre is linked to America's
geopolitical climate. When the enemy was more clearly defined, as in
the case of the former Soviet Union, then the monsters in horror
movies could be more clearly and logically. With the collapse of
Communism, he maintains, "You see the US in a bit of disarray in terms
of self-representation ... The evil is not so clear in our
imagination." 
Boyd views the crude hand-held camerawork and lack of even rudimentary
set designs as an attempt to control the technology that had been the
province of Hollywood experts. "By having fear 'in our own hands'
rather than waiting for it to be evoked by visual or aural cues, we
reassert some measure of power in an age of cynicism and impotency."
What such commentaries on the film seem to miss, however, is the
importance of the forest in defining the film's attitude toward the
supernatural. The forest, as much as the witch lurking within it, is a
terrifying force, not unlike Moby Dick or Stephen Spielberg's Great
White Shark in "Jaws." This is not the Arcadian ideal depicted in a
Audubon Society calendar, but a hostile and unpredictable entity that
can gobble you up with no warning.
The young film-makers probably did not have this history in mind when
they sat down to write the scenario for "The Blair Witch Project," but
for as long as humanity has considered its environment, the forest has
often appeared as some kind of hostile force that needed to be
subdued. Such fear of the woods had much to do with European hostility
toward the American Indian who seemed not only at home there, but who
felt no need to tame it. It is appropriate, therefore, in such
mythology for a witch to reside in the forest since such a creature
not only represents defiance of civilized Christian values, but a
belief that we are part of nature ourselves.
Engels writes in "The Dialectics of Nature": "Thus at every step we
are reminded that we by no means rule over nature like a conqueror
over a foreign people, like someone standing outside nature -- but
that we, with flesh, blood and brain, belong to nature, and exist in
its midst, and that all our mastery of it consists in the fact that we
have the advantage over all other creatures of being able to learn its
laws and apply them correctly."
While I am writing this review, helicopters and trucks are spraying
Malathion over the five boroughs of New York City in an effort to kill
encephalitis-bearing mosquitoes. While city government officials claim
that the insecticide is "harmless," they urge New Yorkers to remain
indoors while the spraying is in progress. Since the virus was early
in August, mosquito experts around the country have been surprised and
befuddled that St. Louis encephalitis has turned up so far north and
east.
But the environmentalist Rachel's Weekly (www.rachels.org) cites
scientists who attribute northern migration of plants and animals to
global warming. As northern regions become more like the south,
mosquitoes that carry diseases such as malaria, yellow fever, dengue
fever, and encephalitis extend their range, and move to higher
elevations --thus threatening larger human populations with exposure
to serious infectious diseases.
Perhaps the insecurities about the forest in "The Blair Witch Project"
are an unconscious projection of such real-life horrors, bred by a
capitalist system run amok.
(For Marxist discussion: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Title
Review for Woman of the Year (1942)
Spencer Tracy and Katherine Hepburn made a number of popular movies in 
the 1930s and 40s written specifically as vehicles for the two. He 
starred as a blunt, homespun, no-nonsense sort of guy while she was 
sophisticated, aristocratic and somewhat aloof. The plot centered on 
their clashing characters and inevitably involved his struggle to break 
through her formidable exterior and win her heart. 
"Woman of The Year" was one such movie and it has the rather odd 
distinction of being a propaganda piece, if ambivalent one, for the 
August 1939 Stalin-Hitler non-aggression pact. Hollywood Ten screenwriter 
Ring Lardner Jr. wrote it in collaboration with Michael Kanin. It is 
produced and directed by Joseph L. Mankiewicz and George Stevens. While 
the film was released in 1942, the evidence is clear that it retains the 
isolationist orientation of the prior year when Hitler and Stalin had 
tenuously peaceful relations. 
The Stalin-Hitler pact lasted until June 1941 when the Nazis invaded the 
Soviet Union. Communists around the world, including those on the 
payrolls of Hollywood studios, cheered every foreign policy initiative of 
the Soviet Union. When the Kremlin called for international solidarity on 
behalf of the Spanish Popular Front, Communists around the world rallied 
around the flag. But all of a sudden in 1939, the Kremlin called off the 
crusade against fascism and a new non-interventionist, if not 
isolationist, attitude became politically correct. The Almanac Singers, 
led by Pete Seeger and Woody Guthrie, sang songs like "Washington 
Breakdown":
Sam Craig, played by Tracy, is a sportswriter at a New York daily and 
Hepburn is Tess Harding, an international reporter at the same paper. 
While not exactly a defender of the Stalin-Hitler pact, he does 
articulate the sort of isolationist mood that the treaty fostered in the 
Communist milieu. Tess Harding, on the other hand, is a tireless defender 
of antifascist struggle. Not only does she use her column to denounce 
Hitler, she devotes many non-working hours to speaking at anti-Nazi 
rallies. In addition to her strong antifascist convictions, she is a 
feminist. At a rally sponsored by a feminist group, she tells the 
audience that the best way they can celebrate the suffrage victory of two 
decades ago is by joining an international campaign to stop fascism.
One day after work Sam Craig is at a saloon with some newspaper pals and 
overhears Tess Harding on a radio quiz show. She fails to answer a 
baseball question correctly. Then she excuses her error by making a 
dismissive remark about baseball. In face of the burning questions of war 
and peace, she wonders why people would fill their heads with useless 
knowledge about children's games. Sam takes offense at her snobbery and 
attacks her in his sports column. She counterattacks and before long a 
full-scale flame war is taking place between the paper's two star 
columnists.
The editor intervenes and summons the two into his office to call for a 
truce. Sam takes one look at her and falls head over heels in love. He 
asks her for a date and they go to watch a ball game. In a classic Tracy-
Hepburn scene she misunderstands all the rules and he fails to explain 
them despite his best efforts.
Their next date produces another communication failure. She invites him 
to her apartment and he arrives expecting the two of them to be alone. 
Instead he walks into a cocktail party at full tilt. It is a gathering of 
her mostly foreign antifascist friends and allies. Most appear upper-
class and wear formal clothing. Sam feels out of place as he wanders from 
group to group trying to have a conversation in English. His ears pick up 
one such conversation and he tries to participate. The others immediately 
start speaking in Spanish in a deliberate attempt to exclude him. As he 
sits forlornly by himself on the sofa, a man in a turban takes a seat 
nearby. Again Sam tries to have a conversation but the turbaned man 
answers every question of Sam's with a bemused "Yes?". It soon becomes 
obvious to Sam that his companion speaks no English. As Sam walks off in 
disgust, he makes a rude comment about the "towel" on the man's head. 
This is a jarring note in a progressive film.
A day later Tess figures out that Sam didn't fit in and is remorseful. 
She wants to make it up to him and so asks him for another date. This 
time the two begin to show signs that they are falling in love. A few 
months pass and they decide to marry.
Their marriage fails to solve the same compatibility issues that haunted 
them at their first meetings. Her life revolves around her political 
commitments, particularly the need to rouse humanity against fascism. He 
simply wants her to be a housewife and resents all the time she spends 
globetrotting, or going from meeting to meeting. He doesn't understand 
her need to get mixed up with other people's problems. His isolationism 
does not speak of "America first" but of "family first." Spencer Tracy's 
ability to project warmth and humanity makes Sam Craig easier to accept 
than if someone like Clark Gable had played opposite Hepburn but the 
character is at the outward bounds of likeability, especially for a 
contemporary audience.
Even when they start a family, the bothersome issues of war and peace get 
in the way. She informs him out of the blue one day that they are going 
to have a child. He assumes that she has become pregnant but learns that 
instead she had made the unilateral decision to adopt a Greek boy. The 
boy is the orphaned child of parents who are the victims of some sort of 
political violence. He speaks no English, another disappointment for the 
long-suffering Sam Craig. 
He makes the decision to leave her since he feels she is incapable of 
change. He doesn't want to the husband of a movement figure any longer.  
He has decided that Tess cares more about humanity than their own family 
and will leave her to this suffering, non-English speaking humanity with 
all its strange clothing and customs. He will stick with baseball and 
other familiar icons of American life. 
The movie's tone changes abruptly after their separation. The insouciant 
comic scenes give way to somber portrayals of the two on their own. They 
miss each other desperately but seem unable to overcome the differences 
that set them apart. 
The pain of their separation in some ways must reflect the uneasiness 
that the Hollywood left felt in the two year period of the Hitler-Stalin 
pact. By 1939, the Communist intelligentsia had established a certain 
intimacy with the American New Deal liberal establishment.  Someone like 
Tess Harding was clearly a stand-in for Eleanor Roosevelt who had exactly 
the same sort of antifascist and feminist attitudes. By the time of the 
1939 non-aggression pact, you had to assume that screenwriters like Ring 
Lardner Jr. still retained a great deal of affection for figures like the 
Roosevelts despite the newly acquired anti-antifascist loyalties of the 
top party hacks. 
It is just such clashing loyalties that gives the film dramatic tension. 
Lardner simply lacks the sort of emotional distance toward the Hepburn 
character that would have caused her to be written one-dimensionally. No 
matter how much Lardner might have felt his "assignment" was to ridicule 
Tess Harding, what came out was an affectionate portrait. You can see Sam 
Craig's mixed feelings for Tess Harding as a projection of the divided 
loyalties of Lardner, who like most Communists of the era, probably 
thought of themselves as much as New Dealers as Reds.
Speaking metaphorically, Sam Craig and Tess Harding were reunited in June 
1941 as the Nazis invaded the USSR. The Kremlin found new allies in 
England and the United States and Communist screenwriters started to turn 
out mindless wartime propaganda like "Action in the North Atlantic." 
"Woman of the Year" with its troubled and ambivalent mood holds up much 
better than the flag-waving films that followed it after everybody in 
Hollywood became fashionably antifascist, including John Wayne and Ronald 
Reagan.

Title
Review for Mundo grúa (1999)
Filmed in an extremely gritty, almost sepia, black-and-white, "Crane
World" depicts a overweight, middle-aged Argentinian construction
worker named Rulo who is one step away from permanent unemployment. As
part of a growing neo-realist renaissance including films such as "La
Ciudad" and "Central Station," they offer a single-minded focus on the
losers in the new, highly competitive world economy. By the same
token, none offers a vision of how this situation might improve, least
of all through the examples of their characters, who are adrift like
pieces of wood in a stormy sea.
Rulo, played by Luis Margani, has been trained by a friend to operate
a crane on a construction site in downtown Buenos Aires. The new job
would offer the 49 year old not only some security, but a sense of
dignity. His life has been a string of one dead-end odd-job after
another. None has provided him with income beyond what is necessary to
sustain a very modest life-style. He lives in a cramped apartment and
drives to the construction site in a battered sedan that periodically
breaks down on the city streets. None of this bothers the affable
Rulo, who is always looking on the bright side.
His pleasures are modest. Hanging out with male buddies, he prepares
barbecue in his kitchen, watches soccer matches on television, tinkers
with engines and chain-smokes cigarettes. The highlight of his life
has been a gig in his youth as a bass player with a rock band called
the Seventh Regiment, named after the military unit two of the band
members served with.
An encounter with the proprietress of a sandwich stand near the
construction site leads to a new romance, soon after the woman reveals
that she was a big fan of the band. Keeping with his good-natured
personality, he only chuckles when she blurts out that he used to be
so skinny. What happened to him? He replies that we all get older.
Victim of his own excesses, Rulo discovers that his overweight
condition and general poor health excludes him from the crane
operator's job he had been banking on. In desperation he travels south
to an arid and desolate Patagonia where he has been told that another
crane operator's job is just waiting for him. Not only is the
construction site willing to overlook the physical condition of the
workers, it soon becomes obvious that the employer hardly cares
whether they live or die.
A group of a dozen or so men, including Rulo, live in a run-down
dormitory where there is no running water. They work day and night in
harsh conditions. When the boss neglects to provide lunch day after
day, the men hold a meeting to discuss their options. We can not let
them treat us this way, one worker says. During the meeting Rulo
remains silent.
Eventually they are all laid off. In a scene that epitomizes Rulo's
seemingly foolish determination to put the best spin on a bad
situation, he meets with the foreman who is putting him on a truck
back to Buenos Aires. They exchange pleasantries about how nice it is
to have friends and to share good times. In the final scene, we see a
grim-faced Rulo in his darkened apartment smoking a cigarette. What it
lacks in dramatic resolution, it more than makes up for in honesty
about this character and his lot in life.
The Rulos of this world constitute the overwhelming majority. All they
are looking for is the opportunity to share simple pleasures with
friends and loved ones. Driven by the lash of an increasingly
competitive labor market, they are forced to wander from country to
country, or within a country itself, looking for a permanent job that
pays a decent living wage. At one time Argentina had a powerful labor
movement that influenced film-makers. That labor movement, as is the
case in the rest of the world, has been in retreat. When it is reborn,
it certainly will inspire a different kind of movie with a different
kind of central character. In the meantime, it is essential that
directors like Pablo Trapero have the audacity to describe the world
as it is, in contradistinction to the pleasant lies coming out of
Hollywood and its outposts overseas.
("Crane World" is currently being shown at the Screening Room in New
York City. It closes on April 13.)

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
"The Fight Club" is ordinarily the kind of film I would stay away
from. The only reason I went is that it thematically related to
"American Beauty" and would serve as a useful counterpoint in
preparing this review. It seemed over-hyped and, even worse, starred
the odious Brad Pitt. Although I found the film nearly unwatchable, it
certainly did satisfy in terms of documenting the current scene in the
United States through the peculiar perspective of the young director
David Fincher and the screenplay based on the novel of Chuck
Palahniuk.
The central character in this film, who remains nameless and who is
played by Edward Norton, is very much like Lester Burnham. He is
trapped in the corporate world and finds himself increasingly
dissatisfied with the fruits it is supposed to deliver. He works for
an automobile company as a risk assessor. His job is to prepare
technical reports on accidents involving his company's products. If it
cost more money to fix a car rather than pay off successful claimants
in suits against the company, the company opts for not making the
necessary changes to make the car safe.
Norton's character leads an unfulfilled and aimless life. Rather than
masturbating as an outlet, he buys furniture from Ikea. His entire
apartment is covered with tables, chairs, lamps and sofas ordered from
their catalog, which also appears to be his only reading material. He
also suffers from insomnia for which the only cure seems to come in
the form of going to self-help groups for terminal diseases like
testicular cancer or tuberculosis. The emotional confessions of the
participants gives him a vicarious sense of being alive, which then
allows him to sleep soundly. While he enjoys good health, he is closer
to death than the people he communes with on a nightly basis. They
face physical mortality at any moment. He faces spiritual mortality
every moment of his waking life.
On an airplane ride to visit an accident site on behalf of his
company, he meets Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt) who is everything he is
not. Brash, self-confident and dressed like a pimp, Durden describes
himself as a soap salesman but he gives every indication of leading a
darker existence. The Norton character finds himself drawn to Durden.
When he arrives back at his apartment building, he discovers police
cars and fire trucks on the scene as flames pour from the windows of
his apartment. His precious Ikea furniture and all his belongings have
been destroyed in a mysterious explosion, possibly the result of a
pilot light having failed on his stove.
Since Durden gave him his business card on the plane, he decides to
call him up. In the back of his mind, he considers staying with him
until finding a more permanent residence. The two men meet for drinks
at a seedy bar and continue the conversation they had on the plane.
Basically, Durden puts forth a critique of consumerist society that is
absolute to the point of being monomaniacal. There is nothing more
evil in this world view than shopping and status-seeking.
After they have had several pitchers of beer, they leave the bar and
continue talking in the parking lot. Out of the blue, Durden asks the
Norton character to punch him. There is no particular reason for this,
but he accommodates him. Whereupon Durden punches him back and the two
men trade blows until they fall to the ground bloody and exhausted.
Meanwhile, a group of men from the bar stand in a circle around them
both entertained and bemused. Why are the two men, who appear to be
friends, pounding each other into senselessness? Eventually other men
follow in their path and a fight club becomes a regularly scheduled
event in the basement of the bar.
While the film does not really take the trouble to explore through
dialog the appeal such pointless violence has for these men, it
obvious that we are dealing with violence as a form of existential
authenticity. Men--and it is men we are talking about--feel trapped in
a meaningless existence. To transcend the emptiness of such existence,
the only release seems to be the feel of a punch in the nose and the
sight of blood pouring from it, either your own or your opponent's. In
many ways, this message is simply a recycling of the theme of Camus'
"The Stranger", whose existentially unrealized French Algerian
character discovers authenticity through the murder of an Arab on the
beach, whom he has never met. It also evokes "Clockwork Orange," whose
teenaged rebels inflict random violence on peaceful citizens in order
to protest the social control of a well-engineered and well-controlled
society of the future. "The Fight Club" would seem to be saying that
such a world exists today.
Eventually fight clubs spring up around the United States and begin to
mutate into nihilistic bands of black clad militia types with shaved
heads, who attack symbols of consumer society. In a very telling
scene, evocative of recent events in Seattle, they send an immense
globular corporate sculpture crashing into a Starbucks coffee bar. The
revolution of fight club activists is designed to destroy modern
society, not transform it into a positive alternative. This is not far
removed from the vision of the Unabomber and the intellectuals like
Kirkpatrick Sale and John Zerzan who provide spin-doctoring services
for him.
Where "The Fight Club" fails as both cinema and as effective social
commentary is in its total lack of engagement with the ideas that
might propel these men into such an extreme posture. While one would
not expect a film to include the sort of psychological and political
analysis of Dostoyevsky's "The Possessed", its total absence leaves
the viewer with an inability to understand their motivations. It is
simply not sufficient to state that all of a sudden men find
themselves willing to be beaten into senselessness as an escape.
Anybody who has been beaten up, and I speak from personal experience,
does not go through such an experience as a lark. In contrast
"Clockwork Orange" is filled with characters explaining why they
commit random acts of terror. Their words, drawn from Anthony
Burgess's capable prose, are indeed what makes the film successful.
Whatever the flaws of the film, it is a useful snapshot of American
society at a peculiar juncture in its unfolding as an empire. In the
final years of the second term of the Clinton administration, which by
some standards has produced more material success than has been
enjoyed in many years, Hollywood is turning out films that curse the
system that produced it.
Marxist discussion is at: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Title
Review for Kadosh (1999)
"Kadosh," a hard-hitting feminist polemic, revolves around the tangled
sexual politics of three men and two women in an ultra-Orthodox Jewish
sect in Jerusalem.
Meir, a Talmudic scholar, and his wife Rivka have been married for ten
years but have not been able to produce children, no matter how many
prayers are recited or how many ritual baths Rivka takes to rid
herself of "uncleanness." In the opening scene, Meir rises from his
bed and goes through an elaborate series of prayers culminating in
thanks to the Almighty that he was not born a female. The prayers are
conducted while he wraps the leather thongs of the 'tfilin' around his
arm, which altogether gives the appearance of a junky preparing for a
fix. Instead of searching for a vein, Meir seems intent on mainlining
God.
Rivka's younger sister Malka is in love with Jacov, but can not marry
him. He has joined the Israeli army in defiance of the sect's ban on
serving in the military. He is still deeply religious but is regarded
as a renegade by the rest of the sect, who view any departure from the
rigid code of conduct as evidence of godlessness.
Symbolizing this rigidity in the most dramatic fashion is Yossef, who
attends the same Talmud school as Meir. When we first see the two men
together, they launch into an extended disputation over whether it is
more observant to put sugar into hot water when making tea on the
Sabbath or vice versa. It turns out that the water should be poured
over the tea and the sugar so as to preclude the possibility that the
act amounts to cooking. Yossef is the sect firebrand and drives around
in sound-truck during the week urging Jews to "close ranks" against
their godless enemies, which includes both turncoats like Jacov and
all Arabs.
Their rabbi has instructed Malka to break off with Jacov and marry
Yossef. In a truly riveting but repulsive scene, Malka and Yossef are
shown in bed on their wedding night. He first reads a prayer that is
supposed to heighten the chances of procreation and then coldly
instructs Malka to spread her legs. Without any foreplay, he mounts
her like a ram and thrusts violently until he has climaxed.
Meanwhile, the rabbi has also instructed Meir to end his marriage with
Rivka. The fact that she has not been able to conceive is regarded as
a sin by the close-knit community and it is time for him to live up to
his responsibility as a Jew. In their world, men are brought into the
world to study the Talmud and women are there to support them. This
means first of all procreating and secondly to cook and to keep the
house clean.
Regarded by Time Magazine critic Richard Corliss as the greatest film
ever made in Israel, "Kadosh" is director Amos Gitai's attempt to come
to terms with what many secular Jews in Israel regard as a threat to
their existence. The ultra-Orthodox Jews are a tightly-organized
political faction that pressures Israel from the right. From the
standpoint of Gitai, a left-wing Jew whose grandparents came to
Palestine in the early part of the century as Labor Zionists, their
orthodox cousins are an uncomfortable reminder of where they came
from. While tokens of a backward and insular past are considered
hindrances to civil society in the Israeli present, the more important
question that the film-maker and most secular Jews are not prepared to
confront revolves around their future. In truth it is very likely that
within 25 years the only "true", i.e. observant, Jews will be the
ultra-Orthodox.
The ultra-Orthodox sects, also known as the Hasidim, originated in
18th and 19th century Poland and Russia in a time of great economic
stress and persecution. Marxist historian Ilan Halevi explains their
origins in his "Question Juive":
"The internal crisis of the Shtetl, whose roots are to be found in the
crisis of Polish feudalism, was exacerbated and radically aggravated.
The domain of Polish sovereignty was shrinking rapidly. A kingdom that
had stretched from the Baltic to the Black Sea grew smaller and
smaller as around it tsarist Russia, the Hapsburg empire and the
German states grew larger and larger. The Polish question became the
European question and centuries-old Polish Jewry saw its territory
carved up among several states Austria, which took Galicia, lightened
the conditions of Jews there: but Russia, having seized the Ukraine
and Byelorussia, oppressed them there, said Lenin, 'more harshly than
the Negroes'. The Napoleonic conquest, short as it may have been,
precipitated the disintegration, inducing a general upheaval in the
empires of the centre and east. Following the French occupation, the
whole map of the region was transformed. The new frontier of Austria
and Russia, which shared the whole of what remained of Poland in 1815,
cut the Ashkenazi world in two, divided the dynasties of Hasidic
rabbis, and determined new sub-problematics. The sociological unity of
Ashkenazi Judaism was beginning to fracture."
Against this pattern of disintegration, the Hasidic rabbis created
cults based on three key elements that were supposed to function as
life-rafts:
--Strict observance of rituals, particularly those involved with
"cleanness"
--Reverence for the rabbi, who in most instances were seen as a
potential Messiah
--Fervent recitation of prayers, dancing and singing meant to induce
mystical states
For some secular Jews, and even some non-Jews, this last element has
served to bring them into the fold. For instance, Bob Dylan drew close
to the Lubavitcher Hasidic sect in the 1980s. He swapped these beliefs
for Christian fundamentalism not too soon afterwards.
The Lubavitcher sect occupies a place in NYC politics not unlike the
sect depicted in "Kadosh" with the blacks of Brooklyn standing in for
the unfortunate Arabs. The Lubavitchers have used political clout to
gain preferential treatment to gain access to subsidized housing in a
neighborhood where it is in short supply. Such tensions provided the
backdrop for the riots that broke out during the Dinkins
administration when the lead car of a Hasidic caravan struck and
killed a black child. A Hasidic scholar Yankel Rosenbaum, identical to
the film's characters, was stabbed during the violence and Dinkins was
blamed for his death. The Hasidic community then delivered their votes
to the "law-and-order" candidate Rudy Giuliani who has done everything
possible to intimidate the black community, just the way that the
current Labor government in Israel is using every means at its
disposal to intimidate Arabs.
The contradictions of late capitalism are acting on worldwide Jewry in
a manner that few Marxists--in my opinion--have fully understood.
Social and economic processes are in motion that tend to create three
distinct "peoples". One is the ultra-Orthodox sect depicted in the
film. The second is the Israeli "Sabras", the native-born, largely
secular, Jews who retain many of the values of any colonizing people
like the Afrikaners. The third are the largely assimilated and secular
Jews outside Israel who in a generation or two will retain nothing
distinctly Jewish except perhaps their family name. The unique racial
politics of worldwide Jewry will be forced to define itself in terms
of how these various groups relate to worldwide capitalism and the
oppressed Arab and Palestinian peoples. Political polarization will
generate at least in some cases a radical response that the film
"Kadosh" hints at. It is a positive sign that the film criticizes some
of the most backward elements of Israel society and at least points
the way toward a deepening critique of that society, including its
secular but racist elements. 

Title
Review for Big One, The (1997)
Last night I laughed out loud for the first time in months as I sat
through Michael Moore's new movie, "The Big One." The biggest laugh I
got was when Moore was commenting on presidential candidate Steve
Forbes tendency not to blink. During this riff, we see the distinctly
odd-looking Forbes staring at the TV camera during a debate. He
blinked not once for what seemed an eternity. Moore called an eye, ear
and nose specialist at a NY hospital and asked what the doctor he
thought of someone with the ability to go for minutes without
blinking. The doctor's reply was that "He doesn't sound human." This
leads Moore to speculate on the possibility that the Forbes campaign
is staffed by extraterrestrial aliens.
Bourgeois society is filled with comic material like this, but our
corporate-sponsored comedians manage to sidestep it entirely. This
self-imposed censorship leads to some really bland and pointless
entertainment. I have tried to figure out the Seinfeld craze to no
avail. I watch reruns late at night in stony silence. What is so funny
about four obnoxious characters sitting around discussing their dating
problems or where they can get a good meal? My building on Manhattan's
upper east side is filled with such people and I try to avoid them at
all costs.
Moore has been compared to David Letterman, whose "found humor" on the
old NBC show was quite edgy. Since Letterman has moved to CBS and
aspired to be the new "Johnny," he has lost me entirely. Whenever I
turn him on, he is usually grimacing at the camera and telling racist
jokes about NYC's immigrant cabbies. If Moore had a TV show, he'd
probably be conducting sympathetic and humorous interviews with NY's
cab-drivers who organized a highly successful one-day strike last
week. Come to think of it, Moore did have such a show, called "TV
Nation." His tendency to take the point of view of the underdog no
doubt explains his banishment from the air-waves.
The exclusion of Michael Moore from network television is as much a
form of political censorship as is the exclusion of important
working-class struggles today. For instance, the powerful struggle of
dock-workers in Australia to win back their jobs after the right-wing
government fired them en masse has not been reported in the NY Times.
The only time workers get their story reported is when they are in
conflict with a Communist government, as was the case of Poland's
Solidarity. It is Moore's distinction to attempt to be the voice of
our own evolving Solidarity movement all on his own.
"The Big One" records Michael Moore's forty-seven city book promotion
tour for "Downsize This!: Random Threats from an Unarmed American." In
many of these cities he organizes guerrilla media attacks on
downsizing corporations. It is the stuff of his hit movie "Roger and
Me" but expanded to new targets.
In Centralia, Illinois he attends the rally of Payday candy workers
whose factory is about to move to Mexico. He walks into corporate
headquarters with a huge check for eighty cents and presents it to an
unsmiling public relations representative from the company. He
announces that the check will go to pay the first hour's wages of
their first new Mexican worker. During the tour, the Payday
corporation is sold to a new company and Moore visits them as well.
They will not allow him into the lobby but he stands on the sidewalk
outside holding up the huge check to the window. He yells at a
surly-looking security guard inside that the eighty cent check is made
out to the new owners.
There is one moment in the film that drives home the seriousness of
the downsizing problem. Moore is chatting on air with legendary
talk-show host Studs Terkel, whose interviews with working-class
Americans in books such as "Working" have become classics. The
question of terrorism has come up. "Downsize This!" begins with
side-by-side photos of the aftermath of the Oklahoma City bombing and
the wreckage of a closed factory in Flint, Michigan, Moore's home
town. What is the difference between the two types of destruction? In
the first instance, the bombing was unannounced and hundreds of people
lost their lives. In the second, the company politely announces to the
workers that their jobs are coming to an end and they clear out. After
they are plunged into economic ruin, many die prematurely from
alcoholism, drugs or suicide--the products of despair.
The climax of the movie revolves around Moore's confrontation with
Philip Knight, the "new age" CEO of Nike shoes. Moore wants to know
why Nike does not have a single factory in the United States. Knight's
reply is that Americans don't want to make shoes. They consider this
type of work beneath them. This inspires Moore to organize a rally in
his home-town. Hundreds of unemployed workers hold up signs saying
that they want to make shoes.
Presented with this evidence, Knight remains unsympathetic. Any
unemployed worker will jump at the opportunity to have a job, but the
truly motivated workers exist in other countries such as Indonesia
where Nike has many of its plants. But doesn't Nike employ twelve year
olds in these factories, Moore challenges him. Knight's shameless
reply is that Nike does not hire anybody younger than fourteen.
Furthermore, whatever hardships Indonesian workers are putting up with
today is necessary for the prosperity they will enjoy tomorrow. The
Manhattanites in the audience with me laughed at the bitter irony of
this. Indonesia's "prosperity" has been sacrificed at the altar of
IMF-sponsored austerity programs and the country is going up in
flames.
Moore's encounter with Knight has a certain added poignancy for me. A
couple of years ago I visited an old ex-Trotskyite buddy of mine in
Portland who had become a top-ranking officer in Nike's computer
systems department. He had managed to discard all his Marxist beliefs
like an old pair of sneakers. We spent hour after hour debating
socialism versus capitalism in terms not dissimilar from the
Knight-Moore debate. I gave up after a certain point since I
understood that there were material interests preventing him from
seeing things the way he used to. He had joined the cult of the
upwardly mobile. In Portland the chief guru was Philip Knight and just
to the north in Seattle there was another one named Bill Gates.
The relationship between wealth and ideology is not necessarily
predetermined. Moore's success in film-making and publishing has made
him a multimillionaire. His new-found success has made him the target
of Alexander Cockburn's diatribes in the pages of the Nation Magazine.
No doubt, Moore is not as approachable as he used to be. Since he is
something of a philanthropist for the left, he has been bombarded with
requests over the years. Furthermore, he is something of an
ego-tripper by the evidence of "The Big One" itself, where his every
quirk and obsession becomes fodder for the movie. (If Moore is not
careful, he could turn into a Woody Allen, who lost his sense of humor
decades ago.)
Yet despite this, Moore remains dedicated to the task of enlightening
American society. Someday there will be a revitalized leftist
movement. The cultural workers who are part of this movement should
consider themselves apprentices of Michael Moore, who knows how to
communicate at the grass roots level. One of the misfortunes of the
1960's radicalization was its tendency to use the symbols and language
of other peoples' revolutions. Moore understands that if there is to
be another American revolution, it will have to be grounded in our own
experience. To familiarize oneself with this "home-grown" approach to
radical politics, a viewing of "The Big One" is essential. As a bonus,
you will laugh your head off.

Title
Review for Arguing the World (1998)
Joseph Dorman's "Arguing the World" is a documentary study of the
careers of four celebrated Jewish intellectuals from immigrant working
class families who went to City College in the 1930s. While one of
them, Irving Howe, stayed more or less critical of American society,
the other three--Irving Kristol, Nathan Glazer and Daniel
Bell--evolved from establishment liberalism in the 1950s to
neoconservativism in the Reagan era. I use the word career advisedly
in describing their paths. Perhaps the most honest account of what it
meant to belong to this group is found in Norman Podhoretz's "Making
It," where he admits that what motivated each shift in his political
or cultural affiliation was how it would it advance his career.
Although the film has almost zero value in conventional cinematic
terms, consisting mostly of talking heads, it has a powerful
cumulative effect as a psychological study. The skillfully conducted
interviews encourage the three neoconservatives to speak unguardedly
about their foibles and their ambitions. None makes the slightest
effort to prettify themselves. Howe serves as a counterpoint to the
other three, but even he does not come away unscathed. Although the
documentary does not come out and state it in as many words, the
conclusion it leaves you with is how all-powerful and ineluctable is
the tendency for American capitalism to subvert the critical impulse.
City College was a hothouse of radical politics in the 1930s and the
epicenter was the cafeteria which contained a number of alcoves where
different political tendencies would congregate. The Trotskyists and
anti-Stalinists could be found in alcove one. One anecdote reveals the
peculiar nature of the anti-Stalinist left at CCNY. One of the
regulars, who was gifted with a "foghorn voice," would hawk his
newspaper within earshot of the CP's alcove. He'd cry out, "Read all
about Stalin's murderous deeds" until one of the CP students would get
provoked into an argument with the ideological opponent. This is a
very sterile form of leftism that is obviously more geared to the head
than the heart. Polemics for the sake of polemics has marred the
Trotskyist movement since its inception. What the film reveals is that
the training the four received in the polemical art gave them the
skills they need to advance in the academic and journalistic
professions.
The film spends considerable time explaining the importance of
Partisan Review to their careers. Launched as a journal of the
political and cultural avant-garde, it became a place where
publication signified a certain level of achievement. In the late 30s
it was the sole voice for anti-Stalinist intellectuals and stood
against a well-entrenched universe of Popular Front publications and
institutions that defended the CP line. When the CP was in good graces
with the New Deal, getting published in such publications could open
doors in the larger world of journalism and the academy. After the
cold war started, the Partisan Review became much more useful
career-wise as the Soviet Union was turned into public enemy number
one.
For the three neoconservatives, publishing in Partisan Review served
as a springboard into academic careers. By the late 1940s all had shed
their radical beliefs and had gone to work for prestigious
universities. They admit that the post-WWII boom had a lot to do with
their political evolution. They never had it so good. For the first
time in their lives they could afford an automobile. Furthermore, the
hatred for "Stalinism" that they had cultivated in their youth had
helped to sharpen their skills as defenders of American foreign
policy. If one had a facile command of Stalin's crimes, there always
was a writing or speaking engagement on tap in the 1950s.
McCarthyism opened up a fault-line between the three and American
liberalism. Sneering at the civil liberties concerns of the liberal
establishment, they gave critical support to McCarthy. Nathan Glazer
admits in the film that their position was not "honorable" but,
shrugging his shoulders, questions whether any other position was
possible given their political evolution.
Nathan Glazer was hired by U. Cal-Berkeley, while Daniel Bell went to
work for Columbia. Both became enemies of the student radicalization.
While Glazer was opposed to the ban on political tabling on campus in
1964, he was even more opposed to the student sit-ins that were meant
to overturn the ban. Bell was on a professor's committee to end the
occupation of the administration building at Columbia in 1968. He was
puzzled by the refusal of the students to enter into a debate about
the role of the university. Both he and Glazer could not understand
that the student radicals of the 1960s had little interest in the sort
of scholastic wrangling that had marked their own undergraduate
political career.
Irving Howe had broken with this group in 1954 around the time he
launched Dissent Magazine. His intention was to promote a "democratic
socialism" which would retain the anti-Stalinist beliefs of his youth
while developing a critique of American society. He comes across as
tolerant of Bell and Glazer, while barely concealing his contempt for
Kristol who became strongly identified with the Reagan revolution.
What Howe shared with the other three was an inability to understand
the student radicalism of the 1960s. When he met Tom Hayden, then a
leader of SDS, he tried to get him to take a position on matters such
as the Moscow trials. Hayden found Howe's preoccupations irrelevant to
his own, which revolved around ending the war in Vietnam and racial
oppression. Beyond their ideological differences, Hayden found Howe's
style patronizing and offensively avuncular.
The thirties generation simply could not understand the 1960s. It was
by and large a rejection of the rigid categories that had been
established in the Stalin-Trotsky debate. After Marxism became an
attractive option for these 60s radicals, there was an unfortunate
tendency to gravitate to Marxist groups that still retained a lot of
the ideological baggage that people like Irving Howe were carrying.
Now that we have evolved past the sectarianism of the recent past, it
is useful to consider the more long-term challenge to independent,
radical critiques of American society which is embodied in the career
of the three neoconservatives.
In every other country in the world where there is a tradition of
Marxist thought, it is easier to make an affiliation with Marxism
either as an intellectual or an activist. The United States provides a
very hostile environment. Not only has it remained more prosperous, it
has also elevated rugged individualism to the level of a religion. The
average working person dreams of starting his own business, while the
left-wing journalist or academician is preoccupied with his career. As
"Arguing the World" reveals, when Marxism gets in the way of a career
move, it is excess baggage easily dumped overboard.
When the next upsurge of the radical movement takes place, one can
expect that the preoccupations of the CCNY crowd will have finally
been put to rest. Facilitating that will be the accomplished fact that
the Soviet Union no longer exists. Scraping away the barnacles of dead
dogmas is always a difficult task, but our job is easier now that the
institutional support for them has disappeared. Of course, there is
one last sect-cult that has to be confronted and that is belief in the
American free enterprise system itself.
Marxist discussion is at: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Title
Review for Emerald Forest, The (1985)
John Boorman's 1985 film "The Emerald Forest" begins with the point of
view of a white family out on a picnic. Bill Markham (Powers Boothe)
is the supervisor of a dam construction site on the edge of the Amazon
rainforest, which looms menacingly. He warns his children to stay out
of the forest, since there are dangerous things inside it. By the end
of the film, the point of view becomes entirely reversed. It is the
forest that is the safe haven and it is the outside "civilized" world
that is savage.
His son Tommy (played by Charley Boorman, the director's son) strays
into the forest where he meets several members of the "Invisible
People," including the chief. They take him with him back into the
deep forest, while his distraught parents organize the construction
workers into a search party.
When we next see Tommy, he is an adolescent. Clad only in a
loin-cloth, he has become "Tomme." Side by side with his new father,
the chief (Rui Polonah), he is learning the fine points of hunting and
fishing with a bow and arrow. As it turns out, the chief had taken
pity on the boy and spirited him away from the "Termite People." He
decided that he would be better off in "the World," as the "Invisible
People" describe the rainforest. The "Termite People" are like insects
since they have been tearing down the big trees.
Tommy's father has never lost hope that he can discover his son and
organizes an expedition into the heart of the rainforest. He runs into
a war-party of the "Fierce People," who pursue him. He eventually lies
exhausted near a river, after having been wounded by one of their
spears. There he meets his son, who manages to rescue him from his
attackers. The two make their way back to the "Invisible People's"
camp.
After his father recovers from his wounds, he tells Tomme that he
wants to take him back with him to the city, but the youth explains
that he has been in "the World" too long. He belongs there now. Then
the father turns to the chief and asks him to order the boy to return
with him. The chief shrugs his shoulders and says that if the boy
wanted to return, he would have agreed to do so. Furthermore, he would
not be chief any longer if he told members of his tribe to do
something that "they did not want to do." This admission gets to the
very heart of the difference between "primitive" society and our own.
In our society, it is normal for the state, employer, teachers and
religious officials to order us around every day of our lives. The
high price of civilization is repression.
Next we find ourselves at an outpost at the edge of the forest that
houses a brothel to serve construction workers. They are working on
various development projects which have sprung up near the dam of the
opening scene, now up and running. The "Fierce People" are bargaining
with the white men who run the brothel. If they bring him Indian women
whom he can prostitute, he will give them machine-guns in exchange
that they can use against their enemies, including the "Invisible
People." We eventually learn that the Bill Markham's crew has build a
dam on the territory of the "Fierce People" and that their degraded
behavior is one of the unforeseen consequences of "development."
The "Fierce People" launch a raid on Tomme's village and take all the
young women back to the brothel, where they become go-go dancers and
prostitutes at the point of a gun. Among the women is Tomme's wife
Kachiri (Dira Paes). Tomme organizes a group to rescue the women but
fail because bow and arrows are no match for machine-guns.
He decides that there is only one person who can help him and that is
his biological father. He leaves "the World" and crosses a river that
brings him into a large city near the rainforest, where Bill Markham
lives. We see the city through the eyes of the Indian and it is a
horrible place. When he gets off his canoe, a gang of drunken,
pistol-shooting slum dwellers chase after him for sport. The irony is
that his pursuers are originally from the rainforest themselves and,
like the "Fierce People," have no place to go after losing their land
except the city.
One of the slum-dwellers rescues him from the mob and allows him into
his shack. He tells him, "I know you. You are one of the Invisible
People. Do you know my people? We were the Turtle People." While the
man is speaking, we hear the sounds of bottles crashing, boomboxes
blasting and violent arguments through the walls of the shack. Tomme's
face expresses fright and disgust at the notion that people have to
live this way. Boorman's film has succeeded, since we share this
feeling with him. We want to be back in the forest away from such a
horrible place.
Boorman took enormous risks with this film. He obviously left the task
of presenting a straightforward social and political account to
documentary makers. He is much more interested in trying to translate
his material into something approaching legend. There are numerous
scenes in the film when he tries to evoke a non-scientific
understanding of the world. Tomme searches for magic stones that have
the power to make the members of his tribe invisible. We also see
things through his eyes, when he goes through an initiation ceremony.
He turns into his totem, an eagle, and flies through the air.
At the conclusion of the film, we learn that at one time 4 million
indigenous people lived in the rainforests of Latin American. Now
there are less than 150,000. The final scenes of the film make a
powerful, dramatic case for how urgent it is to defend the human
rights of the remaining tribes. While it is too late to turn back the
clock, it is not too late to fight for the survival of this important
part of our human race right now.

Title
Review for Topsy-Turvy (1999)
Best known for his semi-improvised cinematic representations of
dysfunctional families and personal relationships trapped in the
oppressive web of British class society, director and screenwriter
Mike Leigh seemed like an unlikely candidate for a film based on the
career of Gilbert and Sullivan. The surprise is that he not only has
produced one of the greatest entertainment biographies of all time,
one that is faithful to the effervescent quality of Gilbert and
Sullivan's light operas, he has also managed to tell the story of the
frustration and suffering that went on behind the scenes. In doing so,
he remains faithful to the humanitarian spirit that defined his
earlier work.
"Topsy-Turvy" proceeds from the time in G&S's career when critics have
begun to detect a loss of creativity. Opening with the debut of
"Princess Ida", we see librettist Sir William Gilbert (Jim Broadbent)
in a rage over a review stating that the new work merely repeats
well-worn themes that have already appeared in their work over the
past 25 years. However, composer Sir Arthur Sullivan (Allan Corduner)
agrees completely with the negative review and announces his refusal
to collaborate with Gilbert until he has had the chance to compose a
serious opera based on a lofty theme rather than another
entertainment.
This coincidentally is the aspiration of film-maker John L. Sullivan
in Preston Sturges's screwball comedy "Sullivan's Travels", who is
tired of making comedies. This Sullivan wants to break free of
contractual ties to a Hollywood film studio in order to make a film
about the plight of the common man during the depths of the
depression, while the other Sullivan wants to be more like Verdi or
Wagner. (Sullivan did manage to create one serious
opera--Ivanhoe--which remains justly neglected.) D'Oyly Carte  (Ron
Cook), under whom Gilbert and Sullivan are obliged to contractually,
has the same attitude toward Arthur Sullivan that the film moguls have
in "Sullivan's Travels": why rock the boat. Not only does the tried
and true please the people, it also generates revenue. In essence,
this is the primary source of dramatic tension in "Topsy-Turvy",
namely the conflict between art and commerce.
Ever the hard-headed realist, Gilbert is depicted phoning the theater
box-office each morning after a performance in order to record the
receipts into a ledger book in his library. (One of the film's merits
is its attention to period detail. The phone is an unwieldy
contraption which forces people on either end to begin and end each
exchange with, "I am speaking now. Can you hear me." It has been
argued, by the way, that the period of the most rapid technological
change in human history is exactly the period depicted in
"Topsy-Turvy", when telephones, telegraphs, steamships and electrical
lights were first being introduced.)
This cash nexus is reflected not only between the clash between
Gilbert and Sullivan, but also in the manner in which the repertory
company in the Savoy Theater struggled for a sense of dignity and
accomplishment when management regarded them merely as wage labor.
In one of the most powerful scenes of the film, the principal male
actor-singers meet with impresario D'Oyly Carte for a salary review.
James Grossmith (Martin Savage) is told that he is to receive a 7.5
percent review, which is not only less than he expected, but
undermines his sense of self-worth as an artist. Anybody who has ever
been subject to a performance review in a corporation, upon which
salary increases are based, will appreciate how demeaning this
experience can be. Performing for Grossmith is as daunting a task as
it is for modern-day performers and he resorts to the same crutch
favored by many a rock star, the heroin needle. On the evening of the
first performance of "The Mikado," Grossmith is shown  in his
dressing-room plunging a needle into a scarred arm just five minutes
before the opening curtain.
The females also have it tough. Leonora Braham (Shirley Henderson),
the Savoy's ingénue, is not only an alcoholic, she can't seem to find
a unmarried man who will take an interest in her. As soon as she
mentions that she has a young son from a previous marriage, they shun
her. When co-star Jessie Bond (Dorothy Atkinson) suggests that she
sing at recitals in the home of London's wealthy, so as to meet
eligible bachelors, Braham complains about the class prejudices that
she finds there. Meanwhile, Bond performs on and offstage
flirtatiously night after night, despite a festering leg wound which
she gamely has fresh bandages applied to each day.
Despite the pain and frustrations of people from top to bottom of the
chain involved in producing these light-hearted operettas, when they
mount the stage we and the audience are left with sheer pleasure. This
is one of the great accomplishments of Leigh's film. It ranks with
Ingmar Bergman's filming of an onstage performance of Mozart's "The
Magic Flute." What gives Leigh's filming of G&S's classic ensemble
pieces even more power is its unstinting but compassionate portrayal
of the cast's vulnerabilities.

Title
Review for Bad Day at Black Rock (1955)
Last night while rummaging through Blockbusters trying to find a movie
to rent--an experience I always find dismayingly similar to picking
out a novel at an airport newsstand--I spotted "Bad Day at Black
Rock," the 1954 adventure saga directed by John Sturges, who is no
relation to screwball comedy's Preston Sturges.
This stirred up old memories like the tea-soaked madeleine in Proust's
"Remembrance of Things Past." All I knew about the movie was that it
starred Spencer Tracy as a stand-up, two-fisted guy who confronts a
bunch of villains during a 24 hour time period in a tiny western town.
Although the flick is second cousin to "High Noon," I seemed to recall
that it left most people with a feeling of disquietude back in 1955,
as if they were trying unsuccessfully to digest a piece of tough meat.
The movies had a much more important place in people's lives in the
mid-50s before TV took over. Nearly everybody went at least twice a
week and almost every night included a double feature, with a cartoon,
travelogue and newsreel lead-in. On Thursday nights, there was a
raffle. You put your ticket stub in a drum and the theater manager,
Mr. Balducci, would rotate it and pick the winner. The prize was
usually something like a set of dishes.
Mr. Balducci lost a leg during WWII, when his merchant ship was
torpedoed. He didn't put up with any nonsense in his theater and would
throw you out for whispering too loud. I can't imagine what he would
make of today's Manhattan audiences who treat the movie theater as
their own living-room. Not only do they often talk at the top of their
lungs, you risk getting shot if you try to shush them. When Mr.
Balducci headed down the aisles to administer justice, you could hear
him coming from 30 feet away. Ker-plunk, ker-plunk, ker-plunk, as his
wooden leg announced his coming. As soon as you heard that, you sat
upright in your seat, took your feet off the one in front of you, and
kept your mouth shut.
That's exactly the kind of impression that Jim McCreedy (Spencer
Tracy) makes when he gets off the train in Black Rock. World War II
has just ended and McCreedy, like Balducci, has lost the use of a limb
in combat, in this case his right arm. When McCreedy shows up at the
local hotel and announces that he is looking for Kimoko, a Japanese
farmer who lives nearby, he is met by stony silence.
The more he persists in finding out about what happened to Kimoko, who
has vanished from his property, which is now a burned-out rubble, the
more hostile the local denizens become. They are led by Reno Smith
(Robert Ryan) who is the ringleader of a bunch of no-goods including
Ernest Borgnine and Lee Marvin, cast according to type. Borgnine picks
a fight with Spencer Tracy at one point and gets beaten to a pulp.
While he has lost the use of one arm, he is still an expert in judo.
At this point, the bad guys decide that nothing short of murder will
do.
They are desperate because they fear that McCreedy will uncover their
secret: in a fit of racist anger, a mob led by Reno Smith had killed
Kimoko the day after Pearl Harbor. And just as was the case in the
internment of Japanese-Americans during WWII, there were economic
motives involved. Smith had leased the land to Kimoko after lieing to
him that there was ample water. What Smith did not know is that there
was water indeed, that the resourceful Kimoko had discovered drilling
60 feet under his land.
McCreedy came to Black Rock to present him with the medal that his son
had won posthumously fighting side by side with him in Italy. After
catching on that the father had been murdered, McCreedy decides to
administer justice in the good old-fashioned American way.
What is amazing, however, is that this sort of justice did not really
fit into the contemporary American scene, which could only be
described as a Black Rock from coast to coast. The Korean War had just
ended and fear and hatred of the "gooks" ran deep. Nineteenth century
fear of the "yellow peril" were now wedded to anti-Red hysteria. The
Rosenbergs had been executed two years earlier and the judge delivered
a xenophobic speech that practically blamed the two leftists for all
the dead American soldiers on the Korean battlefields. He said, "But
in your case, I believe your conduct in putting into the hands of the
Russians the A-bomb years before our best scientists predicted Russia
would perfect the bomb has already caused, in my opinion, the
Communist aggression in Korea, with the resultant casualties exceeding
50,000 and who knows but that millions more of innocent people may pay
the price of your treason. Indeed, by your betrayal you undoubtedly
have altered the course of history to the disadvantage of our
country."
The more typical movie of the mid-50s was "The Bamboo Prison," of
which I have vivid memories. It is about American GI's in a Red
Chinese prison camp. One scene depicts them being "brainwashed." They
are seated in a classroom, where a Communist instructor drones on and
on about the injustices of class society. One can imagine how
laughable that might have seemed to an American audience in that
period, especially after having been eligible to win a raffle for a
new set of dishes. Because the GI's will get beaten if they fall
asleep during a lecture, they paint eyeballs on their eyelids so as to
be able to nap safely.
Now why didn't John Sturges elect to make movies like that? There is
absolutely nothing in his background that would suggest he would make
such a contrarian film. The last thing that American audiences in 1954
wanted to be reminded of was mob violence against the Nisei. Sturges,
who made films for the US Army Air Corps during WWII, was no
Communist. He just liked to make straight ahead action films. His
other credits included "Gunfight at the O.K. Corral," "The Old Man and
the Sea" and "The Magnificent Seven."
In a 1975 NY Times interview, Sturges likened pictures to "a chattel
mortgage" financed by bankers or other sources of wealth. The only
difference between an amateur and professional director is that the
professional "finishes the film," paying off the mortgage. His
pictures, he added, were to explain "why our side won." 
The memorable thing about John Sturges is that at least in the case of
"Bad Day at Black Rock," our side is the human race.

Title
Review for Fire Down Below (1997)
There is a genuine integrity to Steven Seagal's body of work. While
the critical establishment is finally giving Jackie Chan the acclaim
that he richly deserves as martial artist/film star, isn't it about
time that we recognize Seagal for the politically progressive
trail-blazer that he is? Make way, Oliver Stone, for a genuine
rebel--one who is at home delivering class-struggle speeches or karate
kicks to a villain's teeth.
In his latest film "Fire Down Below," Seagal plays Jack Taggart, an
EPA inspector who goes undercover in rural Kentucky to find out who
has killed his partner. His partner was investigating toxic spills.
His cover is as a volunteer church worker who repairs the porches of
congregation members. The pastor is played by Levon Helm, formerly of
the band called The Band.
It turns out that a most reactionary member of the bourgeoisie, Orin
Hanner (Kris Kristofferson), is being paid big money to hide toxic
waste in the hills and waters of the beautiful Appalachian
countryside, and the chemicals are killing fish and making children
sick. Orin Jr.(Brad Hunt) runs the day-to-day operations in the hills
while his dad sits in the corporate headquarters like an Appalachian
version of the rotten businessman J.R. Ewing on the old TV show
"Dallas". Now in his sixties, Kristofferson has adapted well to
villainous roles. He was outstanding as the sadist cop in John Sayles
"Lone Star" and equals that performance here. 
Orin Jr. sends out one goon squad after another to kill Seagal, but he
always manages to defeat them with well-placed kicks and punches. The
charm of watching Seagal in action has a lot to do with his growing
middle-aged paunch which many cinema fans can identify with. Seagal
wears long coats throughout the film which tastefully disguise his
love handles, but you can discern their contour if you look carefully.
Not only does he have lethal extremities, he is also cunning and
lethal behind the wheel. One of Hanner's thugs tries to run him off
the road, but Seagal dodges him at the edge of a cliff and the
would-be killer drives to his death. This is an action hero par
excellence: a combination of the Roadrunner, Bruce Lee and--best of
all--Big Bill Heywood.
As soon as he returns to town after the car chase, he walks into the
middle of a church service and mounts the pulpit. He tells the
congregation that there are rich people who are trying to poison them.
Their profits come at the expense of the town's children or the beauty
of the environment. It is time to stand up to these greedy businessmen
and fight for justice, says Seagal with a steely glint in his eye.

Title
Review for Mifunes sidste sang (1999)
A few months ago Marxism list subscriber Daniel O'Connell, who is now
gallivanting somewhere in Europe, told me about the Denmark-based Dogma 95
film-making movement. Last night I saw "Mifune", an officially approved
Dogma 95 movie. Before discussing this altogether enjoyable film, a few
words about Dogma 95 is in order. If you go to their website at
http://www.dogme95.dk, you will find a manifesto that states:
"In 1960 enough was enough! The movie was dead and called for resurrection.
The goal was correct but the means were not! The new wave proved to be a
ripple that washed ashore and turned to muck. Slogans of individualism and
freedom created works for a while, but no changes. The wave was up for
grabs, like the directors themselves. The wave was never stronger than the
men behind it. The anti-bourgeois cinema itself became bourgeois, because
the foundations upon which its theories were based was the bourgeois
perception of art. The auteur concept was bourgeois romanticism from the
very start and thereby ... false! "
Lars von Trier, one of the founders of the movement, is a red-diaper baby.
His mother was a Communist, his father a Social Democrat, and both worked
in Denmark's social-services ministry. According to a NY Times (Apr. 30,
2000) profile of von Trier and Dogma 95, they met during World War II in
Sweden after fleeing the Nazi occupation of Denmark, "my father because he
was Jewish and my mother because she was in the resistance." They were also
dedicated nudists (although less so than another relative von Trier
describes who kept his apartment warm and "was always completely naked, on
principle"). His childhood included occasional holidays at nudist camps.
"It was very strange," he says, "kind of charming."
In essence, the Dogma 95 school sought to achieve a kind of pristine
authenticity in film-making that had been lost through the introduction of
elaborate film-scores, cinematography, special effects, etc. It was no
accident that they likened their movement to a kind of Protestant challenge
to Catholic rococo excess. Denmark, after all, was one of the European
centers of hair shirt Calvinism. Leaving no room for misinterpretation, the
Dogmatists laid down strict rules about how to make a movie, which they
called "The Vow of Chastity":
"I swear to submit to the following set of rules drawn up and confirmed by
DOGME 95:
1. Shooting must be done on location. Props and sets must not be brought in
(if a particular prop is necessary for the story, a location must be chosen
where this prop is to be found).
2. The sound must never be produced apart from the images or vice versa.
(Music must not be used unless it occurs where the scene is being shot). 3.
The camera must be hand-held. Any movement or immobility attainable in the
hand is permitted. (The film must not take place where the camera is
standing; shooting must take place where the film takes place).
4. The film must be in colour. Special lighting is not acceptable. (If
there is too little light for exposure the scene must be cut or a single
lamp be attached to the camera).
5. Optical work and filters are forbidden.
6. The film must not contain superficial action. (Murders, weapons, etc.
must not occur.)
7. Temporal and geographical alienation are forbidden. (That is to say that
the film takes place here and now.)
9. The film format must be Academy 35 mm.
10. The director must not be credited.
Furthermore I swear as a director to refrain from personal taste! I am no
longer an artist. I swear to refrain from creating a "work", as I regard
the instant as more important than the whole. My supreme goal is to force
the truth out of my characters and settings. I swear to do so by all the
means available and at the cost of any good taste and any aesthetic
considerations. Thus I make my VOW OF CHASTITY." 
Copenhagen, Monday 13 March 1995 
On behalf of DOGME 95 Lars von Trier Thomas Vinterberg
Turning now to "Mifune", directed by Soren Kragh-Jacobsen, you are
essentially presented with a film that makes the most of a natural setting,
namely a ramshackle farm in the Danish countryside. This is not a film set,
but an old house that von Trier discovered. It was a perfect find since
much of the film's magic is associated with the play of sunlight in the
interiors of the house and on the surrounding fields, all of which evokes a
Van Gogh painting.
The plot is a variation on "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest" or "Queen of
Hearts" as Kresten (Anders W. Berthelsen), a middle-class businessman from
Copenhagen, is forced to cope with the care of his simple-minded and
mentally ill brother Rud (Jesper Asholt) after the death of their father at
the family farm.
The title of the film is drawn from a game Kresten plays to amuse his
brother when he is agitated. He pretends to be Toshiro Mifune, a "Samovar"
warrior. After putting a metal pot on his head and wrapping himself in a
sheet, he stamps the ground while grimacing and growling in mock-Japanese.
While his original plans called for staying at the farm for no more than a
day or so, Kresten finds himself drawn into the upkeep of the farm and the
care of his long-forgotten brother. This is not an easy task since Rud
marches to his own drummer. When he is not spinning out tales about the
impending arrival of UFO's that are coming to the farm to take him away, he
is stealing Kresten's money to buy thousands of lottery tickets that he
hides in his underwear.
To help him cope with all this, Kresten hires a housekeeper from the city
named Liva (Iben Hjejle), a prostitute fleeing a nasty pimp and a
psychopathic telephone stalker. They are eventually joined by her
foul-mouthed chain-smoking younger brother Bjarke (Emil Tarding), who has
been thrown out of boarding school for bad behavior. Even though she is
constantly being provoked to the point of distraction by Bjarke herself,
she is deeply devoted to him. During a session with one of her johns, she
discovers that the wealthy client has had a role in Bjarke being caned at
the boarding school. Her response is to knock him to the floor and to pee
on an expensive Persian rug he dotes on while he watches helplessly.
The two brothers, the woman and her brother interact with each other
through the remainder of the film in the rooms and fields of the ramshackle
farmhouse. Using natural light, hand-held cameras and a total absence of
music, Von Trier creates a magical world. The conflicts and harmony of the
four characters can only be described as something out of a Mozart opera or
Chekhov play, as the sharply defined characters evoke in each other
responses that nobody--including the audience--could have predicted at the
outset.
The Marxism mailing-list: http://www.marxmail.org

Title
Review for Promesse, La (1996)
When we first meet Igor (Jeremie Renier), a teen-aged garage mechanic,
he is stealing the wallet of an elderly woman whose car he is
servicing. That act would seem to define the essential immorality of
"La Promesse's" central character.
Next we see him join his father Roger (Olivier Gourmet) in a van
filled with undocumented workers, mostly from Eastern Europe and
Africa, who have come to Belgium to escape economic oppression. What
awaits them at Roger's warren of ramshackle buildings is only a tiny
step upward. As they stand forlornly outside the buildings--their new
homes--they complain about the smell of shit. They will rent dismal
rooms there and work for a pittance repairing the buildings. To make
sure that they will bend to his will, Roger orders Igor to collect
their passports.
The relationship between father and son is like the kind Dickens wrote
about in Oliver Twist. Roger, a Fagin like character, is both bullying
and affectionate to his son. He bonds with him by tattooing his arm,
using the crude sort of needle-pen and ink that you find in prisons.
Although there is no explicit mention of Roger having a criminal past,
he strikes you as a criminal type. He is constantly ripping off his
workers and tenants and seems ready to use violence to achieve his
aims at the drop of a hat. By all appearances, Igor is destined to
turn out like his father.
One day the immigration police make a surprise raid and the workmen
flee in all directions. In the ensuing panic, Hamidu (Rasmane
Ouedraogo), who is from Burkina Faso, falls from a third floor
scaffold. As he lies on the ground severely injured, he whispers to
Igor that he must watch over his wife Assita (Assita Ouedraogo) and
their baby, who have just arrived with the latest batch of "illegals."
"Promise me," he says. Before Igor has a chance to answer him, his
father arrives and makes a decision that will divide him
psychologically and morally from his son. If they bring Hamidu to the
hospital, they will invite an investigation by the cops. So they put
some planks over the injured man to keep him from view and allow him
to die. After he dies, they drag him into a shed and pour concrete
over his body.
Igor is assigned the task to lie to the dead man's wife that he has
fled town because of gambling debts. She answers emphatically that he
will return, because he is her husband. In the course of their
conversation, the youth takes note of the coldness of the room and
tells her that he will bring a gas heater. For some reason, he views
the African woman and her infant as fellow human beings. Whether it is
because of the "promesse" her dead husband demanded from him, or some
shred of humanity that his father has not managed to rip out, he
begins to bond with her. For the remainder of the film, he does
everything he can to protect the woman and her baby, even when she
rejects his protection. She finds it difficult to distinguish the boy
from his heartless father.
One can understand her wariness of whites. In one scene, she waits
under a bridge for Igor, with her baby in her arms. Suddenly she feels
a stream of liquid on her head. Two motorcyclists have begun pissing
on her. After she screams at them, they get on their bikes and ride
over her bags. A carving of a deity is destroyed in the process. Igor
takes her and the child to the garage where he begins repairing it,
only to be confronted by his father who demands that he turn the woman
over to him. He has made plans to sell her into prostitution.
Although Belgium does not evoke images of racism, economic tensions
are turning it into a simmering cauldron of hatred according to a
March 5, 1998 USA Today article filed by Marco R. della Cava from
Antwerp, Belgium:
"Living in fear because of one's skin color would appear to be  the
dirty little secret of a quiet country best known for chocolates,
diamonds and the EU's headquarters. Except this is no secret. 
"Belgium is home to the most racist people in Europe, tops among  a
15-nation populace of 370 million who are increasingly tense  over
joblessness and immigration, according to the EU poll released  in
1997. 
"In the poll, European citizens were posed the following question:
'Some people feel they are not at all racist. Others feel they  are
very racist. Would you look at this card and give me the number  that
shows your own feelings about this?'
"Belgians were the most open about their racist feelings, with  22%
saying they considered themselves 'very racist.' They were followed by
the French (16%) and Austrians (14%). Least racist  were the Swedes
(2%). Among all Europeans, just 9% rated themselves  as 'very racist'
and another 24% said they were 'quite racist.' 
"The poll's companion analysis indicates that those polled explained
their racist tendencies by linking top concerns -- unemployment,
crime and drug abuse -- to the growing legions of economic and
political refugees banging on Europe's door. 
"Whatever the reasons, Europe is being prodded to quickly address  its
increasing ethnic dilution. Liberal voices urge education  and
employment, while far-right groups echo the slogan of Antwerp's
popular political party Vlaams Blok: 'Eigen volk eerst,'  'Our People
First.'"
I strongly recommend "La Promesse" as a powerful human story that
dramatizes one of Europe's most urgent social problems. It is written
and directed by Jean-Pierre and Luc Dardenne. It was released in
American theaters in 1996 and is now available in video.
Marxist discussion is at: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Title
Review for Fresa y chocolate (1993)
Most of the action in "Strawberry and Chocolate" takes place in 
Diego's (Jorge Perugorría) living room, a gay character struggling 
with sexual and cultural repression in the Cuba of 1979. Despite 
this, it opens up a vast panorama of the human heart. In these close 
quarters overflowing with symbols of the homosexual demimonde, Diego 
attempts to seduce David (Vladimir Cruz), an earnest but dogmatic 
member of the Young Communist League attending college. However, it 
is Cuban society itself that is ultimately being seduced in this 
remarkable state-sponsored film.
Diego initially lures David to the apartment with a promise of photos 
that Diego took of him performing in a college play. After arriving 
there, Diego showers him with all the forbidden fruit that a good 
Communist would deny himself, from English tea served in fine china 
to Maria Callas arias. David is simultaneously repelled by and 
attracted to his host. Although the thought of gay sex is the last 
thing on his mind, he finds himself drawn into Diego's nonstop, 
impromptu lecture on fine literature and the need to be cultured, 
even in a revolutionary society. After Diego announces that he cannot 
find the photos, both the audience and David understand that this is 
just a ploy to get him to return.
And he does return. At first, under his room-mate's advice, he 
returns to "gather intelligence" about this sexual and political 
subversive, especially his role in organizing a sculpture exhibit by 
a gay artist and friend, whose work mixes Christian iconography and 
elements of sadism. Diego complains openly to David that art in Cuba 
is either shallow propaganda spoon-fed to the masses or clumsy 
attempts at modernism. After a few more visits, David begins to warm 
up to Diego as a human being, while Diego also begins to forget about 
seduction.
Starting out as a hard-liner, David defends the status quo by stating 
that you have to make a choice between the class struggle and its 
enemies "out there", pointing at Miami and Washington. Despite this, 
he continues to be drawn in by Diego's refined sensibilities and 
charisma. While some American critics have found fault with the 
character's campy mannerisms, there is much more to him than a limp 
wrist and a lisp. In scene after scene, he insists that unless there 
is room for him and people like him in the revolution, then it is not 
a genuine revolution. For the revolution to triumph, it needs an open 
mind toward sexuality and culture. As he puts it, "The best is not to 
be shocked by anything, and to sip from every cup.'"
Made in 1993, "Strawberry and Chocolate" was the last film directed 
by Tomás Gutiérrez Alea, who was dying of cancer. Juan Carlos Tabío, 
who, like Alea, makes films that serve as a prod to the social 
conscience of Cuba, co-directed. In his latest film "The Waiting 
List," Tabío takes aim at bureaucratic inertia in a bus station. The 
two stars of "Strawberry and Chocolate" are reunited there, with Cruz 
starring as an audacious young engineer organizing the transformation 
of the station and Perugorría as a mechanic feigning blindness just 
so he can get to the head of lines.
The willingness of such Cuban films to take aim at entrenched and 
backward political and social institutions should challenge critics 
of Cuban communism to reflect on the usefulness of such terms as 
"Stalinist" or "bureaucratic." In bourgeois society, change generally 
comes through pressure on the government, while state cinema in Cuba 
seems to exist in large part to exhort society to adapt to a changing 
world.
Even the mainstream press in the United States is waking up to new 
Cuban realities. The Atlanta Journal and Constitution (March 19, 
1995) reports:
--- 
Because he was gay, Reynaldo Garcia once was ostracized as a member 
of "La Escoria," the official Cuban government term for homosexuals, 
convicts and the mentally ill. It means "the scum." 
Now Garcia can do something he never dreamed would be possible - walk 
hand in hand down the streets of Havana with his lover of six years 
without fear of reprisal. 
"I never thought I would see this day. It's a beautiful feeling," 
Garcia said. "I feel like people are starting to see us as human 
beings, like anyone else." Cuba is backing away from years of 
discrimination against homosexuals. Once packed off to work on rural 
farms alongside dissidents and religious Cubans, or nudged into 
exile, gays have entered a period of tolerance.  
---
In 1995 Havana held its First International Transvestite Festival, a 
celebration of Cuban-style camp in which prancing female 
impersonators aped Whitney Houston, Tina Turner and Diana Ross to a 
dazzled audience sprinkled with fellow cross-dressers. 
After the appearance of "Strawberry and Chocolate," one Communist 
Party leader took Alea aside told him he was ashamed to see himself 
in the cinematic portrayal of a homophobic party hard-liner. 
In a gay-oriented email list, U.S. citizen Larry R. Oberg commented 
on his trip to Cuba:
"What I found in Cuba was a gay community with many parallels to the 
gay community in North America and a few differences as well. For one 
thing, there are no laws on the Cuban books that discriminate against 
gays. (This is to be contrasted with the United States where all too 
many states retain outdated sodomy laws and where, increasingly, 
repressive legislation is enacted at the state level.) I have talked 
with literally hundreds of gays (mostly men) in Cuba and I found none 
who believe they are being persecuted by their government. 
Discrimination by individuals is reported, however, and there is also 
a lot of resentment of the residual macho attitudes that remain 
stubbornly embedded in some levels of Cuban society, attitudes that 
perpetuate highly dichotomized sex roles and prejudice against 
homosexuals amongst the population at large. But none reported active 
or systematic repression by the state. 
"It seems to me that it is important to put Cuba's past record of 
mistreatment of gays in its proper perspective. For example, 
thirty-five or so years ago, in Boise, Idaho, hundreds of gay men 
were persecuted, driven from their homes and families and imprisoned 
in one of the more infamous anti-gay actions in our history. Florida 
itself has a dreadful record in terms of gay rights and only about 10 
years ago in Adrian, Michigan, the police staked out a public park 
for months and then arrested over 30 men at their homes, in front of 
their wives and children and, in a couple of cases, grand-children. 
(With one exception, all of these guys were married self-identified 
heterosexuals.) Cuba's past record on gay rights may be no better 
than our own, certainly nothing to be proud of, but in my experience 
gays in today's Cuba are better off than they are in any other Latin 
American society (check the murder rate in Rio) and better off than 
they are in many states in our Union (think Matthew Shepherd). 
"Cuban society, like most North American and European societies, is 
undergoing a profound review and reconceptualization of its attitudes 
towards gays and lesbians. Most of you probably know about the film 
Strawberry and Chocolate, the first Cuban film to deal openly and 
directly with homosexuality. (If you haven't seen it, I recommend 
it.) What you may not know is that the film was wildly popular in 
Cuba (indicating, no doubt, a repressed need to talk about this 
issue). Apparently it played simultaneously at 10 or 12 theatres in 
Havana for months to lines several blocks long. 
"Another seminal incident along the road to acceptance for Cuban gays 
occurred in 1996. Pablo Milanes, a Cuban nova trova singer who has 
achieved quasi-sainthood amongst the island's population, wrote a 
song about gay men entitled Original Sin (available on his CD 
entitled Origines), a song he dedicated to all Cuban homosexuals. 
Introduced at his annual holiday concert held in the vast Karl Marx 
Theater in the Miramar neighborhood of Havana, El Pecado original 
took the audience and the country by storm and did much to advance 
the cause of gay acceptance."
(Oberg's full report can be found at: 
www.mail-archive.com/marxism@lists.panix.com/msg23270.html)
I rented "Strawberry and Chocolate" on Friday night in an attempt to 
clear my mind of the World Trade Center disaster. The streets were 
flooded with American flags and overhead you could hear the roar of 
F-16's, part of the Praetorian Guard assigned to President Bush.
As the USA prepares for war and all the awful consequences flowing 
from that, I am struck by the differences between this country and 
Cuba. As the crisis of the 21st century deepens, the sclerotic mob 
running the White House looks to answers from 1898, while Cuba, a 
country that was a victim of that trumped-up war, looks into the 
future. For a way out of this impasse, it seems that the answers will 
be found in Cuba, a country whose material poverty is more than 
compensated by the grandness of spirit found in "Strawberry and 
Chocolate."
Marxism list: http://www.marxmail.org

Title
Review for Odds Against Tomorrow (1959)
Last Saturday night (6/12/99) I went to see "Odds Against Tomorrow"
with my friend Paul Buhle. The audience included the screenwriter Abe
Polonsky, who was one of the Hollywood 10, John Lewis, the Modern Jazz
Quartet's pianist who wrote the score, and Harry Belafonte, who
produced the film and was one of the co-stars. They were to speak on a
panel immediately following the film.
Paul's book "Tender Comrades", a series of interviews with
blacklistees conducted by various scholars, is now available in
paperback from St. Martins Press and is a must for anybody interested
in left cultural history. Paul did the Polonsky interview and prefaces
it as follows:
"ABRAHAM LINCOLN POLONSKY, the son of a Jewish pharmacist, grew up in
New York and graduated from City College and the Columbia Law School.
He taught at City College and started writing for radio, scripting
episodes of The Goldbergs, during the mid-1930s. By the end of the
decade he was also writing for Columbia Workshop Theatre and Orson
Welles's Mercury Theatre of the Air. As he continued working on plays
and fiction, he visited Hollywood for the first time in 1937. But
instead of immediately attempting a career there alongside so many
other left-wing writers, he made a political choice. For two crucial
years when the American labor movement was at the apex of both its
influence and its collective idealism, he operated as educational
director and newspaper editor of a regional ClO union north of New
York City.
"Right before world War II, Polonsky had a novel serialized in
Collier's that attracted renewed attention from Hollywood. But
military duty took precedence. After serving with the Office of
Strategic Services, at times behind the lines in France, Polonsky
resumed to Hollywood at last, in 1945. After a disappointing start at
Paramount, he became the leading scenarist for Enterprise, the best of
the new, small production companies. With the hit boxing film Body and
Soul under his belt, Polonsky then wrote and directed Force of Evil,
considered by critics to be one of the best films noirs of the era, an
intensely poetic, radically stylized work that nonetheless managed to
observe the conventions of the crime genre. A script for I Can Get It
for You Wholesale, produced while Polonsky was out of the country,
rounded out his Hollywood life before the blacklist drove him out of
the industry."
Directed by Robert Wise, "Odds Against Tomorrow" is a film of notable
"firsts" and "lasts". Made in 1959, it was the last true 'film noir'
and follows the form's conventions as strictly as Kabuki or Noh
theater follow theirs. Filmed in black-and-white, it is the story of 3
men who set about to rob a bank since fate will permit no other
solution to their collective economic woes. Most scenes are shot at
night and include the mandatory rain-slicked streets, blinking neon
lights observed from second-rate hotel windows, and smoky bars and
nightclubs.
By the same token, it was the first film noir to feature a genuinely
noir actor. The African-American actor and singer Harry Belafonte had
formed his own production company out of frustration with the sort of
roles he had been offered by white Hollywood. Playing Jimmy Ingram, a
jazz musician with gambling debts he has no hope of paying off, he
decides to participate in a bank robbery in upstate NY. He has been
recruited by Dave Burke (Ed Begley), an ex-cop who was drummed off the
force after 30 years because he "wouldn't talk" to the State Crime
Committee. One can surmise that this was a form of rebuttal to Elia
Kazan's "On the Waterfront," which glorified informants. Another first
was John Lewis's score, the first jazz composition written for a film.
Burke has also lined up Earle Slater (Robert Ryan), a WWII veteran who
has been released from prison recently after serving time on a
manslaughter conviction. Slater has simply not been able to integrate
into American society since the war and has failed at one job or
another. Unlike the rosy vision put forward in publicity surrounding
"Saving Private Ryan" and Tom Brokaw's "The Greatest Generation," noir
films often depicted WWII veterans in bleak circumstances. In real
life, Robert Ryan was a principled liberal who had spoken out for
economic and racial justice during the 30s and 40s. Unlike many
others, he had not backed down from McCarthy and defended the civil
liberties of those in the industry--like Polonsky--who were under
attack.
Slater is a diehard racist from Oklahoma, who in the opening scene of
the film set on the sidewalk outside Burke's hotel, tells a young
black girl who he has bumped into, "You lil pickaninny, you goin' to
kill yourself flyin' like that, yes you are." Thusly, his conflict
with Belafonte's character, who will not tolerate racism, creates the
secondary tension that is sustained through the rest of the film. You
watch the film wondering who will kill each other first. The cops and
the robbers, or the robbers themselves.
Ingram has almost no use for white people. Although not political in
any way, he rejects white society's values. In a scene with his
ex-wife who is active on a PTA committee with white members, he
challenges her belief in integration after she has reprimanded him as
an inadequate father to their daughter. While Slater can't integrate
into American society because of character flaws, Ingram won't because
of flaws he perceives in society itself.
RUTH (flaring): "I am trying to make a world fit for Eadie to live in.
It's a cinch you're not going to do it with a deck of cards and a
racing form."
INGRAM: "But you are, huh? You and your big white brothers. Drink
enough tea with 'em and stay out of the watermelon patch and maybe our
little colored girl will grow up to be Miss America, is that it?"
The gang of three proceeds to the town of Melton, about a hundred
miles north of NYC on the Hudson River, where they will rob a bank in
a plan that Burke assures them can not go wrong. Of course, by film
noir conventions, we are prepared to expect the worst. Hudson, NY
provided the locale for the final scenes of the movie. As a tableaux
of honest, hard-working villagers lifted from a Norman Rockwell
painting, it provided a dramatic contrast to the violent, cunning, and
cynical NYC home of the gangsters. 
The panel discussion was chaired by John Schultheiss, the editor of
"Odds Against Tomorrow: The Critical Edition" (Cal State, 1999), who
provided valuable historical context for the making of the film.
In a montage of "race understanding" films from the mid 1950s,
Schultheiss explains how unique "Odds Against Tomorrow" was. In prior
films such as "The Defiant Ones," there is a plea for racial tolerance
but the black character is always sacrificed in the process. Chained
to white racist escaped convict Tony Curtis, fellow escapee Sidney
Poitier constantly goes out of his way to show the audience that he
will turn the other cheek, while Curtis keeps slapping it. Belafonte
explained that he wanted to depict a black character who would not
stand for any humiliation. It was also a way to tell Hollywood that he
would not kowtow to their idea of how a black character should behave.
Belafonte had put his own fortune and reputation on the line. Waiving
his fee as an actor, and fronting a quarter-million dollars, he sought
to break new ground cinematically. In Schultheiss's commentary on the
film, Belafonte is quoted, "My own personal desire was to put things
on the screen that reflected the deeper resonance of black life,
things that had never been approached before, even within the United
Artists realm." His partnership with United Artists was a reflection
of the special role of the company in Hollywood, which was to be
obliterated by corporate ownership a decade or so later. Formed by
Charlie Chaplin in the 1920s, United Artists was cooperatively owned
by actors, screenwriters and directors who wanted to make
uncompromising films.
Belafonte made two decisions that reflected his own uncompromising
beliefs. He hired Abraham Polonsky to write the film, who was still
blacklisted. Belafonte's connections to this world was rooted in his
own experience as a blacklistee. What enabled him to break free of
McCarthyite repression was his unique folksinging talent, which
attracted the support of Ed Sullivan who featured Belafonte regularly
on his popular Sunday night television variety show. Buhle told me
that despite this, Sullivan was a run-of-the-mill red-baiter, who had
viciously attacked Polonsky in a newspaper column in the same year
"Odds Against Tomorrow" was being filmed.
Once Belafonte became a powerful show business figure in his own
right, he told his blacklisted friends and acquaintances that he would
do everything he could to piggyback them out of the witch-hunt. Just
jump on his shoulders. Receiving $35,000 for his screenplay, Polonsky
was one of the first. Even the selection of a "front" for Polonsky was
carefully thought through for its political impact. John Oliver
Killens was an important black writer, who was active in the civil
rights movement along with Martin Luther King Jr., Belafonte and
others. (Killens eventually became a black nationalist and a supporter
of Malcom X.)
Schultheiss posed a provocative question to Polonsky. How did his
belief in progressive politics square with his decision to write a
film with criminals as central characters, who had no socially
redeeming qualities? Was it difficult to make what was essentially an
entertainment about hardboiled criminals, when his stated beliefs
revolved around transforming American society? Polonsky, never one to
mince words, practically spit out his reply. He said that American
society itself was criminal and that the film's characters were just
trapped within the system.
This raised for me an interesting line of investigation. It would
appear that film noir would represent for left-wing screenwriters the
same sort of appeal as Nathaniel West's novels. West, a Communist
sympathizer, wrote what were effectively noir novels. In "Miss
Lonelyhearts", a bitter, bleak story about the impossibility of
breaking though economic and personal limitations, West offered no
pat, socialist solutions to the misery of his characters. One would
assume that film noir allowed the film writer the same artistic
latitude.
Belafonte offered his own thoughts on the question of progressive
politics and entertainment, which I found particularly profound. He
said that one of the worst things about conglomerate transformation of
popular culture was the way it cheapened the notion of entertainment.
For Belafonte, entertainment is akin to engagement. A film like "Odds
Against Tomorrow" might disturb you, but it would also captivate you
and make you think. Today's notion of entertainment seems designed to
dull the thought and make one less than fully human. Back when
Belafonte made the film and until the present moment, he had no such
intentions. As he told Schultheiss in a 1998 interview:
"But Hollywood was no more than a reflection of the nation. It was
saying no more and doing no more than America was saying and doing. If
Hollywood was to change, then America had to change. We had to then
change the way America was doing business: to let Hollywood understand
that it had to do business on different terms. The upheaval took place
and the struggle took place, and in that climate Abe and I then saw
the opportunity to put a point of view on the screen that was very
different from any of the others around. This would be Odds Against
Tomorrow." 
(For Marxist discussion: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Title
Review for Veuve de Saint-Pierre, La (2000)
Late one night in 1849 a drunken sailor murders his former captain on the
forlorn, windswept island of St. Pierre in maritime Canada. As French
subjects, the local magistrates must comply with the law of the republic
and have him guillotined. Since the island lacks such a device, a
requisition order goes out to fetch both a guillotine and an executioner.
Until they arrive from St. Martinique, the prisoner will be kept under the
custody of the captain of the local jail, who is married to "Madame La," as
the local denizens refer to the wife of La Capitain. With these spare
elements of a tale based on true events, director Patrice LeConte
("Ridicule" was his credit) delivers a powerful dramatic message in "The
Widow of St. Pierre" against capital punishment and for the redemptive
power of love and compassion.
Soon after being jailed, the prisoner Neel Auguste (played by Emir
Kusturica, the Yugoslav director of "Underground") is summoned to the
apartment of the captain whose wife has taken pity on him. Since it might
take months for the guillotine to arrive, there is no reason not to make
him comfortable until that moment arrives. Played by Juliette Binoche,
Madame La is innocent of suspicion or fear. Under her supervision, Neel
builds a greenhouse in the jail's courtyard. Holding up a flower, she tells
him that the goal is to bring life and beauty into a hostile environment.
With her eyes on the hulking, withdrawn prisoner, it is clear that she
seeks to reap life and beauty from him as well. After the greenhouse is
finished, she takes him with her everywhere in the village to find other
chores to keep him busy, from repairing roofs to saving the life of a woman
on a runaway wagon.
While the captain (Daniel Auteuil) is deeply in love with his wife and
anxious to assist her in this reclamation project, he is by no means a
typical jailer. Of an aristocratic bearing, he seems to prefer riding his
horse "Salt Cod" on the rocky cliffs of St. Pierre to the mundane details
of jail-keeping. Even before Madame La ever takes an interest in the
prisoner, he decides to leave the cell door open. After all, on this remote
island there is virtually no escape.
Alongside the human drama of "The Widow of St. Pierre," the landscape and
population of the island help to shape the narrative of the film and lend
it a particularly somber tone, especially during the winter months which
anticipate the arrival of the guillotine. In their black oilskin parkas,
the local sailors and dockhands stand out vividly against the drifting snow
like hunched-over figures in a Breughel landscape. And it is these humble,
faceless and nameless men and women of St. Pierre who eventually rally to
Neel. When the local magistrates put up posters advertising for an
executioner, they tear them down one by one.
The captain and his wife are not ideologues. The only time they seem to
take notice of politics is when he sits by the fireside in their living
room reading a Paris newspaper. He mentions to Madame La that there is
strife and bloodshed in the streets, but does not connect it to the more
immediate drama facing them and the prisoner. Of course only one year
earlier all of Europe was being swept by revolution against the old order.
France, which was once in the vanguard, had now become a bastion of
reaction all in the name of the values of "the republic". The captain and
his wife seem to adhere to an earlier notion of civic duty that has not
been tainted by the guillotine or the Thermidor republic.
Essentially "Widow of St. Pierre" is not a political film, although it
speaks to a question addressing all progressives, namely how to live by a
set of principles. It is this higher calling that the main characters of
the film respond to, in the face of the callousness and brutality of the
existing order. This is also the theme of "Ridicule," LeConte's last film
which dramatized the struggle of an aristocrat in pre-1789 France to rid
his ancestral lands of the malarial swamp that is killing his subjects. To
gain an audience with the King, he discovers that he must master the art of
"ridicule", the verbal art of one-upsmanship that provides a cruel
entertainment for the court's inner circle.
Although not remarked on by the film critics, "Widow of St. Pierre" evokes
another 19th century tale of capital punishment. While Herman Melville's
"Billy Budd" also draws together an aristocratic officer and a commoner
facing execution, the decision here is to obey the law rather than a higher
justice. The captain of a British warship decides to proceed with an
execution despite all the evidence pointing to an accidental death provoked
by extreme cruelty from another officer whom the ship's crew hates and
fears. Budd, like Neel, is beloved by the commoners.
Unlike St. Pierre's captain, the captain in Melville's tale opts for
following the letter of the law. While this tale has been analyzed and
deconstructed by modern literary scholars as having to do with anything
from homosexuality to theology, it is essentially a story like most of
Melville's, one deeply entwined with the struggle of ordinary working
people against a cruel, class-divided society. For an analysis from this
perspective, see the article titled "Billy Budd and Capital Punishment" at
http://andromeda.rutgers.edu/~hbf/bbcap.htm by H. Bruce Franklin, one of
the USA's most distinguished Melville scholars and a long-time socialist.
"Widow of St. Pierre" is currently being shown at the Paris Theater in NYC
and can probably be seen at art-houses in major cities around the United
States.

Title
Review for Day the Earth Stood Still, The (1951)
Last night I watched "The Day the Earth Stood Still" on video. It was
the first time I had seen it since its original theater appearance in
1951. It is one of the first films of the period to question the cold
war even if on an allegorical basis, just as another science fiction
flick "Invasion of the Body Snatchers" was designed to increase
anti-Communist hysteria.
A flying saucer lands in Washington, DC and discharges its two
passengers, the humanoid Klaatu, played to a tee by Yorkshireman
Michael Dennie who bears a striking resemblance to David Bowie, and
his assistant Gort, an 8 foot robot with super-powers.
Klaatu has come to the planet Earth to deliver a message to the
assembled leaders of all governments. He belongs to an interplanetary
confederation that has outlawed warfare and become aware of the
earthlings' recent experiments with guided missiles carrying nuclear
warheads. They fear that eventually these types of weapons might be
introduced into outer space. So an ultimatum is to be delivered.
Unless these experiments are called to a halt, the confederation will
send a fleet of robots to destroy the planet Earth.
Klaatu can not even get to first base with the truculent and
irrational earthlings. The Russian government will only attend a
conference if it is based in Moscow, while the British are opposed to
setting foot in Communist territory. Meanwhile, many Washingtonians
believe that Klaatu is a Communist spy, while others simply want to
eliminate him as a threat to the status quo.
In order to find out more about the mores of the planet, Klaatu
disappears into the streets of Washington and finds a furnished room
in a house where Patricia Neal and her young son live. Klaatu takes
the two into his confidence and they find themselves in solidarity
with his mission. In the climax of the film, Neal rescues the planet
from immanent destruction by giving "Don't shoot" instructions to the
robot: "Gort! Klaatu barada nikto!"
Klaatu also makes an effort to set up a meeting with the world's
greatest scientist, Dr. Berhardt, who is played by Sam Jaffe, and
other leading scientists. Bernhardt. Bernhardt is an obvious stand-in
for Albert Einstein, who had come out repeatedly against atomic
testing and for socialism during those insane years.
Although director Robert Wise is better known for his "West Side
Story" and other mainstream Hollywood flicks, there is some strong
circumstantial evidence of leftist sympathies. He was chosen by Harry
Belafonte to direct "Odds Against Tomorrow", a noir masterpiece that
was written by blacklistee Abraham Polonsky and which challenged some
of the major racial stereotypes of the 1950s.
In the climactic scene Klaatu is killed by a fear-mongering government
agency, then resurrected by his robot charge Gort. Astonished by the
power of this foreign technology, Patricia Neal asks him whether
control over life and death is possible. Klaatu assures her that such
powers belong only to the "Almighty Spirit" and that his life
extension is good only "for a limited period," the duration of which
"no one can tell." In Edmund North's original script, Gort resurrects
Klaatu without limitation. But the movie industry's censors told the
producers: "Only God can do that."
North's other best-known writing credit was the screenplay for Francis
Ford Coppola's "Patton," about which he stated, ''I hope those who've
seen the picture will agree with me that it is not only a war picture,
but a peace picture as well.''
The film's producer Julian Blaustein also produced "Broken Arrow,"
based on the Elliott Arnold novel "Blood Brother," Blaustein
demonstrated great enlightenment for that time in Hollywood by working
hard to portray Native Americans fairly. He employed 375 Apaches to
perform in the film, build authentic wickiups and other props, play
native instruments and teach the movie-makers traditional dances. 
"We have treated them as people, not savages," Blaustein told The
Times in 1950. "We have tried to show that the only real 'heavies' are
ignorance, misunderstanding and intolerance."
It is very likely that Robert Wise, Edmund North and Julian Blaustein
were all touched to one degree or another by the great outpouring of
radical politics and culture of the 1930s and 40s. Their story is
being told by Paul Buhle and others. It is worth emulating as we move
toward a new radicalization provoked by the capitalist contradictions
of the new millenium.

Title
Review for Central do Brasil (1998)
To help make ends meet, retired schoolteacher Dora (Fernanda
Montenegro) works as a letter-writer in Rio de Janeiro's Central
Station. Illiterate working people approach her table and dictate
letters to lovers and family members, which she transcribes. The irony
is that Dora's life is empty of such human relationships.
Each night she returns to her apartment and receives visits from her
next door neighbor Irene (Marilia Pęra), who is also alone in the
world. Dora spills out her bitterness at humanity, including the
clients who have put their trust in her. She goes through their
letters with Irene and makes fun of the human feelings contained in
them. Half go directly into the garbage can, because she thinks they
are not worth posting. The other half end up in a desk drawer, to be
posted when she gets around to it. While she picks apart the poor
folks whom she writes for, Irene, a few years younger and less bitter,
pleads for clemency while usually being overridden.
One day she is approached by Ana (Sôia Lira) and her nine-year old son
Josué (Vincius De Oliveira). She wants to send the boy up to the
remote northeast area of Brazil to meet his father for the first time.
She dictates the letter to Dora and gives her a photo of the boy to
send to the father along with the letter, so he will be able to
recognize him when he arrives. Dora takes the letter back to her
apartment and sticks it in her desk drawer.
The next day Ana is run down by a bus in front of the train station.
The homeless Josué has no place to go and begins spending his days and
nights in Central Station. Every so often, Dora--despite
herself--offers him a kind word or a sandwich. There is a nationwide
epidemic of homeless children in Brazil, a problem that was treated
cinematically in "Pixote." Many of these children turn to crime in
order to survive and their prospects for survival are bleak. "Central
Station" shows a teenager being gunned down on the railroad tracks by
a cop for the crime of stealing a walkman.
In a mixture of opportunism and pity, Dora takes Josué to an adoption
broker. She receives a thousand dollars and is assured that he will be
sent to a "good family" in the United States. She buys a new Sony TV
with her commission and shows it off to Irene. When she explains how
she got the money, Irene screams at her. Nobody will adopt a
nine-year-old. They will kill him and sell the organs on the open
market. Dora, who still has a tinge of affection for the boy, decides
to rescue him from the broker and personally take him to his father.
Thus begins a remarkable journey that is unlike any I have ever seen
in a film. It is a "road movie" that simultaneously takes the bitter
old woman and the child deep into Brazil's countryside, and into the
recesses of their own hearts. Through a series of mishaps, the two
find the journey much more daunting than they first expected. They
learn to rely on each other's emotional support and street smarts. In
the process, he forgives her for selling him to the broker, while she
begins to experience love for another human being for the first time
in her adult life.
What gives their odyssey additional power from a cinematic standpoint
is the on-location filming in the roadside cafes, bodegas and small
towns in Brazil's dry and mountainous northeast. The characters whom
we meet in these scenes appear to be ordinary Brazilians from the
area, whose faces are much more beautiful and appropriate to the
action than any professional actors' could be.
The casting of Dora is critical to the success of the film. In the
production notes, Director Walter Salles describes 67 year old
Fernanda Montenegro as Brazil's Gena Rowlands or Giulietta Masina. She
is an enormously intelligent actress who has starred in the leftist
film "They Don't Wear Black Tie." The choice of Marilia Pęra is also
interesting since she played the prostitute who ran with the gang of
child outlaws in "Pixote." Vincius De Oliveira was a shoeshine boy
whom Walter Salles discovered outside a small airport in downtown Rio
de Janeiro. He says, "Because it was raining and he didn't have any
clients at the moment, he asked me to help him buy a sandwich. He told
me that once I returned from the city of Sao Paulo that afternoon, he
would pay me back." In other words, the shoeshine boy who is cast as
Josué really is a Josué.
"Central Station" hearkens back to some of the greatest films of
Italian neo-realism like "The Bicycle Thief." It will also remind you
of the films of Satyajit Ray, whose affection for common folk did not
preclude a critical view of their foibles. The difference between
"Central Station" and the garbage coming out of Hollywood each week
lies in the social and economic differences between Brazil and the
United States. Countries that are living on the edge, like Ray's
India, De Sica's postwar Italy or Brazil today can foster art that
gets closer to the human condition. The desperation borne out of
economic and social dislocation can work on the sensitivity of the
sympathetic novelist or film-maker and great art often emerges.
While "Central Station" does not offer any pat answers to Brazil's
problems, there is no doubt that the obstacles that economic hardship
puts before the disadvantaged appall Walter Salles. Dora is not some
kind of political activist. Indeed, her cynicism would make her an
unlikely candidate. Instead she articulates the hopes of ordinary
Brazilians for a society in which love and happiness is the rule. We
are reminded of the title of Ken Silverstein's study of the Workers
Party: "Without Fear of Being Happy."
Yesterday, somebody sent me some email trying to figure out where I
was going with my articles on Marxism and indigenism. I tried to
explain that it was part of a life-long struggle to redefine a
socialism on the basis of freedom from want, in an environment of
human solidarity. Like the characters in "Central Station," the great
majority of the human race is looking for love and companionship on a
personal and communal basis, while not having to worry about where the
next meal is coming from. Nearly everything else is extraneous.
The director Walter Salles understands this completely. In explaining
the critical acclaim the film has received, he says:
"...I think the question of the search is very important in the film.
We're talking about the woman who searches for her lost feelings and a
boy who searches for his father. Since the Greeks, I think we've
always been concerned with the idea of getting back to the place where
we come from--to try to understand who we are. This is the boy's
plight, but what the two of them discover is not only the family at
the end of the film, but the importance of companionship, friendship
and understanding.
"In a way, these values are not really appreciated in today's very
competitive society, where efficiency is everything. These questions
of solidarity or friendship or everything that's important in the film
are not rated in the Stock Exchange. This might also be one of the
clues to why people respond to the film in such an emotional way. It
talks about things that are not perceived as important but are
extremely important for our survival."
For Marxist discussion: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html
